WASHINGTON — Chuck Hagel appears to have weathered a concerted and vocal campaign to derail his chances for defense secretary, with President Obama likely to nominate him as early as next week, administration and Congressional officials said Friday.Since Mr. Hagel's name emerged as a candidate for the Pentagon in early December, conservatives, pro-Israel groups and gay rights organizations have raised objections to his views on Israel and Iran, as well as disparaging comments he made about a gay former diplomat.Administration officials cautioned that Mr. Obama has not made a final decision or offered Mr. Hagel the job. But people on Capitol Hill who know Mr. Hagel, a former Republican senator from Nebraska, have said that all signs were pointing to his selection.In an interview with NBC's "Meet the Press" last month, Mr. Obama defended Mr. Hagel from the criticism, saying that while he had not decided on a defense secretary, Mr. Hagel was a "patriot" and that nothing in his record would disqualify him for the job.The president could announce the selection as early as Monday, officials said, after returning from a vacation in Hawaii. That would come days before a visit to Washington by President Hamid Karzai of Afghanistan, during which he and Mr. Obama are expected to discuss options for American troop withdrawals from Afghanistan.Mr. Hagel, should he be named by Mr. Obama, will most likely be comfortable with what Pentagon officials say is a White House desire to draw down the remaining 66,000 troops as quickly as conditions allow."One of the reasons we're in trouble in Afghanistan is because we went well beyond our mission," Mr. Hagel told Robert Nolan, an editor and television producer, in May 2012 for a PBS series on foreign policy. "And now, 12 years later, we're not sure what our mission is."Critics faulted Mr. Hagel for referring to pro-Israel lobbying groups as the "Jewish lobby," and said he offered inadequate support for Israel and was soft on Iran. He apologized last month for saying 14 years ago that President Bill Clinton's nominee for ambassador to Luxembourg, James C. Hormel, was not qualified because he was "openly, aggressively gay."But Mr. Hagel has influential defenders. "He has a very sound, thoughtful mind," said Brent Scowcroft, a longtime friend and the national security adviser in the administration of the elder President George Bush.Mr. Hagel is the second rumored cabinet nominee to encounter fierce resistance. Susan E. Rice, the ambassador to the United Nations, withdrew her name from consideration for secretary of state after Republican lawmakers vowed to block her nomination because of statements she made after the deadly attack on the American mission in Benghazi, Libya.Mr. Obama instead named Senator John Kerry, Democrat of Massachusetts, to replace Hillary Rodham Clinton, who is expected to step down.
WASHINGTON — When President Obama nominates Chuck Hagel , the maverick Republican and former senator from Nebraska, to be his next secretary of defense, he will be turning to a trusted ally whose willingness to defy party loyalty and conventional wisdom won his admiration both in the Senate and on a 2008 tour of war zones in Iraq and Afghanistan.The choice of Mr. Hagel, the first Vietnam veteran to be nominated for the post, would add a prominent Republican to Mr. Obama's cabinet, providing some political cover for the president's plans to exit Afghanistan and make cuts to a military budget that has roughly doubled since the 2001 terrorist attacks.But Republicans made clear on Sunday that they would give Mr. Hagel a rough ride on his path to the Pentagon, questioning his support for Israel, his seriousness about the Iranian nuclear threat and his commitment to an adequate defense budget. And Mr. Obama may also face difficulties from some Democrats who are wary of negative comments that Mr. Hagel made more than a decade ago about gays.Some Obama aides had doubts about the wisdom of the choice, given Mr. Hagel's frosty relationship with members of his own party, but officials said they were confident that they could corral enough votes from both sides of the aisle to win confirmation in the Senate. White House officials confirmed on Sunday that Mr. Hagel was Mr. Obama's pick for the job and said the announcement would come as early as Monday.Rather than turning to a defense technocrat, Mr. Obama decided on an independent politician whose service in Vietnam gave him a lifelong skepticism about the commitment of American lives in overseas conflicts. Like Mr. Obama, Mr. Hagel supported the war in Afghanistan but opposed the troop surge in Iraq under President George W. Bush.Mr. Hagel, 66, served as an enlisted man in Vietnam, won two Purple Hearts and still carries bits of shrapnel in his chest. He was the co-founder of a cellular telephone company and headed an investment banking firm before being elected to the Senate in 1996. He retired in 2009 and now teaches at Georgetown University and serves as chairman of the Atlantic Council, a centrist foreign policy group.In July 2008, during the presidential campaign, Mr. Hagel accompanied Mr. Obama, who was then in the Senate, on a six-day trip to Afghanistan, Iraq, Jordan and Kuwait. When Senator John McCain, the Republican presidential nominee that year, asserted that Mr. Obama's motive for the trip was political, Mr. Hagel strongly defended Mr. Obama, saying in a television interview that Mr. McCain was "on thin ground" in trying to impugn Mr. Obama's patriotism.In the Senate, Mr. Hagel voted in favor of the resolution authorizing Mr. Bush to take military action in Iraq, which passed overwhelmingly in October 2002. But he soured on the effort early, and became an advocate of the view that America had lost sight of what it was trying to accomplish and that it was overestimating its ability to change Iraqi society.In some ways, Mr. Hagel bears a similarity to Susan E. Rice, the ambassador to the United Nations and Mr. Obama's first choice for secretary of state. She withdrew her name from consideration, making way for the selection of Senator John F. Kerry. Ms. Rice, like Mr. Hagel, is a trusted Obama ally who spoke up for him during the 2008 presidential campaign and became a lightning rod for Republican attacks."The president wants someone whose judgment he respects on the big questions of war and peace," said Philip D. Zelikow, a senior State Department official under Mr. Bush and now a member of the President's Intelligence Advisory Board. Mr. Hagel is co-chairman of the board.The White House is calculating that opposition to Mr. Hagel may be loud but not broad and that in end the Senate will confirm him. Administration officials argued that voting against a Republican war hero to run the Defense Department would not be easy for fellow Republicans, and they are confident that disgruntled Democrats will ultimately not deny their president his choice.
WASHINGTON — In his effusive endorsement of Chuck Hagel as his choice for secretary of defense on Monday, President Obama set in motion a White House campaign that officials predict will overcome weeks of accusations that the Republican former senator from Nebraska is anti-Israel, antigay and soft on Iran.The president extolled Mr. Hagel's record as a decorated veteran of the Vietnam War, saying that he was "the leader that our troops deserve." He described how Mr. Hagel once saved his brother, who was fighting alongside him, after he was wounded by a mine."With Chuck, our troops will always know, just as Sergeant Hagel was there for his own brother, Secretary Hagel will be there for you," said Mr. Obama, who was flanked by Mr. Hagel and the departing defense secretary, Leon E. Panetta, at the White House ceremony."Maybe most importantly," the president continued, "Chuck knows that war is not an abstraction. He understands that sending young Americans to fight and bleed in the dirt and mud, that's something we do only when it's absolutely necessary."The president's message seemed intended in particular for the conservative critics of Mr. Hagel, including Senator John McCain of Arizona, who have warned that he will face a bruising confirmation battle. White House officials said that Republicans, whatever their policy disagreements, would find it difficult to vote against an acknowledged war hero.Mr. Obama's announcement was part of a carefully calibrated White House strategy that has included reaching out to pro-Israel lobbying groups, with a goal of wearing down the resistance to Mr. Hagel that erupted as soon as he emerged last month as a front-runner for the Pentagon post.Conservative and Jewish groups reiterated their concerns on Monday that Mr. Hagel has opposed sanctions on Iran, failed to support Israel, and has advocated engaging with Hamas and Hezbollah. They want him to explain why he once referred to pro-Israel lobbying groups as "the Jewish lobby," a phrase they said was hurtful to Jews.Still, it was not clear how hard they will fight to block Mr. Hagel, now that the president has nominated him. "We're not in the opposition camp, we're in the concerned camp," said David Harris, the executive director of the American Jewish Committee, a centrist Jewish group. "We're going to count on the Senate to examine, as it must, key issues of concern."Republican and some Democratic senators predict Mr. Hagel will still face tough questions about his views on Israel, Iran, and negotiating with Islamic militants. He has also faced criticism from gay rights organizations because of remarks he made 14 years ago — for which he has since apologized — about an openly gay diplomat.In a statement, Mr. McCain, a Vietnam veteran like Mr. Hagel who serves on the Senate Armed Services Committee, said, "I have serious concerns about positions Senator Hagel has taken on a range of critical national security issues in recent years." But he added, "Chuck Hagel served our nation with honor in Vietnam."The White House is working behind the scenes to mollify other potential critics. Administration officials said Mr. Obama's chief of staff, Jacob J. Lew, called Howard Kohr, the executive director of the American Israel Public Affairs Committee, one of the most influential pro-Israel lobbying groups.A spokesman for Aipac, Marshall Wittmann, said the group did not take a position on presidential nominations.Mr. Harris, of the American Jewish Committee, said Iran topped his list of concerns about Mr. Hagel because the senator voted against unilateral American sanctions against the Iranian government over its nuclear program and had argued against using the threat of military force to prevent Tehran from obtaining a nuclear weapon.Abraham H. Foxman, the national director of the Anti-Defamation League, said the senators should challenge Mr. Hagel on his positions on Israel and Iran, which he said were "so out of sync" with those of the president.On Monday, White House officials rounded up examples of what they said showed the hypocrisy of the senator's critics. In e-mails to reporters, they noted that Dick Cheney, the Republican former vice president; television news networks; and The Washington Times had all used the phrase "Jewish lobby" without generating a furor.
FORT MEADE, Md. — A military judge on Tuesday declined to dismiss charges against Pfc. Bradley E. Manning , a former Army intelligence analyst accused of providing archives of military and diplomatic documents to the antisecrecy group WikiLeaks , despite complaints by his defense team that he had been mistreated while being held at the Marines ' brig at Quantico, Va.But the judge, Col. Denise Lind, ruled that brig officials had improperly kept Private Manning on stricter conditions, including procedures designed to prevent potentially suicidal detainees from injuring themselves, for excessive periods. As a remedy, she granted Private Manning 112 days of credit against any eventual prison sentence.That amounted to little more than a symbolic victory for Private Manning, whose supporters had rallied around claims that he had been tortured at Quantico. Prosecutors are pursuing charges, including aiding the enemy and violating the Espionage Act, that could result in a life sentence if he is convicted. His court-martial is scheduled to begin on March 6.The ruling by Colonel Lind came after a long pretrial hearing last month that amounted to a miniature trial over whether military officials had subjected Private Manning to unlawfully harsh conditions over the roughly eight months he spent at Quantico in 2010 and 2011. His defense team had asked for the charges to be dismissed or for 10-for-1 credit for time served for the bulk of his time in Quantico, which could have shaved around seven years from any eventual prison term.But Colonel Lind, who spent nearly two hours reading her opinion in a small courtroom on Tuesday afternoon, found for the government on most of the disputed facts. She recounted in great detail Private Manning's sometimes erratic behavior and mental problems both before and after his arrest in Iraq in 2010, including suicidal gestures and comments that she said made his captors legitimately fear that he was dwelling on suicide and biding his time until an opportunity arose."There was no intent to punish the accused by anyone in the Marine Corps brig staff or chain of command," she said. "The intent was to make sure the accused was safe, did not hurt himself and was available for the trial."Still, Colonel Lind found that some steps brig officials had taken were excessive. The government had already conceded that Private Manning should not have been kept on the strictest status, "suicide risk," on two occasions totaling seven days, after a brig medical official said that status was no longer necessary. She agreed, awarding one day of credit for each of those days.She also said that it eventually became excessive and effectively punitive for brig officials to keep him on "prevention of injury" status — a category that did not require a doctor's assent — for a 75-day period starting in November 2010, when his behavior had been stable for a lengthy period, and ending when he had an anxiety attack.And she also awarded 20 days' credit for a period beginning in April 2011 until he was transferred from Quantico later that month, when brig officials kept him on an extra-strict version of "prevention of injury" status. That included removing his underwear nightly after a comment he had laughingly made to a guard in early March that he could kill himself with its elastic band if he wanted.Finally, she awarded him 10 days' credit for a period in which brig officials allowed him just 20 minutes of exercise a day instead of the full hour other prisoners were granted.Colonel Lind's opinion also at one point discussed events reported in two articles in The New York Times in March 2011, recounting the removal of Private Manning's clothing at night: a reaction, it is now clear, to his comment about killing himself with his underwear.The first article said Private Manning had stood naked during inspection one morning in early March and cited his lawyer, David E. Coombs, as saying his client had been "forced" to do so. But Judge Lind portrayed the event as more ambiguous than an order: Private Manning, lacking clothes, had covered himself with a blanket, and a guard asked if that was how he stood at attention. He reacted by dropping the blanket.The second article, published the next day, cited a Marine brig spokesman as saying that Private Manning would be required to stand outside his cell under similar conditions each morning. But starting the next day, she found, guards began giving Private Manning his clothing back each morning before inspection, and she said there was no evidence he had stood outside his cell rather than inside it.Also on Tuesday, the judge began hearing arguments on a pair of motions by prosecutors seeking to restrict the ability of Private Manning's defense team to call witnesses and introduce other testimony related to his motivation and whether the documents were overclassified.
FORT MEADE, Md. — Military prosecutors preparing to try Pfc. Bradley Manning said on Wednesday that they would introduce evidence that Osama bin Laden requested and received from a Qaeda member some of the State Department cables and military reports that Private Manning is accused of passing to WikiLeaks .The prosecutors also said they would present logs of Internet chats in February 2010 between Private Manning and Julian Assange, the founder of WikiLeaks, including one in which the two men appeared to be "laughing" together about a New York Times article. The March 17, 2010, article said that the Pentagon had listed WikiLeaks as a threat to military operations and security.The military judge hearing the case, Col. Denise Lind, said Private Manning's trial would be postponed until at least June 3 to allow consideration of classified information that may be used. The trial is expected to take roughly six weeks.Private Manning, 25, formerly a low-level intelligence analyst in Iraq, could face a sentence of life without parole if convicted on all charges, including aiding the enemy.He is accused of the largest unauthorized disclosure of confidential documents in history, including 250,000 diplomatic cables, field reports from the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq, video footage of an American helicopter gunship killing two Reuters journalists in Iraq and government assessments of the detainees at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba.In a bid for a lower sentence, Private Manning's lawyers have said he would admit that he supplied the documents to WikiLeaks and committed certain lesser crimes. The judge had previously said some, but not all, of the offers were acceptable under military law.On Wednesday, defense lawyers adjusted their offer, saying Private Manning would be willing to admit to a list of crimes with a total maximum sentence of 20 years.If the judge finds the plea legal, prosecutors will have the option of going along with it or proceeding with a trial in an attempt to convict him on some or all of the most serious charges.The defense has said its witnesses would argue that the material Private Manning gave WikiLeaks was relatively low-grade and outdated information that could not do significant damage to national security. The prosecutors' challenge to one proposed defense witnesses, Yochai Benkler, a Harvard law professor and Internet expert, led to a revealing discussion about the nature of WikiLeaks.Colonel Lind, the judge, asked a prosecutor a hypothetical question: If Private Manning had given the documents to The New York Times rather than to WikiLeaks, would he face the same charges?The New York Times and other mainstream publications published hundreds of the documents Private Manning is accused of leaking. The Justice Department is carrying out an investigation of WikiLeaks to determine whether Mr. Assange or his associates can be charged with a crime.Media advocates say such a prosecution would be a dangerous precedent for news organizations like The Times that frequently obtain and publish information the government considers classified.
WASHINGTON — For a man who spent 12 years in the Senate, Chuck Hagel will find himself with few close allies when the Armed Services Committee takes up his nomination to be secretary of defense this month.His three closest friends from his years as a Republican senator from Nebraska, 1997 to 2009, are either no longer members or in no position to help. One is the vice president, Joseph R. Biden Jr. Another, Richard G. Lugar of Indiana, limped out of the Capitol this month after being defeated for re-election in a Republican primary.The third, Senator John Kerry, Democrat of Massachusetts, faces his own proceedings to be secretary of state.Of the senators who will ultimately sit in judgment, 42 never served a day with Mr. Hagel. The ones who remain include powerful Republicans who clashed repeatedly with him over what was the singular issue of the time: the American invasion of Iraq and its bloody aftermath.And in Washington, apostasy from within a party can leave far deeper scars than the routine clashes between the parties."The debate over the Iraq war was bitterly contentious," said Bob Kerrey, a former Democratic senator from Nebraska and, like Mr. Hagel, a Vietnam veteran. "He made friendships with Democrats and Republicans, but some of them were certainly damaged by the Iraq war debate."Even in the current political environment, a president's nominee with a Senate pedigree is supposed to have an inside track to confirmation. Mr. Kerry's confirmation is thought to be a bipartisan certainty, and his views on Iraq were no less vocal than Mr. Hagel's.But Mr. Hagel was no ordinary senator serving at an ordinary time. His outspoken, brusque style endeared him to television talk show bookers, but he was not known as a legislator or a deal maker. An intense focus on foreign policy placed him in the heart of a bipartisan foursome on the Senate Foreign Relations Committee that included Messrs. Biden and Lugar, who alternated as the panel's chairman and ranking minority member, and Mr. Kerry.But the same traits alienated the more hawkish leaders of the Senate Armed Services Committee, including a natural Republican ally, John McCain of Arizona, a Vietnam War hero, as well as Lindsey Graham, a South Carolina Republican — both of whom have come out critical of his nomination."My biggest concern is his overall attitude about the United States, our role in the world, particularly in the Middle East, and whether we should reduce the Pentagon further," Mr. McCain told CNN on Tuesday.Mr. Hagel spoke to Mr. McCain by telephone on Monday, and the two had what one aide described as a cordial conversation. They are set to have a face-to-face meeting later. Mr. McCain still considers Mr. Hagel a friend, a McCain aide said, "but they have drifted apart on a lot of issues."Republican opponents say their positions are not rooted in the personal."It's not a matter of personalities," said Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas. "Chuck Hagel is an honorable man."But supporters and some detractors say Mr. Hagel's style and interactions cannot help coloring his nomination's reception in a Senate more deeply political than the one he left four years ago."This is a person in public life prepared to offer his honest objections, to give his opinions," Mr. Lugar said, "and to do so without looking over his shoulder at potential political contributions or the people who might run a primary campaign against him, which is the overwhelming sentiment of so many today in the Senate."Hearings are likely to convene at the end of this month or in early February, and Senator Benjamin L. Cardin, a Maryland Democrat who served on the Foreign Relations Committee with Mr. Hagel for two years, said he and other senators would aggressively question him about his views on Iran and his commitment to Israel."I would be very surprised if anyone who served with him asks questions about his character," Mr. Cardin said. "The fact that I know him, the fact that I've worked with him reinforces his qualifications and independence."Ultimately, his confirmation could hinge on two men, Mr. Biden, whose advocacy will be fierce, especially with Democrats now controlling 55 Senate seats, and Mr. McCain, whom the administration still sees as winnable.The bond between Mr. Hagel and Mr. Biden was sealed in a sport utility vehicle in December 2002, according to an Obama administration official. The two men drove from Turkey to Irbil, Iraq, an eight-hour trek to assess the Kurdish leadership ahead of the coming American invasion. Once there, they spent hours at a feast with Kurdish leaders, then stayed up all night working on joint speeches after receiving unexpected invitations to address the Kurdish parliament the next day.
WASHINGTON — Fearing that Congress and the president may not reach a deal on spending and the deficit, the Pentagon's leadership is freezing civilian hiring, limiting maintenance work and delaying approval of some contracts.The money-saving steps, announced Thursday by Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta, are designed to be reversible should a compromise be reached to avoid automatic reductions in federal spending set to begin in March. The Pentagon's share could be up to $500 billion in cuts over 10 years.To prepare for "this extraordinary budget uncertainty that we're confronting, the leadership of this department has decided that it must begin to take steps in the coming weeks that would reduce the potential damage that we would face should Congress fail to act to prevent the cuts," Mr. Panetta said.Specific steps were outlined in a memo distributed across the military and civilian departments and signed by Ashton Carter, the deputy defense secretary, and included curtailing nonessential travel, training and conferences.The effort is designed to not degrade the war effort in Afghanistan. Services for families of military personnel also were protected, even as the military and civilian departments were ordered to continue planning for even deeper cuts."Sequestration is a self-inflicted wound on national security," said Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, using the technical term for automatic cuts. "It's an irresponsible way to manage our nation's defense. It cuts blindly and it cuts bluntly. It compounds risk, and it compromises readiness."
John McCain and Chuck Hagel traveled the world together, popped into each other's neighboring offices on Capitol Hill and played pranks. Mr. Hagel, then a Republican senator from Nebraska, dropped by one Halloween wearing a McCain mask. Mr. McCain, an Arizona Republican, liked to jokingly fire Mr. Hagel's staff. "Pack up your desks!" he would say. As Vietnam War veterans — Mr. McCain had been a naval officer and a pilot, Mr. Hagel an enlisted infantryman — they forged an even closer bond."John would call him sergeant — 'Hey, Sergeant, come in, Sergeant!' " said Senator Lindsey Graham, the South Carolina Republican who is Mr. McCain's closest friend in Washington. "They would salute each other."But as Mr. Hagel heads into contentious confirmation hearings to be President Obama's secretary of defense, the two remain estranged over policy differences that started with the Iraq War, spread into bitter presidential politics and ultimately damaged, if not ended, a friendship. Some colleagues say the break between two stubborn iconoclasts has been exaggerated in the absolutist world of the capital, but no one disputes that the relationship has cooled dramatically."The Iraq war is where the policy differences became pretty difficult to deal with," said Mr. Graham, speaking of Mr. McCain's aggressive push for the 2007 surge of American forces in Iraq and Mr. Hagel's unsuccessful fight against that escalation. "The worldview really began to diverge."The differences were on full display when Mr. McCain released a statement after Mr. Hagel was nominated on Monday saying he had "serious concerns" about the positions on national security Mr. Hagel had taken over the years. The two spoke the same day by phone in what an aide called a cordial conversation — one of at least 30 calls to senators Mr. Hagel has made this week in preparation for his hearing — but on Tuesday on CNN Mr. McCain had not changed his tone.While "the friendship, I hope, is still there," Mr. McCain said, he remained worried about Mr. Hagel's "overall attitude about the United States, our role in the world, particularly in the Middle East, and whether we should reduce the Pentagon further."People who know both men say that at this point Mr. Hagel appears to have the votes for confirmation and that in the end Mr. McCain could well vote yes for the friend who was at his side during his unsuccessful 2000 campaign for the Republican presidential nomination. But aides to both acknowledge the dynamic on Capitol Hill could change and that Mr. McCain — and others — will give Mr. Hagel a rough time. At the very least, they say, Mr. McCain remains bruised over Mr. Hagel's decision not to support Mr. McCain when he became the Republican presidential nominee in 2008, and over a trip Mr. Hagel took with Mr. Obama to Iraq the same year."He was very angry about it," said one of Mr. McCain's 2008 advisers, who asked not to be identified discussing the complicated dynamics between the two. Mr. McCain "takes policy disputes very, very personally," the adviser added. He described Mr. McCain's current view of Mr. Hagel as one of "profound disappointment."Mr. McCain, 76, the son and grandson of admirals, and Mr. Hagel, 66, the son of a lumberyard worker who drank heavily and died when Mr. Hagel was in high school, first became political pals in 1996, when Mr. Hagel was running for the first time for the Senate.Mr. McCain, who by then had been in the Senate nearly a decade and was nationally known, campaigned frequently for his fellow Vietnam veteran in Nebraska, much to the gratitude of Mr. Hagel and his staff. The two had similar personality traits: a sense of humor, brashness, bullheadedness and an aversion to Republican orthodoxy and hierarchy. By 2000, Mr. Hagel had returned the favor to become national co-chairman of Mr. McCain's presidential campaign.
WASHINGTON — In what could be a crucial moment in the Obama administration's efforts to advance the nomination of former Senator Chuck Hagel as secretary of defense, he will meet this week with Senator Charles E. Schumer , the most influential Jewish member of the Senate, who is expected to press Mr. Hagel on issues concerning Iran and Israel.Mr. Schumer, Democrat of New York, will be among the first senators to meet with Mr. Hagel since his nomination last week. Mr. Schumer has told aides and other senators that he could be persuaded to support Mr. Hagel depending on the meeting's outcome. Mr. Hagel's nomination has been met with suspicion, and even outright hostility, among Republicans and Democrats who are strongly aligned with Jewish groups.Mr. Schumer plans to ask Mr. Hagel to clarify and in some ways recant statements about Iran and Israel, according to a person with knowledge of the senator's plans for the meeting. Mr. Schumer also intends to press Mr. Hagel about conservative views he has expressed on gay rights and abortion. Other Democrats are likely to take their cues about the nomination from Mr. Schumer, who is the No. 3 Democrat in the Senate and has strong ties to pro-Israel groups.Of deepest concern to Mr. Schumer, reflecting the anxiety of many Israel advocacy groups, are Mr. Hagel's positions on the nuclear threat posed by Iran, according to the person with knowledge of the senator's plans. Mr. Hagel has said a military strike against Iran would be counterproductive.But Mr. Hagel got a resounding vote of support on Sunday from a fellow Republican moderate, Colin L. Powell, the former secretary of state, who said on the NBC News program "Meet the Press" that Mr. Hagel was "superbly qualified.""First, I think he's had a very, very distinguished public service record that he can stand on," Mr. Powell said. "There are a lot of comments about different things he said over the years, and I think he'll have a chance to respond to all those comments at the confirmation hearings."Another Republican, Senator Bob Corker of Tennessee, said on the ABC News program "This Week" that he had questions about Mr. Hagel's "overall temperament."Mr. Schumer is also suspicious of comments by Mr. Hagel that seem to support a strategy of containment, in which the United States would accept Iran's development of a nuclear weapon while seeking to prevent a nuclear arms race in the Middle East.Mr. Hagel might need to fully reject that strategy in order to bring his position in line with President Obama's and Mr. Schumer's. During his race against Mitt Romney last year, Mr. Obama took a more forceful position against Iran.As a senator from Nebraska, Mr. Hagel voted against several rounds of sanctions against Iran that ultimately passed the Senate. Mr. Hagel has said unilateral sanctions are ineffective, a position that is out of step with the Obama administration's thinking. But in recent weeks, Mr. Hagel has sounded more hawkish about Iran in meetings with administration officials.Mr. Hagel's views on the militant Islamist groups Hezbollah and Hamas have also become issues. He was among only a handful of senators who declined to sign a letter to the European Union calling for the designation of Hezbollah as a terrorist organization.Mr. Hagel has since said he does not believe in sending letters to foreign governments. He has also supported direct negotiations between the United States and Hamas, which governs Gaza.Mr. Schumer will seek reassurances that Mr. Hagel now considers Hezbollah and Hamas to be terrorist groups, the person familiar with his plans said.Mr. Schumer is also expected to ask Mr. Hagel about his disparaging statements about gay people — remarks he has since apologized for — and his views on abortion, particularly his opposition to allowing abortions for women in the military who have been raped, a position that has upset some Democratic women in the Senate.Although Mr. Schumer said Mr. Obama should have discretion over appointments to his cabinet, people close to the senator said his concerns would need to be put to rest before he would support Mr. Hagel's nomination.Jewish groups that have met with Mr. Schumer have expressed reservations about openly opposing Mr. Hagel's nomination for fear of inflaming their tensions with the Obama administration and deepening difficulties between the United States and Israel. Further, it would be a major break with the Obama administration for Mr. Schumer to oppose him.On Sunday, Mr. Hagel continued to draw criticism from conservatives who share Mr. Schumer's worries about Israel and Iran and have lingering concerns about Mr. Hagel's criticisms of the Bush administration's execution of the Iraq war.Senator John McCain of Arizona said on "Face the Nation" that Mr. Hagel's early opposition to the troop surge in Iraq was "bizarre." Mr. McCain is the ranking Republican on the Armed Services Committee, which will conduct Mr. Hagel's confirmation hearing.
Wal-Mart , the nation's largest retailer, will announce Tuesday a plan to hire every veteran who wants a job, provided that the veterans have left the military in the previous year and did not receive a dishonorable discharge.The announcement, to be made in a speech in New York by William S. Simon, the president and chief executive of Wal-Mart U.S., represents among the largest hiring commitments for veterans in history.Company officials said they believe the program, which will officially begin on Memorial Day — May 27 this year — will lead to the hiring of more than 100,000 people in the next five years, the length of the commitment."Let's be clear: Hiring a veteran can be one of the best decisions any of us can make," Mr. Simon will say in his keynote speech to the National Retail Federation, according to prepared text. "These are leaders with discipline, training and a passion for service."In a statement, the first lady, Michelle Obama, who has led a campaign by the White House to encourage businesses to hire veterans, called the Wal-Mart plan "historic," adding that she planned to urge other corporations to follow suit."We all believe that no one who serves our country should have to fight for a job once they return home," Mrs. Obama said in the statement. "Wal-Mart is setting a groundbreaking example for the private sector to follow."The unemployment rate for veterans of the recent wars has remained stubbornly above that for nonveterans, though it has been falling steadily, dropping to just below 10 percent for all of 2012. That was down from 12.1 percent the year before. The year-end unemployment rate for nonveterans was 7.9 percent in 2012.Reducing the veteran unemployment rate was among the few veterans' issues discussed by the presidential candidates last year. It has also been central to the work of Mrs. Obama's campaign to assist veterans and military families, Joining Forces. Last August, her office said that private companies working with Joining Forces had hired or trained 125,000 veterans or their spouses in a single year, surpassing the group's goal of 100,000 a full year early.Wal-Mart's foundation has consistently been among the most generous contributors to veterans' charities, committing to donate $20 million to veterans' causes by 2015. "I take this one personally," Mr. Simon, a Navy veteran, says in his prepared text.But the company has also been aggressive about hiring veterans because it views them as good employees, said Nelson Lichtenstein, a labor historian at the University of California, Santa Barbara, and the author of the book "The Retail Revolution: How Wal-Mart Created a Brave New World of Business."About 100,000 of the company's 1.4 million employees in the United States are veterans, company officials said."They like military people because they have a sense of hierarchy and a commitment to the organization they are in," said Professor Lichtenstein, who has been a critic of Wal-Mart's management practices. "And that's important to Wal-Mart." In recent years, Wal-Mart has been the target of lawsuits by women, accusing the company of discrimination in salaries and promotions.Gary Profit, a retired Army brigadier general who is senior director of military programs at Wal-Mart, said the company might not be able to guarantee that every veteran who wants a full-time job will be able to get one. But he said that because of the size of Wal-Mart's retail operation and supply chain, it is almost certain that the company could find a job — even a part-time one — close to any veteran who wanted one."If you're a veteran and you want a job in the retail industry, you have a place at Wal-Mart," he said.
FORT MEADE, Md. — When he was hired in 2010 to defend Pfc. Bradley Manning , David E. Coombs was handed the most daunting of challenges.Private Manning, it turned out, had admitted on Internet chat logs to taking thousands of confidential government documents from his computer in Iraq and delivering them to WikiLeaks, the antisecrecy organization. Furious military and State Department officials spoke of grave damage to national security and danger to people named in the documents. Members of Congress muttered about treason and the death penalty.More than two and a half years later, Mr. Coombs, 43, is deep into one of the most high-profile American military cases in recent years, leading an aggressive, if unorthodox, defense. In weeks of pretrial hearings, the tall, crew-cut lawyer, flanked by uniformed military lawyers who make up the rest of the defense team, has attacked the government's case on every conceivable ground, even as he conceded that Private Manning was the WikiLeaks source.Mr. Coombs, a lieutenant colonel in the Army Reserve, served 12 years in the Army before leaving active duty and opening a military-oriented defense practice in 2009 in Providence, R.I. He has worked, both in court and in a public speech last month, to frame Private Manning's disclosure of documents not as a reckless act of national security vandalism but as a deed of conscience, intended to expose government misdeeds and defend the public's right to know.But on Wednesday, the military judge in the case, Col. Denise Lind of the Army, ruled that the defense could not present evidence of Private Manning's political motives at trial.Mr. Coombs did win a modest victory when the judge ruled that Private Manning, who is charged with "aiding the enemy," could try to show that he did not know that in passing government documents to WikiLeaks he was indirectly providing them via the Web to Al Qaeda. Some were found on Osama bin Laden's computer.She also ruled that Private Manning could argue that he was selective in choosing the 700,000 documents he is accused of releasing and that a reasonable person would not have reason to believe that the leaked material would harm the United States.The ruling will prevent the defense from making a sweeping claim that Private Manning's acts were in the public interest — an argument that Mr. Coombs hinted at in his only public remarks, to an enthusiastic crowd at a Washington church in early December."It's a case that has significance for all of us," Mr. Coombs said then. "We live in a country that is built on freedom of speech. We live in a country that is built on government accountability and informed citizens."In earlier proceedings, Mr. Coombs battled the military authorities over Private Manning's treatment in a military jail at Quantico, Va., and turned the decision to strip him of clothing at night into a pretrial issue. The result was modest: the judge agreed that the treatment was improper but ordered only 112 days deducted from any future sentence.A brainy intelligence analyst of slight build who felt misplaced in the military, Private Manning struggled with issues of gender and sexuality. But in the chat logs, he suggested that he was disclosing the documents because of concerns about the legality and ethics of the Iraq war and other American government actions. He has been embraced since his arrest as a whistle-blower and hero by many on the political left, including Daniel Ellsberg, who leaked the Pentagon Papers four decades ago."I think Coombs is doing an amazing job," said Emma Cape, 26, one of four full-time employees of the Bradley Manning Support Network, which has raised the money to pay Mr. Coombs and campaign for his client.In weeks of pretrial hearings, Ms. Cape said, she has come to admire Mr. Coombs's dedication, recalling how court-watchers learned at the end of a 10-hour day last fall that it was Mr. Coombs's wedding anniversary. A Manning supporter rushed out for roses and a card for the lawyer and his wife, Tanya J. Monestier, a law professor who sometimes attends court sessions.In calling witness after witness to expose Private Manning's mistreatment at Quantico, "Coombs created a compelling narrative," Ms. Cape said. She called the lawyer "incredibly warm to the people who come to court day after day."But several veteran military defense lawyers said they were baffled by some elements of Mr. Coombs's approach. In particular, they wonder why he has stated in court that Private Manning is prepared to plead guilty to a list of crimes that carry a total maximum sentence of 20 years. The list consists of lesser versions of the full charges, which could send the soldier to prison for life without parole."I've never seen it before," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale. "Plea negotiations are not conducted in public."Gary Myers, a military defense lawyer for 45 years, commended Mr. Coombs's "creative thinking" but expressed similar puzzlement about the unilateral offer of a guilty plea.Mr. Coombs did not respond to questions about his strategy. Most legal experts expect the case to be resolved with a guilty plea, but a trial is now scheduled for June 3.In court on Wednesday, Mr. Coombs argued that the government had violated his client's right to a speedy trial. Prosecutors argued that even during periods of "apparent inactivity," they were working away on a very complex case, sending hundreds of e-mails and studying the law.Outside, near the gate to Fort Meade, pro-Manning protesters displayed the time elapsed since Private Manning's arrest: 964 days.
SANFORD, N. C. — Nakisha Hardy spent the first nine months of her marriage on a remote Army base in Afghanistan, a tour of duty punctuated by sporadic mortar blasts and constant e-mails to her spouse back home.The strains of that separation lingered even after First Lt. Hardy returned to Fort Bragg in September. So she signed up for a military retreat to help soldiers and their husbands and wives cope with the pressures of deployments and relocations.But less than 24 hours after arriving at the retreat, she and her spouse were told to leave. The military chaplains who organized the program last month said that the couple was making others uncomfortable. They said they had determined that under federal law the program could serve only heterosexual married couples.Lieutenant Hardy is a lesbian in a same-sex marriage who had hoped that the repeal of "Don't Ask, Don't Tell" in 2011 would allow her to fully participate in military life. But she and many other gay and bisexual service members say they continue to encounter a raft of rules and regulations barring them from receiving benefits and privileges routinely accorded to heterosexual service members.Lieutenant Hardy had been assured by the chaplain's office in the weeks before the retreat that she and her wife were welcome to attend. The chaplains said in hindsight that those assurances were given in error."I felt hurt, humiliated," said Lieutenant Hardy, 28. "These were people I had been deployed with. And they were telling me I can go to fight the war on terrorism with them, but I can't attend a seminar with them to keep my marriage healthy."Gay marriage is now legal in nine states and in Washington, D.C. But because same-sex marriages are not recognized under federal law, the spouses of gay service members are barred from receiving medical and dental insurance and surviving spouse benefits and are not allowed to receive treatment in military medical facilities. Spouses are also barred from receiving military identification cards, which provide access to many community activities and services on base, including movie theaters, day care centers, gyms and commissaries.Gay service members who are married are not permitted to receive discounted housing that is routinely provided to heterosexual married couples.The disparities have galvanized some married service members and their spouses to fire off angry letters to members of Congress, to blog about their experiences and to demand meetings with their commanders to protest their treatment.Advocacy groups, including the American Military Partner Association and OutServe-SLDN, are pressing lawmakers and Pentagon officials to rectify the situation.Meanwhile, military commanders are struggling to navigate the new terrain, sorting through rules and regulations to determine what is permissible and what is not. No longer forced to hide their sexuality, some soldiers are prodding their leaders to rethink the status quo."Commanders are in a challenging environment right now," said Tammy Schultz, director of the national security and joint warfare program at the Marine Corps War College, and the co-editor of "The End of Don't Ask, Don't Tell: The Impact in Studies and Personal Essays by Service Members and Veterans.""You've got these dueling regulations going on for different segments of the population based on sexual orientation," Ms. Schultz said.This month, Chuck Hagel, President Obama's nominee for defense secretary, vowed to change that. Mr. Hagel, who has been criticized for making disparaging comments about a gay diplomat 14 years ago, pledged to "do everything possible to the extent permissible under current law to provide equal benefits to the families of all our service members."He outlined his position in a letter to Senator Barbara Boxer, the California Democrat.Some of the restrictions stem from the Defense of Marriage Act of 1996, which denies legally married same-sex couples the same federal benefits afforded to heterosexual couples.
WASHINGTON — A Defense Department inquiry into potentially inappropriate e-mails between Gen. John R. Allen , the American commander in Afghanistan, and a socialite in Tampa, Fla., has cleared him of wrongdoing, senior Pentagon officials disclosed Tuesday.The Pentagon inspector general wrote to General Allen in Kabul to inform him that the investigation had found no improprieties in the e-mail communications with the socialite, Jill Kelley, officials said.General Allen maintained all along that he had done nothing wrong, and his supporters said the e-mails had neither violated security nor represented an improper relationship with Ms. Kelley, who frequently hosted social events for senior officers assigned to the military's Central Command headquarters in Tampa.But the number of e-mails, and what some feared was inappropriate tone or language in the messages, prompted the Pentagon's top lawyer to recommend that Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta refer the matter to the inspector general.Pentagon officials were no doubt cognizant of the context in which the e-mails had been uncovered — as part of the discovery of an extramarital affair that ended the public career of David H. Petraeus, a retired four-star general who was then in charge of the C.I.A.On Wednesday, General Allen broke a long silence on the investigation, releasing a statement in Kabul through his spokesman, Maj. David Nevers. "From the outset, the general placed his faith in — and fully supported — the investigative process," Major Nevers said. "He's obviously pleased by the outcome.  But more critically, he is grateful for the support he received throughout this process from his chain of command, friends, family and colleagues."Late Tuesday, George Little, the Pentagon press secretary, released a statement confirming that Mr. Panetta had been officially informed that the inspector general closed the investigation into General Allen."The secretary was pleased to learn that allegations of professional misconduct were not substantiated by the investigation," Mr. Little said. "The secretary has complete confidence in the continued leadership of General Allen, who is serving with distinction in Afghanistan."The inquiry was seen as a significant burden on General Allen as he ended his tenure in Afghanistan with the charge to begin drafting proposals for President Obama on how to draw down American forces there this year and end the combat mission by the end of 2014.Although the exact content of the e-mails remains unknown, an official conclusion of no wrongdoing will no doubt be seen as a professional and personal exoneration for General Allen after an embarrassing period near the end of a highly respected Marine Corps career.The F.B.I. discovered the e-mails during an investigation into anonymous e-mails to Ms. Kelley. Those messages, which warned her to stay away from Mr. Petraeus, had been sent by Paula Broadwell, Mr. Petraeus's biographer. Mr. Petraeus admitted to having had an affair with Ms. Broadwell and resigned from the C.I.A. on Nov. 9. The F.B.I. sent the e-mails between General Allen and Ms. Kelley to the Pentagon on Nov. 11.Like General Allen, Mr. Petraeus was a social acquaintance of Ms. Kelley's when he was stationed at MacDill Air Force Base in Tampa, the headquarters of Central Command.The inspector general's finding, which was not wholly unexpected, was first reported Tuesday on the Web site of The Washington Post.What remains unknown is the fate of General Allen's nomination to become the top NATO commander, which was planned before the disclosure of the e-mails. He could be nominated to that position or to another senior post — or he could retire."The final decision has not yet been made on General Allen's nomination," one senior official said.During the inquiry, about 15 investigators on the Pentagon inspector general's staff focused on 60 to 70 e-mails that "bear a fair amount of scrutiny," said one official who was briefed on the inquiry.Pentagon officials had described the messages between General Allen and Ms. Kelley as potentially "inappropriate communication." Law enforcement officials said the e-mails numbered in the hundreds and covered two and a half years starting in 2010, when General Allen was the deputy commander of Central Command.The inspector general's inquiry looked into whether the e-mails violated Defense Department policy, government regulations or military law. The questions included whether the e-mails contained inappropriate language that was on a government computer, whether they indicated an inappropriate relationship as defined under military law, whether they involved more than an incidental use of government property for personal matters and whether there were security breaches.Gen. Joseph F. Dunford Jr. has been confirmed by the Senate to succeed General Allen as part of a standard rotation and is expected to take up the senior command position in Kabul in the coming weeks.
WASHINGTON — For President Obama , the first test of his second term passed peacefully on Tuesday as his nominee for defense secretary, Chuck Hagel , sat down with the Republican who poses one of his biggest potential hurdles to Senate confirmation, Senator John McCain of Arizona.By all accounts, the 45-minute one-on-one meeting went well enough for the White House to feel that it has finally turned the tide in favor of Mr. Hagel, whose positions on Israel and Iran have drawn heavy fire from conservatives, pro-Israel groups and other critics.While Mr. McCain did not say how he would vote on Mr. Hagel, he told reporters that he would reserve judgment until after Mr. Hagel's confirmation hearing on Jan. 31. And Mr. McCain characterized the meeting as a "frank and candid" exchange between two "old friends."That was enough for administration officials, one of whom said the meeting was a "very positive sign about the trajectory of things." Mr. Hagel, who is running a gantlet of meetings, also won a positive response from Senator Angus King, the newly elected independent from Maine.Mr. Obama's inauguration marked the beginning of the next phase in his campaign to install a new national security team. This week, John O. Brennan, his choice to be director of the Central Intelligence Agency, will begin meeting with senators, some of whom have raised questions about the administration's policy on the targeted killing of terrorist suspects.On Thursday, Senator John Kerry, the Massachusetts Democrat whom Mr. Obama selected to succeed Hillary Rodham Clinton as secretary of state, is expected to breeze through his hearing before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, which he still leads.Mr. Hagel is still likely to face tough questioning from the Senate Armed Services Committee. He and Mr. McCain, once close friends with the shared experience of being Vietnam veterans, became estranged because of differences over the Iraq war and how to deal with Iran. Mr. McCain left little doubt that he raised those issues in their meeting and would do so again during the committee's hearing.But White House officials say they are increasingly sanguine that Mr. Hagel will prevail. Democratic senators have largely fallen into line since he won the blessing of Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, the most influential Jewish member of the Senate.Mr. Schumer's endorsement was viewed as crucial by the White House because it allayed concerns among Democrats about Mr. Hagel's positions on Israel and his use of the phrase "Jewish lobby" to refer to pro-Israel lobbying groups. On Friday, Mr. Hagel met with several Jewish groups, including the American Israel Public Affairs Committee and the Anti-Defamation League, to try to ease their concerns.Privately, administration officials figure that Mr. Hagel could get as many as 60 votes, a threshold that would allow him to overcome a filibuster. Even if the vote ends up shy of 60, Congressional aides said, it is not clear that Republicans will try to block his confirmation, especially if Mr. McCain does not stake out a strong position against him.When Mr. Obama signed papers formally nominating Mr. Hagel, Mr. Kerry and Mr. Brennan after his Inaugural Address on Monday, he said, "I'm sending a few nominations up, which I know will be handled with great dispatch." Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. chuckled softly, as Republican Congressional leaders looked on silently.In his recent meetings on Capitol Hill, officials said, Mr. Hagel has sounded a more hawkish tone on issues like American sanctions on Iran, about which he had once been skeptical."If he has answers for members who have concerns about his past statements," said Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine, who met with Mr. Hagel last week, "then I think the chances of his being confirmed will become fairly strong."Aside from his Senate meetings, Mr. Hagel has kept a low profile in recent days. He did not attend the inauguration or Mr. Biden's swearing-in ceremony on Sunday, despite having a seat reserved for him (a logistical mix-up, an official said, since he had decided to stay home to prepare for his confirmation).With Mr. Hagel's prospects improving, some analysts say the nominee to watch is Mr. Brennan, whom Mr. Obama has chosen as a permanent replacement for David H. Petraeus at the C.I.A., who resigned in November after admitting to an extramarital affair.Shortly after Mr. Brennan's nomination was announced, he began encountering resistance from Republicans concerned by what they said were national security leaks after the raid that killed Osama bin Laden.Now, though, Mr. Brennan is facing questions from Democrats over the use of drone strikes and the killing of American citizens in counterterrorism operations — decisions in which he was deeply immersed as the counterterrorism adviser in the White House.Last week, Senator Ron Wyden of Oregon, a Democrat on the Intelligence Committee, wrote to Mr. Brennan, demanding that lawmakers be allowed to review the Justice Department's legal opinion on assassinations, including that of Anwar al-Awlaki, the American-born cleric who was killed in a drone strike in Yemen in 2011.The White House has fought to keep these opinions secret. Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California and the chairwoman of the Intelligence Committee, has also called on the administration to release the legal opinion in the Awlaki case. She is likely to raise it in Mr. Brennan's confirmation hearing, which is scheduled for Feb. 7.The only nominee who seems likely to have a trouble-free experience is Mr. Kerry. Unlike Mr. Hagel, Mr. Kerry was a visible presence at the Capitol on Monday, shaking hands with Mr. Obama after his speech and chatting later with former President Bill Clinton.Mr. Kerry's hearing, in fact, may seem anticlimactic, coming the day after Mrs. Clinton's long-awaited Congressional testimony on the deadly attack on the American Mission in Benghazi, Libya. She will testify on Wednesday before both the Senate and House.Mr. McCain, perhaps trying to inject some drama into Mr. Kerry's hearing, joked Tuesday that the Senate would subject him to "waterboarding" to get the truth out of him.
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta is lifting the military's official ban on women in combat, which will open up hundreds of thousands of additional front-line jobs to them, senior defense officials said Wednesday.The groundbreaking decision overturns a 1994 Pentagon rule that restricts women from artillery, armor, infantry and other such combat roles, even though in reality women have frequently found themselves in combat in Iraq and Afghanistan; according to the Pentagon, hundreds of thousands of women have deployed in those conflicts. As of last year, more than 800 women had been wounded in the two wars and more than 130 had died.Defense officials offered few details about Mr. Panetta's decision but described it as the beginning of a process to allow the branches of the military to put the change into effect. Defense officials said Mr. Panetta had made the decision on the recommendation of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.Women have long chafed under the combat restrictions and have increasingly pressured the Pentagon to catch up with the reality on the battlefield. The move comes as Mr. Panetta is about to step down from his post and would leave him with a major legacy after only 18 months in the job.The decision clearly fits into the broad and ambitious liberal agenda, especially around matters of equal opportunity, that President Obama laid out this week in his Inaugural Address. But while it had to have been approved by him, and does not require action by Congress, it appeared Wednesday that it was in large part driven by the military itself. Some midlevel White House staff members were caught by surprise by the decision, indicating that it had not gone through an extensive review there.Mr. Panetta's decision came after he received a Jan. 9 letter from Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, who stated in strong terms that the armed service chiefs all agreed that "the time has come to rescind the direct combat exclusion rule for women and to eliminate all unnecessary gender-based barriers to service."A military official said the change would be implemented "as quickly as possible," although the Pentagon is allowing three years, until January 2016, for final decisions from the services.Each branch of the military will have to come up with an implementation plan in the next several months, the official said. If a branch of the military decides that a specific job should not be opened to a woman, representatives of that branch will have to ask the defense secretary for an exception."To implement these initiatives successfully and without sacrificing our war-fighting capability or the trust of the American people, we will need time to get it right," General Dempsey wrote.It will be carried out during what the administration describes as the end of the American combat role in Afghanistan, the nation's longest war.A copy of General Dempsey's letter was provided by a Pentagon official under the condition of anonymity.The letter noted that this action was meant to ensure that women as well as men "are given the opportunity to succeed."It was unclear why the Joint Chiefs acted now after examining the issue for years, although in recent months there has been building pressure from high-profile lawsuits.In November 2012 the American Civil Liberties Union filed a federal lawsuit challenging the ban on behalf of four service women and the Service Women's Action Network, a group that works for equality in the military. The A.C.L.U. said that one of the plaintiffs, Maj. Mary Jennings Hegar, an Air National Guard helicopter pilot, was shot down, returned fire and was wounded while on the ground in Afghanistan, but could not seek combat leadership positions because the Defense Department did not officially acknowledge her experience as combat.In the military, serving in combat positions like the infantry remains crucial to career advancement. Women have long said that by not recognizing their real service, the military has unfairly held them back.
WASHINGTON — A weak command structure and a climate of fear among female personnel created the conditions that led to widespread instances of sexual assault of Air Force recruits by their instructors at Lackland Air Force Base in Texas, senior Air Force commanders said Wednesday.On the eve of a Pentagon announcement that it will lift the ban on women in combat, Gen. Mark A. Welsh III, the Air Force chief of staff, told the House Armed Services Committee that there was poor oversight of instructors at the Air Force's version of boot camp at Lackland, and acknowledged that "weaknesses developed in each one of our institutional safeguards" that led to a poisonous culture in which the instructors believed they could easily get away with repeatedly preying on young woman recruits.The Lackland case, allegedly involving 32 instructors who took advantage of their power over as many as 59 recruits, is one of the largest sex scandals in the military since the Tailhook episode of the early 1990s, and has come at a time when the problems of sexual assault, harassment and abuse have become major issues for the military.Last year, Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta acknowledged that the number of sexual assaults in the military is probably far higher than official statistics have shown.At least two of the instructors at Lackland allegedly had sexual encounters with 10 different recruits each. The instructors took advantage of teenage recruits, who were just entering the Air Force and who had already been told to obey any orders from their instructors. In some cases, the recruits were ordered by instructors to go to a closet, where they were then molested by the instructors.General Welsh said the biggest problem faced by the military in dealing with sexual assaults and abuse has been the reluctance of women to report attacks and instances of harassment, for fear of reprisals. Gen. Edward A. Rice Jr., commander of the Air Education and Training Command, told the committee that only "a handful" of the 59 victims had come forward to the Air Force to report the assaults."Why, on the worst day of their life, don't they come forward?" asked General Welsh. "That's the heart of the problem. People don't feel comfortable coming forward, and they do not routinely report either sexual assault or sexual harassment, and that is one of the biggest problems we have."Both General Welsh and General Rice acknowledged that one problem is that Air Force commanders have discretion in deciding whether to include episodes of sexual harassment on the service records of Air Force personnel. They said it was possible for people to be transferred from one base to another without any record of instances of sexual harassment to be noted.Wednesday's hearing came after a petition drive that gathered 10,000 signatures demanding that Congress examine the Lackland episodes and an announcement last week by the Air Force that it had just completed an inspection of all of its bases and found widespread evidence that pornographic and other inappropriate materials were on display in work spaces throughout the service."The Invisible War," a documentary about rape and sexual assault in the military that was recently nominated for an Oscar in the documentary feature category, has been credited with both persuading more women to come forward to report abuse and with forcing the military to deal more openly with the problem.In November, General Welsh met with all of the Air Force's wing commanders and had them watch the film with him, according to an Air Force spokesman.
WASHINGTON — The historic decision to lift the military's ban on women in combat had its roots in the personal experiences in war zones of Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey , the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, both men said on Thursday. For General Dempsey, it all began in Baghdad.He had just arrived there in 2003 as a division commander, he said at a Pentagon news conference, when he clambered aboard a Humvee and asked the driver where he was from. "And I slapped the turret gunner on the leg and I said, 'Who are you?' " General Dempsey recalled. "And she leaned down and said, 'I'm Amanda.' "As people chortled, General Dempsey continued: "And I said, 'Oh, O.K.' So a female turret gunner is protecting a division commander. And it's from that point on that I realized something had changed, and it was time to do something about it."Almost a decade later, General Dempsey and Mr. Panetta signed a document formally rescinding a 1994 ban that restricted women from infantry, artillery, armor and other such combat roles. "Not everyone is going to be able to be a combat soldier," Mr. Panetta said, "but everyone is entitled to a chance."Mr. Panetta said his thinking evolved as he traveled over the past 18 months as defense secretary to Iraq and Afghanistan and across the United States speaking to women who had served. "It's been almost 50 years since I served in the military," he said, referring to his two years as an Army intelligence officer. "And to go out now and to see women performing the roles that they are performing and doing a great job at it, I think it just encouraged me, and I think it encouraged all of us that everybody should have a chance to perform at any mission, if they can meet the qualifications."An aide to Mr. Panetta recalled that the defense secretary had talked extensively with a female V-22 Osprey pilot about her experiences in war zones when she flew him to visit a military ship off the coast of California. He also visited a military policewoman at Brooke Army Medical Center in San Antonio who had been shot in Afghanistan guarding a forward operating base."When I've gone to Arlington to bury our dead, there is no distinction that's made between the sacrifices of men and women in uniform," Mr. Panetta said. "They serve, they're wounded and they die right next to each other."Both he and General Dempsey said the new policy was in many ways an affirmation of what they had seen was already occurring on the battlefield, where women have frequently found themselves in combat over the past decade of war in Iraq and Afghanistan — although not officially recognized for it, and therefore held back in a military in which combat experience is crucial to advancement. Mr. Panetta and General Dempsey said it was essential that the military offer equal opportunities to women and men."They're fighting and they're dying together, and the time has come for our policies to reflect that reality," Mr. Panetta said.Mr. Panetta and General Dempsey said they had met weekly for more than a year about lifting the ban and had kept President Obama informed about developments. In December, Pentagon officials said, Mr. Panetta and the Joint Chiefs reached a tentative agreement that women should be permitted in combat. Mr. Panetta thought about it over the holidays and returned early this month to receive a letter from General Dempsey dated Jan. 9 strongly recommending the change.They described the president as supportive but not intimately involved in the process. In a statement on Thursday, Mr. Obama said the change reflected "the courageous and patriotic service of women through more than two centuries of American history and the indispensable role of women in today's military."And while they described the decision as reflecting a consensus in the Pentagon, the move still has opponents. In the most vocal official opposition to the changes, Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, who is set to become the senior Republican on the Armed Services Committee, warned that some in Congress may seek legislation to limit the combat jobs open to women.
During her second deployment to Iraq, Staff Sgt. Stacy Pearsall of the Air Force found herself attached to an Army ground unit that was clearing roadside bombs. They had just found their 26th device of the day when one of their armored personnel carriers exploded. An ambush was on.The chaos that unfolded over the next few hours was not a typical day for Sergeant Pearsall. But under the Pentagon's decision to allow women into front-line combat units, officially announced Thursday, it could become much closer to the norm for women in American uniforms.As Sergeant Pearsall tells the story, her vehicle came under intense fire that day in 2007, near the city of Baquba. The male soldiers in her carrier had already dashed out to join the fight, so she jumped onto the machine gun and began returning fire.Outside a soldier lay unconscious. Sergeant Pearsall opened the rear door and crawled to the man, who was 6-foot-2 and more than 200 pounds, twice her weight. From behind him, she clasped him in a bear hug and dragged him toward the vehicle. She fell once, then again. Somehow, she hauled him into the armored safety of the carrier.After tearing off his protective vest, she realized his carotid artery had been torn by shrapnel. As blood spurted all over, she closed her eyes, stuck her fingers into his neck and squeezed. He screamed, and she thanked the heavens. He was still kicking.What happened next seemed almost cinematic. Emerging from a purplish haze outside, a medic jumped into the carrier and set his kit beside her. "Are you a medic?" he asked.The question that now looms over the Pentagon as it moves toward full gender integration is whether female service members like Sergeant Pearsall, for all their bravery under fire, can perform the same dangerous and physically demanding tasks day in and day out, for weeks at a time, as permanent members of ground combat units like the infantry or armored cavalry.Since 1994, women have technically been barred from serving in those front-line units. But throughout the post-9/11 wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, women — working as medics, intelligence officers, photographers, military police officers and in a host of other jobs — have been routinely "attached" to all-male ground combat units, where they have come under fire, returned fire, been wounded and been killed.To supporters of Secretary of Defense Leon E. Panetta's decision to rescind the prohibition on women in combat, the experiences of those women proved that the distinction between being "attached" to a combat unit and actually serving in one was outdated, and pointless."When the military goes to full integration, it allows commanders to put the best person in the job, not just the best man," said Greg Jacob, a former Marine Corps officer who is now policy director for the Service Women's Action Network, an advocacy group for women in the military. "If the best shot in the platoon is a woman, I can make her a sniper. But until now, I couldn't do that."But to skeptics of the policy change, it is one thing for women to perform well when they come under fire while temporarily attached to all-male combat units. It is a far different thing, they argue, to carry out the daily mission of hunting down and engaging enemy forces as an infantry soldier or tank commander.Representative Duncan Hunter, Republican of California and a Marine Corps veteran with combat tours in Iraq and Afghanistan, defines it as a difference between "incidental combat," as women have faced in convoys or attacks on bases, and "the direct combat duties of our advanced and most elite ground operators."Representative Hunter said in a statement, "The question here is whether this change will actually make our military better at operating in combat, specifically finding and targeting the enemy."Ask Sergeant Pearsall, who was decorated for her actions in Baquba and received a medical retirement from the Air Force in 2008, and the answer is simple: Yes, women can do it, and I already have.
WASHINGTON — In an illustration of the government's changeable ideas of what should be secret, Pentagon censors have decided that nearly half of more than 400 passages deleted from an Afghan war memoir can be printed without damaging national security.The decision last week by a Defense Department security office is the latest twist in the striking fate of the 2010 book "Operation Dark Heart," by Anthony Shaffer, a retired Army officer who described his work as an intelligence officer in Afghanistan. The Army initially cleared the book for publication, but then the Defense Intelligence Agency objected, asserting that the manuscript contained classified information.So the Pentagon spent nearly $50,000 to buy and destroy the entire 10,000-copy first printing of the book, before allowing a second printing with 433 passages blacked out. Mr. Shaffer later filed a lawsuit challenging the deletions.The new review by the Defense Department concluded that 198 of the supposed secrets were now "properly declassified" and could be printed after all.In a further complication to the "Operation Dark Heart" case, a small number of review copies of the original uncensored edition had been distributed before the Pentagon bought the 10,000 copies. By examining the unexpurgated copies, it is possible to find out what security officials thought was dangerous, and what they now have decided is safe to print.For instance, the name of Bagram Air Base, a hub of American operations in Afghanistan, was removed from the first edition, but the censors now say it can be restored. But a reference to the nickname of the National Security Agency, "the Fort" — a name well known for decades to neighbors of the agency at Fort Meade, Md. — remains classified.Mr. Shaffer, who retired from the Army as a lieutenant colonel in 2011, said the restored passages may be used in a new Turkish-language edition of the book. But he noted that the Defense Department had decided that the official description of activities that won him a Bronze Star — in a document not initially marked as classified and already released at a public Congressional hearing — was now classified and could not be publicly discussed."They continue to trample on my First Amendment rights," he said.Steven Aftergood of the Federation of American Scientists, who published the new Defense Department letter on his blog Secrecy News on Thursday, said the government's revision "illustrates the thoroughly subjective character of the classification system.""To inquire into the logic of the process is to go down a bottomless rabbit hole," he said.
WASHINGTON — One was a Black Hawk pilot in Iraq who left the Army after she lost out on the chance to advance to an elite Special Operations helicopter combat unit because it was off limits to her as a woman.Another was a Marine captain who went on infantry foot patrols in some of the most dangerous parts of Afghanistan, but left active duty after she decided that her only future as a woman in the Marines was a lifetime of logistics or support units.The third, a brigadier general who joined the Marines in a different era, made her peace with reality, stuck it out and rose to become the first woman to command Parris Island, the service's South Carolina training center.For all three officers, the ban on women in combat was not so much a glass ceiling as a seemingly bulletproof one that limited their career options even as women played an increasingly important role in defending the country.For them, the significance of Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta's decision last week to lift the 1994 ban on women in combat was not just that it gives them the opportunity to fight but also that it offers women a chance to advance in a career in which combat experience remains essential."Growing up in America, you don't encounter this kind of discrimination," said the Marine captain, Zoe Bedell, 27, a Princeton graduate, recalling her four years on active duty. Now in the Marine Reserve, she remains a plaintiff in an American Civil Liberties Union lawsuit against the Pentagon for its policies on women and no longer envisions a career in the military. "I think my ship has sailed," she said.Although women often found themselves engaging in ground warfare in Iraq and Afghanistan over the past decade, the military did not officially count their actions as combat, and their battlefield experience went unrecognized. Many left in anger and frustration, or just disappointment at hitting a wall."Special Operations is something I would have tried for, and if I had gotten it, I probably would have stayed around longer," said the Black Hawk pilot, Lindsey Melki, 30, a graduate of the United States Military Academy.The Parris Island commander, Brig. Gen. Lori E. Reynolds, 48, a graduate of the United States Naval Academy, chose to accept the strictures and, like other American military women of her generation, rose on a path that was available to her. Although she declined to be interviewed for this article, in an interview in Afghanistan in 2010 she talked about younger military women who were chafing at the combat restrictions."Some of these kids, they grew up without barriers," she said. "But from my perspective, we are where we need to be." In an e-mailed statement on Friday, General Reynolds said that she now looked forward to seeing "that change is implemented the right way."Ms. Melki began a 15-month deployment to Iraq in 2007. She spent much of her time there ferrying infantrymen on combat missions. On more than a few occasions she was a pilot for Special Forces troops — the Army's Green Berets — who were hunting down insurgent leaders. Flying with the aid of night-vision goggles, she was given the job of dropping them as swiftly and stealthily as possible into contested areas."At night you could see the tracer rounds coming up at you, and that was a reminder of the fighting out there," she said.When her deployment ended, Ms. Melki looked around for new assignments and found herself dreaming of joining a Special Operations aviation regiment, an elite Army unit known as the Night Stalkers. After all, she had already flown Special Forces on secret missions. "I thought, 'Why can't I do that?' " she said.The answer: Because of the Pentagon's ban on women in combat, which prohibited women from serving in Special Operations units like the Night Stalkers. So Ms. Melki watched as friends and peers, including pilots she considered no better or more experienced than she was, were accepted in the Special Forces. "I was jealous of them, I was," Ms. Melki said. "Their stories seemed cool."Instead Ms. Melki headed to Fort Jackson, S.C., where she commanded a basic training company of new recruits. She remained there until 2011, when she left the Army.
Tough Questions for Hagel at Hearing: Chuck Hagel, President Obama's nominee for secretary of defense, had some sharp exchanges with Senator John McCain.WASHINGTON — Chuck Hagel , President Obama's nominee to be secretary of defense, faced sharp and sometimes angry questioning from fellow Republicans — especially his old friend Senator John McCain — at a contentious confirmation hearing on Thursday that focused on his past statements on Iran, the influence of pro-Israel organizations in Washington and the Iraq war.Mr. Hagel, 66, a former senator from Nebraska and a decorated Vietnam veteran who would be the first former enlisted combat soldier to be secretary of defense, often seemed tentative in his responses. Republicans on the Senate Armed Services Committee showed him little deference, cross-examining him like prosecutors and often cutting him off.There was dismay from Democrats and derision from Republicans about Mr. Hagel's sometimes stumbling performance during seven and a half hours of testimony."I'm going to be candid," Senator Claire McCaskill, a Missouri Democrat and committee member, told MSNBC, "I think that Chuck Hagel is much more comfortable asking questions than answering them."She added: "That's one bad habit I think you get into when you've been in the Senate. You can dish it out, but sometimes it's a little more difficult to take it."One Republican on the committee, Senator Mike Lee of Utah, said bluntly, "Senator Hagel did little to help himself today."The angriest exchange of the hearing occurred with Mr. McCain of Arizona, a fellow Vietnam veteran who was a close friend of Mr. Hagel in the Senate, but split with him because of Mr. Hagel's skeptical views on the Iraq war. Mr. McCain was a strong supporter of the war, and like many Republicans, he still holds Mr. Hagel's opposition against him. In 2008, Mr. Hagel did not endorse Mr. McCain for president and traveled with Mr. Obama, then a senator from Illinois, to Iraq and Afghanistan.Mr. Hagel dodged a direct answer as Mr. McCain asked him repeatedly if history would judge whether he was right or wrong in opposing the surge in American armed forces in 2007. The escalation, along with other major factors, is credited with helping to quell the violence in Iraq at the time. When Mr. Hagel said he wanted to explain, Mr. McCain bore in."I actually would like an answer, yes or no," Mr. McCain said."Well, I'm not going to give you a yes or no," Mr. Hagel replied.Mr. McCain did not let up."I think history has already made a judgment about the surge, sir, and you're on the wrong side of it," Mr. McCain said. "And your refusal to answer whether you were right or wrong about it is going to have an impact on my judgment as to whether I vote for your confirmation or not."It took the next questioner, Senator Bill Nelson, Democrat of Florida, to draw Mr. Hagel out on the subject. "I did question a surge," Mr. Hagel said. "I always ask the question, is this going to be worth the sacrifice?"He said that nearly 1,200 American men and women had lost their lives in the surge and that thousands more were wounded. "I'm not that certain that it was required," Mr. Hagel said. "Now, it doesn't mean I'm right, doesn't mean I didn't make wrong votes."One of the most hostile questioners was Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, who told Mr. Hagel to "name one dumb thing we've been goaded into doing because of the pressure from the Israeli or Jewish lobby." Mr. Hagel, who in 2006 said that the "Jewish lobby" intimidates Congress, could not.Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, surprised the hearing when he put excerpts from an interview Mr. Hagel gave to Al Jazeera in 2009 on a giant video screen. Although it was difficult to hear the short clips he provided, Mr. Cruz asserted that they showed Mr. Hagel agreeing with a caller who suggested that Israel had committed war crimes."Do you think the nation of Israel has committed war crimes?" Mr. Cruz demanded.
The answer, starting next January: a minimum of three, the same number required of male Marines.If anyone thought the military's decision to allow women into combat units would lead to exceptions for women when it came to fitness and physical strength, this is one service's "gender neutral" answer — or at least part of the answer.Like the men, women will have to perform the exercises on the Marine Corps's annual physical fitness test as "dead hang" pull-ups, without the benefit of the momentum from a lower-body swing. Like the men, women can do the pull-ups underhanded or overhanded, as long as their chins break the plane of the bar.The new requirement replaces the old "flexed arm hang" for women, in place since 1975, which had to be held for a minimum of 15 seconds."The physical requirements of female Marines, commensurate with their roles, have increased greatly since 1975," said Col. Sean D. Gibson, a spokesman for the Marine Corps Combat Development Command in Quantico, Va. "The pull-up is a better test of muscular strength."But the new Marine Corps regulations are just part of a sweeping re-examination of fitness standards in the military that Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta's announcement last week ending the ban on women in combat only accelerated.As it stands now, service members face a gantlet of overlapping fitness tests throughout the vast sprawl of the American military, from initial ones that recruits have to pass to annual fitness (and weight) tests to specific physical requirements that must be met for combat jobs.The Pentagon says it will not lower standards for women, but is nonetheless reviewing the requirements for hundreds of what are called military occupational specialties to see if they actually match up with the demands of each job.Some combat jobs that might open to women may require them to meet only specific requirements rather than a wide range of fitness standards."We're going to ensure that our tank crewmen are fully capable of removing 50-pound projectiles from the ammunition rack and loading them into the main gun in a sustained manner in a combat situation," said George Wright, an Army spokesman.But for now, the Army has no immediate plans to change its sex-adjusted recruitment and annual fitness tests, even though the Marine Corps, which tenaciously promotes itself as the most hard-bodied service, has started to toughen up its standards for women.But even for the pull-ups, the Marines are still making some exceptions. To get a perfect grade, women will have to do only 8, compared with the 20 required for men."I don't think it's a very high bar," said Capt. Ann G. Fox, a Marine Reserve officer who during her first deployment in 2004 worked with the Iraqi Army and who thinks women could do better if it was required of them. "I think the test should be the same as the men 20 pull-ups. People train to what they're tested on."That was the experience of Greg Jacob, who was a commander at the combat training school for enlisted Marines at Camp Geiger, N.C., and said that he asked his female trainers to do the same number of pull-ups as their male students, even though women were not required at the time to do pull-ups at all."I saw women who could only do one or two pull-ups be able to bust out, over the course of four or five months, eight pull-ups," he said. "And that was because they were training to that standard."Mr. Jacob, now the policy director for the Service Women's Action Network, an advocacy group that worked to end the female combat ban, acknowledged the physiological differences between men and women, but said they were overstated. "There are lots of men who don't have the same muscle mass as other men," he said. "There is physical diversity regardless of gender."
WASHINGTON — Several Republican senators — notably John McCain — said Monday they would oppose a filibuster of former Senator Chuck Hagel's confirmation as secretary of defense, moving the nominee much closer toward approval."I just do not believe a filibuster is appropriate, and I would oppose such a move," Mr. McCain, a key Republican on military issues, told reporters, adding that he would press his colleagues on the matter. Senators Richard M. Burr of North Carolina and Susan Collins of Maine also said Monday that they would reject a filibuster, as did Senator Roy Blunt of Missouri last week, pushing the number of votes to force confirmation beyond the 60 needed.Mr. McCain and the others cannot stop a single senator from blocking Mr. Hagel's nomination from coming to an up-or-down vote, but his statement indicated what Senate Republican aides said Friday: In the event of a filibuster, Mr. Hagel almost certainly will have 60 votes. The Senate Armed Services Committee is expected to send the confirmation to the full Senate on Thursday, most likely along party lines.The 53 Democrats and two independents who lean Democratic are expected to hold together for Mr. Hagel. Two other Republicans — Senators Mike Johanns of Nebraska and Thad Cochran of Mississippi — have come out for the confirmation of Mr. Hagel, a former Senate Republican from Nebraska.But on Monday, it became clear many Republicans did not have the stomach to filibuster a cabinet nomination, a move that may be unprecedented. To do so would take egregious circumstances, like ethical or legal violations, Ms. Collins said."I'm not inclined to support a filibuster, regardless of how I ultimately come down" on a final vote, she said.Some Republicans believe Mr. Hagel's most ardent opponents could still use procedural hurdles to block him. Senators Ted Cruz and John Cornyn, Republicans of Texas, have said they would not take any options off the table. That could slow Mr. Hagel's path to the Pentagon, but with the new opposition to a filibuster, Mr. Hagel will almost certainly head the Defense Department.
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta is preparing to expand benefits to same-sex partners of military personnel, but it remained doubtful that the Pentagon could offer the medical, dental and housing allowances desired by gay and lesbian couples, officials said Tuesday.Full benefits would require the repeal of the Defense of Marriage Act, or DOMA, a 1996 law that defined marriage as the union of a man and a woman. Despite lifting the ban on openly gay and lesbian troops serving in the armed forces, the Pentagon cannot recognize their marriages, even if they are legal in some states, because military personnel are federal employees covered by DOMA.The Supreme Court is expected to rule this summer on whether the law is constitutional.Officials said Mr. Panetta would order benefits that included the issuance of military identification cards to same-sex partners of military personnel, akin to those offered any dependent. That would bring privileges to shop at military commissaries, as well as access to gymnasiums, movie theaters and various family support programs on bases and posts. The focus is on those benefits that fall under Pentagon policy and can be changed by the defense secretary, rather than on benefits covered by DOMA.While not insignificant, an expansion of benefits limited to those privileges would fall far short of the financial benefits given married military couples — including medical and dental benefits and housing allowances. Officials said the final benefits package had not been decided.The effort was first reported on The Washington Post's Web site on Tuesday.Pentagon and military officials spoke about the likely benefits on the condition of anonymity because the announcement had not been made.
WASHINGTON — President Obama declared at the White House on Jan. 7 that Chuck Hagel , his nominee to be secretary of defense, would be the "first person of enlisted rank" to run the Pentagon. The distinction, which Mr. Obama called "historic," quickly made its way into news media reports around the globe, including in The New York Times.The problem is that at least four other American defense secretaries — Melvin R. Laird, Elliot L. Richardson, Caspar W. Weinberger and William J. Perry — served part of their military careers as enlisted men.According to the Historical Office of the Secretary of Defense, Mr. Laird, who was President Richard M. Nixon's first defense secretary, entered the Navy as an enlisted man before serving as a junior officer on a destroyer in the Pacific during World War II. Mr. Richardson, who served four months as Nixon's second defense secretary, enlisted in the Army as a private in 1942. He was subsequently commissioned as an officer, and as a first lieutenant landed with the Fourth Infantry Division in Normandy on D-Day.Mr. Weinberger, President Ronald Reagan's first secretary of defense, entered the Army as a private in 1941, was commissioned and served in the Pacific, and by the end of World War II was a captain on Gen. Douglas MacArthur's intelligence staff.According to biographies on the Web site of Stanford University, Mr. Perry, who was defense secretary under President Bill Clinton, served in the Army Corps of Engineers from 1946 to 1947 and was in Japan during the American occupation after World War II. He later became an officer in the Army Reserves. Today, Mr. Perry is a senior fellow at the Freeman Spogli Institute for International Studies and the Hoover Institution, both at Stanford.Mr. Obama's omission of the four other defense secretaries was first reported by Robert Burns of The Associated Press.White House officials insisted that Mr. Obama was not in error. "President Obama was precise and accurate in referring to the fact that Senator Hagel would be the 'first person of enlisted rank' to go on to serve as secretary of defense, and that experience on the front lines is part of the reason why President Obama chose him," said Marie Harf, a White House spokeswoman who is working on Mr. Hagel's nomination.As Ms. Harf explained it, the use of the formulation "first person of enlisted rank" was meant to signal that Mr. Hagel had remained enlisted throughout his entire military career and to separate him from the other men, who had retired as officers. Mr. Hagel, who was wounded twice in Vietnam, would be the first defense secretary to have served in combat while enlisted. To Mr. Obama that distinction, at least, is crucial."Chuck knows that war is not a distraction," Mr. Obama said in nominating Mr. Hagel. "He understands that sending young Americans to fight and bleed in the dirt and mud, that's something we do only when it's absolutely necessary."
DALLAS — Eddie Ray Routh, the former Marine corporal accused of killing Chris Kyle, an author and retired Navy SEAL sniper, had been released from a veterans hospital here four days before the shootings over the objections of his parents, Mr. Routh's court-appointed lawyers said.Mr. Routh, 25, and his relatives told the police in recent weeks and months that he had been deeply troubled and was suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder, according to court documents. He had a series of run-ins with the authorities in parts of North Texas, and had threatened to kill himself at least once, police records show.Mr. Routh had been undergoing treatment at the Dallas V.A. Medical Center and Green Oaks Hospital, a psychiatric center in Dallas. On Jan. 24, Mr. Routh was released from the Dallas V.A. center but soon returned, and he was again released on Jan. 29, said his lawyers, R. Shay Isham and J. Warren St. John. On both occasions, Mr. Routh's father and mother, Raymond and Jodi Routh, had protested his release, the lawyers said."She was begging them not to let him loose," Mr. Isham said.Four days after Mr. Routh's release, Mr. Kyle, 38, and a friend, Chad Littlefield, 35, took Mr. Routh to a rural shooting range to help the young man, one of the ways Mr. Kyle often assisted troubled veterans. For reasons that remain unclear, the authorities said, Mr. Routh turned a semiautomatic handgun on the two men, shooting both multiple times and fleeing in Mr. Kyle's truck before he was captured hours later near his home in the Dallas suburb of Lancaster.A spokeswoman for the federal Department of Veterans Affairs said that without a signed privacy waiver from Mr. Routh, they could not disclose any protected health information.Mr. Routh remained in custody at the Erath County Jail in Stephenville on $3 million bond. Mr. Isham said that on Tuesday, Mr. Routh refused to meet with his mother and Mr. St. John, unless he was given a cigarette. "He's trying to play an angle — 'I give you something, you give me something,' " Mr. Isham said. "He wouldn't see anybody."Eleven days after graduating from high school in the nearby town of Midlothian, Mr. Routh began boot camp in June 2006 at age 18. In his senior yearbook, there is a photo of him talking with a recruiter. "I want to be one of the few and the proud," he was quoted as saying, when asked why he was joining the Marines.Mr. Routh served nearly four years, becoming a corporal shortly before he was discharged in June 2010. He was in Iraq in September 2007, and was part of a disaster-relief deployment to Haiti after the earthquake there in January 2010.Since then, Mr. Routh appeared to be struggling, and his relatives seemed concerned about his mental state. Eight months before the shootings, Mr. Routh's mother called the Lancaster police in May to report a burglary and appeared to name her son as the suspect. Nine pill bottles were taken, according to the police report. In September, the Lancaster police returned to the house after Mr. Routh threatened to kill himself and had become upset when his father told him he was going to sell his gun.Court documents suggest that Mr. Routh may have become fixated with Mr. Kyle's black Ford truck, because he told his sister, Laura Blevins, and her husband that he had killed the two men and had "traded his soul for a new truck." But the documents also make clear that Mr. Routh was paranoid. "He said they were out shooting target practice and he couldn't trust them so he killed them before they could kill him," his sister's husband, Gaines Blevins, told the authorities, according to court documents. "He said he couldn't trust anyone anymore (and) everyone was out to get him."After a search of the house, Mr. Routh's cellphone, a box of 9-millimeter ammunition and paraphernalia for smoking marijuana were seized.The funeral for Mr. Littlefield will be Friday at 2 p.m. at First Baptist Church of Midlothian. A memorial service for Mr. Kyle will be held Monday at 1 p.m. at Cowboys Stadium in Arlington, according to his Facebook page.
WASHINGTON — In his first term, President Obama presided over an administration known for its lack of open dissension on critical foreign policy issues.But on Thursday, deep divisions over what to do about one of those issues — the rising violence in Syria — spilled into public view for the first time in a blunt exchange between Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, and the leaders of the Pentagon.Testifying before the Senate Armed Services Committee, Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta acknowledged that he and the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, had supported a plan last year to arm carefully vetted Syrian rebels. But it was ultimately vetoed by the White House, Mr. Panetta said, although it was developed by David H. Petraeus, the C.I.A. director at the time, and backed by Hillary Rodham Clinton, then the secretary of state."How many more have to die before you recommend military action?" Mr. McCain asked Mr. Panetta on Thursday, noting that an estimated 60,000 Syrians had been killed in the fighting.And did the Pentagon, Mr. McCain continued, support the recommendation by Mrs. Clinton and Mr. Petraeus "that we provide weapons to the resistance in Syria? Did you support that?"Neither Mr. Panetta nor General Dempsey explained why President Obama did not heed their recommendation. But senior American officials have said that the White House was worried about the risks of becoming more deeply involved in the Syria crisis, including the possibility that weapons could fall into the wrong hands. And with Mr. Obama in the middle of a re-election campaign, the White House rebuffed the plan, a decision that Mr. Panetta says he now accepts.With the exception of General Dempsey, the officials who favored arming the rebels have either left the administration or, as in Mr. Panetta's case, are about to depart. Given that turnover, it is perhaps not surprising that the details of the debate — an illustration of the degree that foreign policy decisions have been centralized in the White House — are surfacing only now. A White House spokesman declined to comment on Thursday.The plan that Mr. Petraeus developed, and that Mrs. Clinton supported, called for vetting rebels and training a cadre of fighters who would be supplied with weapons. The plan would have enlisted the help of a neighboring state.The proposal offered the potential reward of creating Syrian allies for the United States during the conflict and if President Bashar al-Assad is removed.Some administration officials expected the issue to be revisited after the election. But when Mr. Petraeus resigned because of an extramarital affair and Mrs. Clinton suffered a concussion, missing weeks of work, the issue was shelved.Syria rebel leaders have long appealed for weapons. Mohammad Hussein al-Haj Ali, a Syrian major general who defected to the opposition, said in a telephone interview last year that he had raised the issue of arming the resistance in a September meeting in Amman, Jordan, with Gen. James N. Mattis, the head of the Central Command, which oversees operations in the Middle East."He was very sympathetic to it, but his main concern was who would actually get hold of these weapons," he said, referring to General Mattis.General Haj Ali said he promised that the rebels who were armed would take care not to lose control of the weapons and would return any that they did not use.General Mattis "said he would meet the top administration officials within 48 hours and get back to me," General Haj Ali said through an interpreter, adding that he still had received no response several weeks later.The debate over arming the rebels is complex and turns on assessments on the military advantages they might gain, the political calculations on who might come to power in Syria, and the dangers that the arms might fall into the wrong hands.Jeffrey White, a former senior analyst with the Defense Intelligence Agency and a fellow at the Washington Institute for Near East Policy, said that providing weapons would help the rebels in their fight against a better-equipped government that has warplanes, armor and artillery, and reduce rebel casualties.Equally important, Mr. White said, it would give the United States influence with groups that would control Syria if Mr. Assad is ousted, and would diminish the influence of extremists."The day after the regime falls, the groups that have the guns will dominate the political and military situation," Mr. White said. "And if some of those groups owe that capability to us, that would be a good thing. It does not mean that we would control the situation, but it would give us a means of shaping it."Taking a contrary view, Daniel C. Kurtzer, a former United States ambassador to Israel and Egypt, said the potential risks outweighed the gains. Even with thorough vetting, he said, it would be difficult to ensure that the weapons did not end up with unreliable or hostile groups."The problem that I think the White House has identified much more clearly than the national security team is, 'Who are you going to deal with?' " Mr. Kurtzer said.Much of the lengthy hearing was devoted to sparring over the Pentagon's response to the Sept. 11 attack on the United States diplomatic compound in Benghazi, Libya. The Pentagon chiefs said the military was not able to respond faster because there was no intelligence of an imminent attack. Mr. McCain faulted the Pentagon for not positioning forces in the region before the anniversary of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks.But the statements by the Pentagon chiefs on Syria were so striking that Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, returned to them after a break in the proceedings."Both of you agreed with Petraeus and Clinton that we should start looking at military assistance in Syria, is that correct?" Senator Graham asked."That was our position." Mr. Panetta said. "I do want to say, Senator, that obviously there were a number of factors that were involved here that ultimately led to the president's decision to make it nonlethal."And I supported his decision in the end," Mr. Panetta continued. "But my answer to your question is yes."Mr. McCain said he was dismayed that Mr. Obama had "overruled the senior leaders of his own national security team, who were in unanimous agreement that America needs to take greater action to change the military balance of power in Syria."
WASHINGTON — Engaging a high-ranking Obama administration official for the first time in an extensive public discussion of the use of drones for targeted killing, members of the Senate Intelligence Committee on Thursday pressed John O. Brennan , President Obama's nominee for director of the Central Intelligence Agency , about the secrecy of the strikes, their legal basis and the reported backlash they have produced in Pakistan and Yemen.Adding a new element to the roiling debate, the committee's chairwoman, Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, said she would review proposals to create a court to oversee targeted killings. She gave no details but said such a court would be analogous to the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court, which oversees eavesdropping on American soil.Mr. Brennan was noncommittal, noting that lethal operations are generally the sole responsibility of the executive branch. But he said the administration had "wrestled with" the concept of such a court and called the idea "certainly worthy of discussion."On the same day two other administration officials, Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta, and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, acknowledged in testimony before the Senate Armed Services Committee that a plan they had supported to arm Syrian rebels had been rejected by the White House, the notably aggressive questioning Mr. Brennan received seemed to underscore the increased scrutiny Mr. Obama's national security policies are facing as he begins his second term.Mr. Brennan, 57, a 25-year C.I.A. veteran who has spent the last four years as the administration's senior counterterrorism official, also faced intense questioning about whether he was responsible for leaks of classified information, and whether he had been candid about his involvement in the agency's interrogation program under President George W. Bush.But the senators repeatedly returned to the targeted killings Mr. Brennan has helped direct over the last four years.The hearing came three days after the leak of a Justice Department document explaining the legal rationale for the killing of American citizens who join Al Qaeda. On the eve of Mr. Brennan's hearing, the White House gave in to pressure from lawmakers and said the Senate and House Intelligence Committees could see the full classified legal memorandum justifying the killing of Anwar al-Awlaki, an American-born cleric who joined Al Qaeda in Yemen and was killed in Yemen in a C.I.A. drone strike in September 2011.Ms. Feinstein expressed frustration at the committee's difficulty in getting information about the targeted killing program. She said that while senators were allowed to view two legal memos, they were still seeking eight others, and committee staff members were still prohibited from reading the classified documents.In his opening statement, Mr. Brennan acknowledged "widespread debate" about the administration's counterterrorism operations but strongly defended them, saying the United States remained "at war with Al Qaeda."He said later that when C.I.A. drone strikes accidentally kill civilians, those mistakes should be admitted. "We need to acknowledge it publicly," he said. "In the interests of transparency, I believe the United States government should acknowledge it."But senators repeatedly complained that there was too little transparency about the targeted killing program, sometimes producing misleading information in the news media."I think that this has gone about as far as it can go as a covert activity," Ms. Feinstein told reporters after the hearing.But she defended the agency's record on the strikes, saying the number of civilians killed each year has been "in the single digits." A reporter pointed out that she has accused the agency of lying for years about its interrogation program and asked how she could have such confidence in its claims on casualties in the drone program. "I am confident of those figures until I am not confident of them," she said.The hearing made clear that even members of the Intelligence Committee, created in the 1970s to be the public's eyes on secret government programs, are in the dark about many of their details.Senator Ron Wyden, Democrat of Oregon, told Mr. Brennan that the committee had never been given the full list of countries in which the C.I.A. has carried out lethal operations. Senator Angus King, independent of Maine, urged Mr. Brennan — if he is confirmed, as appeared likely Thursday night — to be more candid with the panel than his predecessors. "There's no one else watching," he said.Even Mr. Brennan had a hard time explaining how much information he thought should be disclosed about targeted killings. "What we need to do is optimize transparency on these issues, but at the same time, optimize secrecy and the protection of our national security," he said.
A leading Republican senator said Sunday that he would block Senate confirmations of President Obama's nominees to lead the C.I.A. and the Department of Defense unless he was given more information on the attack on the United States compound in Benghazi, Libya, last year.Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, a vocal critic of the administration's handling of the attack, said he would use a Senate custom known as a hold to stall the nominations of John O. Brennan as C.I.A. director and former Senator Chuck Hagel as Pentagon chief until the White House gave him a full description of Mr. Obama's actions during the attack on Sept. 11."What did he do that night?" Mr. Graham asked during an appearance on CBS's "Face the Nation," suggesting that the president could have intervened to manage the crisis personally."That's not unfair," Mr. Graham added. "The families need to know."Ambassador J. Christopher Stevens and three other Americans were killed when heavily armed Islamic extremist militants stormed and burned the compound."We believe the Senate should act swiftly to confirm John Brennan and Senator Hagel," said Tommy Vietor, a spokesman for the National Security Council. "These are critical national security positions, and individual members shouldn't play politics with their nominations."A hold is an informal measure by which any senator may prevent a vote without having to provide a specific reason or even identify who he or she is. But it can be overridden by a vote of 60 senators.Senator Jack Reed, Democrat of Rhode Island, also on "Face the Nation," called Mr. Graham's threat "unprecedented and unwarranted." He added, "I think it is an overreaction that is not going to serve the best interests of going forward, of the national security of the United States."Mr. Graham cited Democratic efforts in 2005 to hold up the confirmation of John R. Bolton, President George W. Bush's nominee as ambassador to the United Nations, as a precedent for his threatened hold.
WASHINGTON — The Pentagon on Monday expanded benefits to same-sex partners of military personnel to include a range of services offered at various posts and bases, but it withheld more expansive benefits sought by gay and lesbian couples — in particular medical and dental coverage and housing allowances.The new military benefits are to become available to same-sex partners of military personnel as soon as Aug. 31 and no later than Oct. 1. They include military identification cards akin to those offered to any dependent, which will be encoded to reflect a domestic partnership.Specific new privileges will include access to military commissaries, as well as to gymnasiums, movie theaters and various family support programs on bases and posts, and the opportunity to fly on Defense Department aircraft on a "space available" basis.Pentagon officials for the first time disclosed estimates on the number of service personnel and veterans expected to apply for benefits for their same-sex domestic partners: 5,600 in the active-duty force, 3,400 in the National Guard and Reserve, and 8,000 among military retirees.Full benefits would require the repeal of the Defense of Marriage Act, a 1996 law that defined marriage as the union of a man and a woman. The Pentagon lifted the ban on openly gay men and lesbians serving in the armed forces, but it cannot recognize their marriages, even if they are legal in some states, because military personnel are federal employees covered by the marriage law.The Supreme Court is expected to rule this summer on whether the law is constitutional."Additional benefits, such as health care and housing allowances, are by statute currently only available to spouses and therefore cannot be made available to same-sex domestic partners of service members under current law," Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta wrote in a letter released by the Pentagon."In the event that the Defense of Marriage Act is no longer applicable to the Department of Defense, it will be the policy of the department to construe the words 'spouse' and 'marriage' without regard to sexual orientation," he added, "and married couples, irrespective of sexual orientation, and their dependents will be granted full military benefits."Criticism came immediately from Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, the ranking Republican on the Senate Armed Services Committee, who released a statement saying, "Once again, the president is eroding our military's apolitical stance and forcing conformity onto the rest of society by pushing his liberal social agenda through the Department of Defense." He said the decision "will increase costs and demand for limited resources that are currently available for military families, active and reserve forces, and retirees."Gay rights organizations broadly endorsed the announcement, but stressed that steps remained to assure that all service personnel were treated equally."The Pentagon took a historic step forward toward righting the wrong of inequality in our armed forces, but there is still more work to be done," said Chad Griffin, the president of Human Rights Campaign.Another organization, OutServe-SLDN, praised Mr. Panetta in a statement "for his decision to extend to nearly the full extent permitted under current law the benefits available to gay and lesbian service members and their families."The statement noted that Mr. Panetta's announcement "did not include a number of important items that could have been granted — including burial rights at national cemeteries and some overseas travel for spouses, which remain under consideration." But it described the new benefits as "substantive."
WASHINGTON — After a combative two-hour debate that tested the bounds of Senate collegiality, the Armed Services Committee on Tuesday approved the nomination of former Senator Chuck Hagel as defense secretary on a sharply partisan vote.The 14-to-11 vote to send the nomination to the Senate floor with a favorable recommendation was the latest step in a process that has deepened festering hostilities between Congressional Republicans and the White House and has exposed stark disagreements over wartime foreign policy.After the vote, Republicans threatened to try to filibuster the nomination of Mr. Hagel, a decorated Vietnam War veteran whom some had worked with as a member of their own party, while Democrats were promising to force a vote of the full Senate as early as Wednesday night.At times, the meeting slipped into an unusually accusatory and bitter back-and-forth, with Republicans like Ted Cruz, a freshman senator from Texas, going as far as to suggest that Mr. Hagel had accepted money from nations that oppose American interests.Saying that he had serious doubts about the source of payments that Mr. Hagel had accepted for speaking engagements, Mr. Cruz declared, "It is at a minimum relevant to know if that $200,000 that he deposited in his bank account came directly from Saudi Arabia, came directly from North Korea."Senator Bill Nelson of Florida and other Democrats countered by saying that Republicans had unfairly questioned the integrity of both Mr. Hagel, a two-time Purple Heart recipient, and had undermined the work of the normally bipartisan committee itself."Senator Cruz has gone over the line," Mr. Nelson said. "He basically has impugned the patriotism of the nominee."Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, who is opposing his former colleague, also bristled at the attacks on Mr. Hagel, saying that "no one on this committee should at any time impugn his character or his integrity."Tension reached its height when Senator James Inhofe of Oklahoma, the senior Republican on the committee, said that those who had suggested that Mr. Hagel was "cozy" with terrorist states had a basis for their claims because Iran had expressed support for his nomination."He's endorsed by them," Mr. Inhofe said. "You can't get any cozier than that."Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, gasped in disgust. "Senator Inhofe, be careful," she later warned him. "What if some horrible organization said tomorrow that you were the best guy that they knew?"Then, looking directly at Mr. Cruz, she insisted that the president should be free to choose his own cabinet."As much as some people in this room don't like it," she said, "he was elected president of the United States by the American people. And he has selected an honorable veteran, a Republican who has served our country in various capacities, including in this body."Blocking such a high-level presidential appointee is a rare move. Since 1917, when the Senate's modern filibuster rules were created, a cabinet-level nominee has faced a supermajority barrier to confirmation only twice: Ronald Reagan's nominee for commerce secretary in 1987, C. William Verity Jr., and George W. Bush's nominee for interior secretary in 2006, Dirk Kempthorne.Mr. Inhofe has vowed to use procedural tactics to slow the Senate's consideration of Mr. Hagel, a step that would require 60 votes for confirmation instead of the usual simple majority of 51.The tactic could prove mainly symbolic, however, because at least 60 senators, including some of those who voted against him on Tuesday, have indicated that they will allow his nomination to come to the Senate floor.Even as Mr. Inhofe threatened to draw the process out, the Senate majority leader, Harry Reid, was preparing to hold a vote as early as Wednesday night. Still, Senate Democrats said that given the late timing of the committee vote, they did not expect Mr. Hagel's nomination to reach the Senate floor until Thursday morning.Mr. Hagel has faced opposition from Republicans and Democrats alike, drawing criticism over past remarks that were seen as anti-Jewish, anti-gay or insufficiently supportive of American foreign policy.
WASHINGTON — If drone pilots and computer experts had any doubts that they truly are central to the new way of combat, Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta used his valedictory Pentagon news conference on Wednesday to make it clear: he established a new medal just for them.The Distinguished Warfare Medal will provide "recognition for the extraordinary achievements that directly impact on combat operations, but that do not involve acts of valor or physical risk that combat entails," Mr. Panetta said."I've seen firsthand how modern tools like remotely piloted platforms and cybersystems have changed the way wars are fought," Mr. Panetta said, citing his tenure as director of the C.I.A. and his tour at the Pentagon. "And they've given our men and women the ability to engage the enemy and change the course of battle even from afar."Mr. Panetta said the new medal would be reserved for those who greatly assisted the war effort by piloting Predator or Reaper drones from a remote trailer, often back in the United States, or by an assignment to devise computer defenses or create poisonous digital code to attack an adversary's network.In the past, those tasks have been viewed as technological achievements, and not combat, and have not been recognized with a medal. It is certain that some will object to a prestigious warfare medal being awarded to those who did not place themselves at risk."Our military reserves its highest decorations, obviously, for those who display gallantry and valor in actions where their lives are on the line, and we will continue to do so," Mr. Panetta said."But we should also have the ability to honor the extraordinary actions that make a true difference in combat operations," he added. "They remove the enemy from the field of battle even if those actions are physically removed from the fight."Pentagon officials said the medal would rank higher than the Bronze Star but below the Silver Star.
Two of the most outspoken Republican critics of Chuck Hagel 's nomination as secretary of defense indicated Sunday that they would no longer hold up his Senate confirmation.Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, said on Fox News Sunday that he would stand aside because Mr. Hagel had disavowed comments that he was said to have made during a talk at Rutgers University in 2007 that the State Department was an adjunct of the Israeli Foreign Minister's office."I got a letter back from Senator Hagel in response to my question, 'Did you say that, and do you believe that?' And the letter said he did not recall saying that," Mr. Graham said. "He disavows that statement."Mr. Graham, one of the most vociferous and persistent critics of Mr. Hagel's nomination, added, "I'll just take him at his word unless something new comes along."Although Mr. Graham said he would no longer try to block the nomination, he was far from giving it an emphatic endorsement, calling Mr. Hagel "one of the most unqualified, radical choices for secretary of defense in a very long time."Those comments were echoed, on NBC's "Meet the Press," by Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, a close friend of Mr. Graham and a public opponent of Mr. Hagel's nomination."I don't believe he is qualified," Mr. McCain said. "But I don't believe that we should hold up his nomination any further because I think it's a reasonable amount of time to have questions answered."Mr. Graham and Mr. McCain were among a majority of Republicans in the Senate who backed a filibuster on Thursday when Mr. Hagel's nomination came to a vote. Despite four Republicans' crossing over to vote with the majority Democrats, the nomination fell one vote short of passing an up-or-down floor vote.That unprecedented move forced the majority leader, Senator Harry Reid, to set up another vote on Feb. 26. With Democratic control of the Senate, Mr. Hagel is expected to win confirmation whenever his nomination comes up for a vote.Mr. Hagel, a Republican former senator from Nebraska, has been broadly criticized by his former colleagues over his positions on Iran, Iraq and Israel, and faced a nomination process rocky even by recent fractious standards.President Obama's chief of staff, Denis McDonough, appearing Sunday on the ABC News program "This Week," said that the White House had "grave concern" that national security was at stake, given the Senate Republicans' delaying tactics in confirming both a new Pentagon chief and a director of the Central Intelligence Agency."If you look at Chuck Hagel — decorated war veteran himself, war hero, Republican senator, somebody who over the course of the last many years, either as a Republican senator or as a chairman of the president's Intelligence Advisory Board, I've worked with very closely," he said. "This guy has one thing in mind — how to protect the country."Mr. McDonough, who was formerly Mr. Obama's deputy national security adviser, working under John O. Brennan, the president's choice for C.I.A. director, added that "between John Brennan as the C.I.A. director and Chuck Hagel as secretary of defense, we want to make sure that we have those guys sitting in the chairs working. Because I don't want there to have been something missed because of this hangup here in Washington."The White House and Senate Democrats have continued to express confidence that both men will be confirmed. Democrats have enough votes to approve both nominees, but they do not have the 60 votes necessary to overcome any filibuster.After Thursday's vote, outside groups campaigning against Mr. Hagel's nomination said they would step up efforts to find damaging information and to pressure senators to vote against him.
WASHINGTON — A group of 15 Republican senators insisted on Thursday that President Obama withdraw the nomination of Chuck Hagel to be defense secretary, the latest move in a contentious battle to block the confirmation of their former colleague.But even as Republican senators tried to throw up another obstacle, Senate Democrats said they were pushing ahead with plans to hold a final up-or-down vote on the nomination no later than Wednesday.Should that vote proceed as planned, Mr. Hagel's confirmation appears assured. Several Republicans have said that they intend to drop their attempts to filibuster the nomination.But given how deeply divided Mr. Hagel's nomination has left the Senate, the outlook in the immediate term is murky.Many Republicans, like the 15 who wrote to the president on Thursday, signaled that they would not let the issue die quietly. And those who have said that they would ultimately not support a filibuster, like Deb Fischer of Nebraska and Richard Shelby of Alabama, were leaving the door open to further delay.Saying that Mr. Hagel's confirmation would be "unprecedented" because of near-unanimous opposition from Republicans, the group of 15 senators urged Mr. Obama to pick another candidate."Over the last half-century, no secretary of defense has been confirmed and taken office with more than three senators voting against him," they wrote. "The occupant of this critical office should be someone whose candidacy is neither controversial or divisive."Signing the letter were John Cornyn of Texas, the No. 2 Senate Republican; Lindsey Graham and Tim Scott of South Carolina; Roger Wicker of Mississippi; David Vitter of Louisiana; Ted Cruz of Texas; Mike Lee of Utah; Patrick J. Toomey of Pennsylvania; Marco Rubio of Florida; Dan Coats of Indiana; Ron Johnson of Wisconsin; James E. Risch of Idaho; John Barrasso of Wyoming; and Tom Coburn and James Inhofe of Oklahoma.Members of the group cited a litany of objections, including Mr. Hagel's unimpressive showing at his confirmation hearing, which drew criticism from members of both parties, and what they said was his "dangerous" posture toward dealing with Iran.The level of derision directed at Mr. Hagel from Republicans has been striking not just because defense secretaries are usually confirmed on a simple up-or-down vote, but also because Mr. Hagel, a Republican, served with many of them in the Senate until 2008."Senator Hagel's performance at his confirmation hearing was deeply concerning, leading to serious doubts about his basic competence to meet the substantial demands of the office," they said.Senate Republicans narrowly blocked a vote on Mr. Hagel's confirmation last week in a filibuster, forcing Democrats to put the matter off until senators return from recess next week.Republicans have been using the filibuster to prevent final consideration of the nomination by refusing to end debate on it, a procedural step that requires 60 senators to vote in the affirmative.But some Republicans, including Senator John McCain of Arizona, have since said that they will drop their objections. Mr. McCain was firm, saying on Sunday, "I don't believe that we should hold up his nomination any further."Others, like Mr. Graham, Mr. Shelby and Ms. Fischer, have said that while they do not support a filibuster, they believe that the senators should have ample time to consider their votes, leaving themselves open to voting not to end debate next week.Only one more Republican "yes" vote would be needed to cut off debate and carry through with a final vote if all the Republicans who voted to end the filibuster last week voted to do so again.Because Mr. Hagel has the support of Senate Democrats, who control 55 seats, he is likely to clear a final vote, which requires a simple majority of 51.If Senate Democrats move ahead with a vote and get the 60 votes necessary to end debate, Mr. Hagel could be confirmed as early as Tuesday. But because of procedural rules, any Republican could still delay the vote until Wednesday.A new voice chimed in on the debate on Thursday. Bob Dole, the former Senate majority leader and, like Mr. Hagel, a decorated veteran, urged his fellow Republicans to put aside their objections."Hagel's wisdom and courage make him uniquely qualified to be secretary of defense and lead the men and women of our armed forces," Mr. Dole said, adding that he would be "an exceptional leader at an important time."
WASHINGTON — With Congress unlikely to stop deep automatic spending cuts that will strike hard at the military, the fiscal stalemate is highlighting a significant shift in the Republican Party : lawmakers most keenly dedicated to shrinking the size of government are now more dominant than the bloc committed foremost to a robust national defense, particularly in the House.That reality also underscores what Republicans, and some Democrats, say was a major miscalculation on the part of President Obama. He agreed to set up the automatic cuts 18 months ago because he believed the threat of sharp reductions in military spending would be enough to force Republicans to agree to a deficit reduction plan that included the tax increases he favored."Fiscal questions trump defense in a way they never would have after 9/11," said Representative Tom Cole, Republican of Oklahoma. "But the war in Iraq is over. Troops are coming home from Afghanistan, and we want to secure the cuts."Representative Howard P. McKeon of California, the chairman of the Armed Services Committee and one of the lawmakers Democrats had hoped would never accept the military cuts, went almost as far. "Republicans aren't cookie cutter," he said, "but we do agree on the basic premise of where we're trying to go. And if we don't get our fiscal house in order, it's very hard to provide for the defense of the nation."As lawmakers prepared to return to Washington, the White House tried to raise the ante by highlighting the effects the cuts would have on programs in every state.But at the heart of the battle over sequestration — the nearly $1 trillion in budget cuts that are scheduled to begin on Friday and accelerate over the next decade — are fundamental misunderstandings between the two parties over their respective priorities.During the 2011 negotiations to raise the nation's statutory borrowing limit, Mr. Obama wanted an onerous "trigger" to force both sides to reach a compromise on deficit reduction. For Democrats, the bludgeon that would drive them to negotiate changes to entitlement programs like Medicare and Social Security would be cuts to domestic programs like child nutrition and national parks. For Republicans, the president wanted automatic tax increases to force a compromise on the broader tax code.Republicans balked, but offered what Mr. Obama thought was a different Republican sacred cow — military cuts.Ultimately, taxes trumped all of that. Republicans, who last month let taxes rise on incomes over $400,000 to avert broader tax increases and the "fiscal cliff," are now ready to stand their ground, regardless of the military cuts."I really think they misunderstood what happened on the fiscal cliff," Mr. Cole said. "They thought they had Republicans on the run, when all they did was push us to high ground. All the muskets are pointing out. You want to charge the hill? Come on."But the Republicans were surprised by Democrats, who would not shift the automatic domestic cuts to entitlement programs unless the people least affected by government support — the rich — also bore some of the burden."We always thought it wouldn't happen because the other side wouldn't stomach the nondefense reductions," said Representative Tom Price, a Georgia Republican and a leading voice among House conservatives. "I guess what happened was each side was too smart for the other."Dan Pfeiffer, a senior adviser to Mr. Obama, said on Sunday that there was no miscalculation. In the final months of last year's presidential campaign, Republicans "racked up a lot of frequent flier miles booking flights to Virginia" to denounce the coming military cuts, he said. If Republican leaders would step out of the way, he said, rank-and-file Republicans most worried about the military cuts would step forward to compromise on taxes.A sizable number of Republicans, including many senators, are incensed by the cuts about to fall on the Pentagon, totaling $43 billion for the 2013 fiscal year. Because the Defense Department will have only seven months to put them into effect and because military personnel are protected, military training, weapons acquisition and maintenance stand to be cut by 13 percent.President Ronald Reagan's push in the 1980s for tax cuts and domestic spending restraint were accompanied by a huge military buildup. "There's no way the party of Ronald Reagan should be accepting these cuts," said Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, who has privately sought some compromise on tax loopholes.Writing in the conservative Weekly Standard, William Kristol, a Republican hawk, excoriated Republicans for being "so desperate for a 'victory' over Obama" that they were "willing to sacrifice national defense for minor cuts in domestic spending which will in no way fundamentally change our trajectory toward national insolvency."Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, called the cuts "unconscionable" on the CNN program "State of the Union" on Sunday.But most Congressional Republicans are standing their ground, a position they say is strategic. The federal government's growing debt cannot be controlled through the spending at the annual discretion of Congress, and after the cuts take effect, that part of the federal budget will drop to levels not seen in five decades as measured against the size of the economy. Long term, the problem is entitlements, especially Medicare and Social Security.The pain of further cuts to discretionary programs could bring Mr. Obama to the negotiating table on them by the spring, if not by midsummer, when Congress must once again raise the government's borrowing limit."Because the Democratic-controlled Senate and the president refuse to negotiate, the only way to potentially bring them to the table to negotiate is to go forward with the spending reductions as they are," Mr. Price said.With so many rank-and-file Republicans adamant that they would rather see the cuts stand than raise any taxes, Speaker John A. Boehner finds himself in a bind. Three times this year — on the tax deal to resolve the fiscal cliff, on a measure to suspend the debt ceiling and on a package of Hurricane Sandy relief — he has let legislation pass the House against the votes of a majority of Republicans. In 2011, Republicans accepted caps on military spending as well.Each time, the speaker has promised to stand his ground on the next showdown with the president. That showdown comes this week.Representative Tom Cotton of Arkansas, an Iraq War veteran with combat experience and a rising Republican star, said that the speaker was in a "very tough position" in one-on-one negotiations with the president, and that the opportunity for a grand bargain was gone.
WASHINGTON — The Senate was scheduled to vote Tuesday on whether to consider the embattled nomination of Chuck Hagel as defense secretary, in a move that seems likely to ensure his confirmation this week.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic leader, said he intended to try to end the Republican filibuster of Mr. Hagel, a Republican former senator from Nebraska whose nomination was blocked on Feb. 14.But it remained unclear just how many more obstacles Republicans were willing to throw in his path.If a move to cut off debate on Mr. Hagel's nomination receives the required 60 votes as expected, the Senate could proceed immediately to a final vote if no senator objects.If an objection is raised, Senate rules allow that the final vote can be delayed by at most 30 hours, meaning a vote could not take place until midday Wednesday.For weeks, Mr. Hagel's nomination has been bogged down in the Senate as members of both parties scrutinized his background — demanding answers on everything from his feelings toward Israel and Iran to the income he earned giving speeches after he left the Senate.Opposition to his nomination, which has drawn the Obama administration into an uncomfortable fight with Senate Republicans as it tries to negotiate several other major issues with Congress, has become a galvanizing cause among many conservatives.Independent political groups have mobilized to try to dig up anything unflattering on Mr. Hagel. Though they have not found much, the frenzy has at times resulted in Republican senators throwing out incendiary charges that have stretched the bounds of Senate collegiality, especially considering that Mr. Hagel is a former member of their ranks.Even though many Republicans remain firmly opposed to Mr. Hagel, efforts to filibuster his nomination — a first for a nominee for defense secretary — appear to be winding down. In recent days, senators who were among the most outspoken Republican opponents of Mr. Hagel, including John McCain of Arizona, have indicated that they would vote to end the filibuster this week.And some of them have signaled that they are setting their sights on the next confirmation fight: John Brennan, Mr. Obama's pick for director of the Central Intelligence Agency.
Lackland Rape Victim Talks of Ordeal: Virginia Messick was raped by her training instructor at Lackland Air Force Base in 2011. She is the first Lackland victim to speak publicly, in this exclusive interview with the reporter James Risen.SAN ANTONIO — After her Air Force training instructor raped Virginia Messick, a young recruit, he told her it was fun and they should do it again, she remembers. Then he threw her clothes at her and ordered her to take a shower.Ms. Messick was unable to move, cry or scream. She was a 19-year-old from rural Florida, in her fifth week of basic training at Lackland Air Force Base, and she had just been assaulted by the man the Air Force had entrusted with her life.After the April 2011 attack, Ms. Messick completed basic training, following orders from the instructor for nearly a month more. Afraid of the consequences, she did not tell anyone what he had done. "How am I supposed to go about reporting something," asked Ms. Messick, "when the person I'm supposed to report to is the person who raped me?"Now, after leaving the Air Force, Ms. Messick is the first victim of a still-unfolding sexual assault scandal at Lackland to speak publicly about what she has endured. Since accounts of sexual violence at the base began to surface in late 2011, it has emerged as the largest such episode in Air Force history.Ms. Messick, now 21, is one of 62 trainees identified as victims of assault or other improper conduct by 32 training instructors between 2009 and 2012 at Lackland, a sprawling base outside San Antonio that serves as the Air Force's basic training center for enlisted personnel. So far, seven Air Force instructors have been court-martialed, including Staff Sgt. Luis Walker, now serving a 20-year sentence for crimes involving 10 women, including Ms. Messick. Eight more court-martial cases are pending. Fifteen other instructors are under investigation, and two senior officers have been relieved of command.While Air Force officials say they have taken steps to better protect their most vulnerable personnel, including appointing a female commander to oversee basic training and tightening supervision of instructors, critics say they do not go far enough in addressing an issue across the military: a high rate of sexual assaults that are often not reported because women fear reprisals. None of the victims at Lackland told Air Force officials of the attacks, and the episodes came to light only when a female trainee who had not been assaulted disclosed what she knew.The reforms undertaken by the Air Force do not alter a fundamental fact of military life: commanders have final say over whether criminal charges are brought in military courts, and victims are expected to report crimes to those who oversee their careers.In response to the growing outcry over sexual violence, the Pentagon last year ordered that charging decisions in sexual assault cases be determined by more senior commanders than in the past, but the directive stopped short of taking the decision out of the chain of command. Some other nations, including Britain, have taken steps to create a more independent military judicial system, but experts on military justice said that the United States has been unwilling to do so."The military justice system is not only to judge innocence or guilt, but is also designed to help a commander ensure good order and discipline," said Dwight Sullivan, an appellate defense counsel for the Air Force. "Those things sometimes come into conflict."While more than 3,000 sexual assault cases were reported in 2011 throughout the military services, Leon E. Panetta, the departing defense secretary, has said the real figure could be as high as 19,000. The Defense Department has found that about one in three military women has been sexually assaulted, a rate twice as high as that among civilians."It's no mystery why they don't come forward," said Laurie Leitch, a psychologist who deals with assault cases in the military. "It is like going to your boss to report that you have been sexually assaulted. How realistic is that?"Air Force commanders say they have taken preventive action at Lackland. "There wasn't much supervision," said Maj. Gen. Leonard A. Patrick, who is in charge of the Air Force's enlisted training. "But now we want to put more leadership into the equation, and more accountability."
WASHINGTON — The Senate confirmed Chuck Hagel as defense secretary on Tuesday after he survived a bruising struggle with Republicans. At the same time,President Obama's nominee to be Treasury secretary moved closer to approval with bipartisan support, suggesting that the Republican blockade against the administration's second-term nominees was beginning to ease.After escaping a filibuster from members of his own party, Mr. Hagel, a former Republican senator from Nebraska, prevailed in a 58-to-41 vote — the smallest margin for a defense secretary since the position was created in 1947, according to Senate records. Fifty-two Democrats, two independents and four Republicans backed Mr. Hagel, and 41 Republicans opposed him.The narrow victory raised questions about whether Mr. Hagel would arrive at the Pentagon as a diminished leader as it faces deep budget cuts that are set to take effect on Friday.Hours before the final vote on Mr. Hagel, the Senate Finance Committee approved the nomination of Jacob J. Lewas Treasury secretary on a 19-to-5 vote. Attention is now turning to the coming vote by the Senate Intelligence Committee on the president's nominee as C.I.A. director, John O. Brennan.The chances for Mr. Brennan remained good, though his confirmation was not expected to be entirely smooth, as both Republicans and Democrats have raised objections over the agency's use of drones to kill terrorism suspects. Republicans also see the Brennan vote, like the fight over Mr. Hagel, as leverage to press other issues with the White House.Senator Ron Wyden, Democrat of Oregon, said on Tuesday that he favored a longer confirmation process to force the White House to disclose more about the drone program. "There's an old saw that after somebody is confirmed, they don't even owe you a holiday card," he said. "This is the time for vigilant oversight."Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, has called for similar disclosures on drones and has threatened to use "every procedural option at my disposal" to hold back Mr. Brennan's nomination.Senators John McCainof Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, both Republicans, have threatened to delay the nomination over another issue altogether: the attack last year on the American diplomatic mission in Benghazi, Libya. Both men made similar demands for information during the confirmation of Mr. Hagel, who, unlike Mr. Brennan, has had no role in formulating the Obama administration's defense and national security policies.Even if these efforts serve only to inconvenience the White House and cause the president and his nominees some mild political damage, Republicans say they are satisfied that they are forcing the confirmation process to be more deliberative."Probably the best-known power of the United States Senate is advise and consent," said Senator Lamar Alexander, Republican of Tennessee. "Movies have been made about it, books have been written about it. It's what we do. And we'd be derelict in our duty if we didn't examine the qualification of our president's cabinet."But Democrats said the process, particularly with Mr. Hagel, had hardly been reflective, let alone worthy of the Senate.Senator Barbara Mikulski, Democrat of Maryland, allowed that her Republican colleagues were entitled to ask questions. "But I understand that Jack Lew had 638 questions that he had to answer from one senator," she said. "Now, really? If you don't want the guy or gal, vote against them. But don't drag it out. That's not politics, that's petulance."Republicans in the Senate, joined by an array of conservative activists, waged an all-out campaign to discredit Mr. Hagel, digging into his financial records for evidence that he was paid by anti-American groups and scouring his old speeches for signs that he was hostile to Israel. Those efforts produced little, forcing Republicans to acquiesce after filibustering his nomination in an initial vote this month.But even before Mr. Hagel takes office, questions are growing about whether the fight will wound his ability to lead the Pentagon at a time of upheaval both at home and overseas. With a series of huge budget cuts known as sequestration set to go into effect — cuts that will fall hard on the Defense Department if Congress cannot negotiate a compromise — Mr. Hagel will inherit myriad challenges.The four Republican senators who voted for his confirmation were Thad Cochranof Mississippi, Mike Johanns of Nebraska, Mr. Paul and Richard Shelby of Alabama.Asked at a Defense Department news conference on Tuesday whether Mr. Hagel could still be effective despite the difficult confirmation process, George Little, the Pentagon press secretary, was unambiguous: "Absolutely.""He has spent much of his life in the halls of the United States Congress," Mr. Little said. "He understands the importance of a healthy debate."Privately, even some Democrats said they were concerned. One Congressional official, speaking on the condition of anonymity, said it was alarming that Mr. Hagel was not confirmed with the broad bipartisan support that the Senate usually extends to nominees for defense secretary."This is unprecedented territory," the official said. "He is not just weakened with Republicans. Just think about the Democrats who put their neck out for a Republican nominee for defense secretary. You think it was easy keeping all those Democrats on board? No."Nearly all recent defense secretaries have sailed through their final votes, usually receiving just one or two "no" votes. The exception was John G. Tower, the nominee of President George Bush, defeated in a 47-to-53 floor vote in 1989 amid allegations of alcohol abuse and womanizing.Mr. Hagel was the only nominee for defense secretary to face a filibuster, which Republicans achieved a week and a half ago. On Tuesday, 18 Republicans joined Democrats in voting to cut off debate, while 27 voted to continue the filibuster.As ugly as the clash over Mr. Hagel became, there were some indications that Republicans were moving on. The vote on Tuesday brought to a close an unusually contentious nomination fight, one that surprised many in Washington for how personal and bitter it became, considering that Mr. Hagel worked alongside many of his antagonists until just four years ago.One of those senators, Mr. Shelby, who initially supported the filibuster, said, "I wish him well."
NEWPORT NEWS, Va. — President Obama flew on Tuesday to the vast shipyard where the nation's nuclear-powered aircraft carriers are built to send a warning that automatic cuts in the Pentagon budget, only three days away, threatened the jobs of tens of thousands of workers and America's fragile economic recovery."This work, along with hundreds of thousands of jobs, are currently in jeopardy because of politics in Washington," the president told a crowd of several hundred at Newport News Shipbuilding, which employs 21,000 people in Virginia and is the state's largest industrial employer. "These cuts are wrong. They're not smart. They are not fair. They are a self-inflicted wound that doesn't have to happen."In a sign of the deepening intransigence on both sides, Republicans dismissed Mr. Obama's remarks as political grandstanding and accused him of trying to scare Americans by exaggerating the impact of the cuts. They mocked Mr. Obama's recent trips to sound alarms about the budget cuts as campaign-style events that would not ease the nation's fiscal problems.House Speaker John A. Boehner said the president was using the country's "military men and women as a prop in yet another campaign rally," and showed no willingness to accept Mr. Obama's demands for more revenue by closing tax loopholes. "Spending is the problem, and spending cuts are the solution," Mr. Boehner said on Capitol Hill. "Yes, we should close loopholes, but we should do it as part of tax reform that lowers rates and helps create jobs."But any compromise seemed increasingly elusive and Republican lawmakers appeared divided about how to proceed. Senate Republicans emerged Tuesday from a policy meeting at odds over what they should offer to replace or mitigate across-the-board spending cuts slated to hit Friday, probably postponing a showdown in the Senate on the parties' two approaches.Newport News Shipbuilding is the nation's only builder of the Navy's nuclear-powered carriers and one of only two builders of nuclear-powered submarines. Pentagon officials say the prospect of the automatic cuts, known as the sequester, has delayed the Navy's overhaul of the carrier Abraham Lincoln at the shipyard, and would also delay construction of a future aircraft carrier, the John F. Kennedy. The Navy has already signaled that the cuts would delay the routine deployment of a second carrier to the Persian Gulf region.But Mr. Obama's trip to the shipyard was intended to draw attention to what officials say would have a far bigger financial impact at home — the loss of economic activity and jobs at private companies that do contract work for the military. White House officials said the cuts could cost thousands of jobs at the shipyard and at the many suppliers around the country who provide the raw materials to build the nation's fleet of warships."Already, the uncertainty around these cuts is having an effect," Mr. Obama said. "Companies are starting to prepare for layoff notices. The longer these cuts are in place, the greater the damage."The visit was part of a continuing effort by the Obama administration to dramatize the real-world impact of the budget cuts, which were enacted 18 months ago by both parties as a way of persuading lawmakers to compromise on less onerous ways of reducing the deficit. Joining Mr. Obama on Air Force One for the brief flight from Washington was Representative Scott Rigell, Republican of Virginia, whose district includes Norfolk and parts of Newport News near the shipyard.He told reporters that he agreed with the president on the need for tax increases to go along with spending cuts — a view that splits him from his conservative colleagues."I believe that a position that says we will reject a proposal if it has even a dollar increase in revenue, I don't think that's a wise position and I don't hold that value," Mr. Rigell said, adding he favors getting rid of "lobbyist-inspired, lobbyist-written loopholes. I am in favor of that."But he criticized the president for not offering a specific proposal to resolve the impasse."I think both parties are responsible for where we are now," Mr. Rigell said.The president, however, praised Mr. Rigell at the event, giving him credit for being willing to join Democrats in calling for the closing of tax loopholes rather than letting the automatic spending cuts happen. "That's not always healthy for a Republican, being with me," Mr. Obama said.The president said the budget cuts set to take effect on Friday would severely affect companies that depend on the defense industry and their workers.Although military officials say there will be little visible impact on the country's fighting ability immediately after the cuts begin, they say the damage would build over weeks and months as ground brigades scheduled to go to Afghanistan do not receive the training they need.Military officials have said that within a year it is possible that two-thirds of Army and Marine Corps ground combat brigades would not have been trained or equipped to merit a rating of full readiness. Likewise, Air Force and Navy pilots eventually may not be able to fly the required training hours for readiness certification."This is not a government shutdown," said George Little, the Pentagon press secretary. "But it will start the erosion of our military readiness, and we will soon see impacts to bases and installations around the world."The Defense department has already notified 800,000 civilian employees that they may be subject to temporary furloughs that would require them to take leaves without pay in the remaining seven months of the current budget year.Before his remarks, Mr. Obama toured the sprawling facility, where sections of the John Warner and the Illinois, two Virginia-class submarines, were under construction. The company, which has built more than 800 military ships since it was formed in 1886, has revenues of $3.5 billion per year.
Owning the Past: Women who have just completed an intensive therapy program for veterans in Long Beach, Calif., shared their experiences of sexual trauma in the military, which led to homelessness for some.LOS ANGELES — In the caverns of her memory, Tiffany Jackson recalls the job she held, fleetingly, after leaving the military, when she still wore stylish flats and blouses with butterfly collars and worked in a high-rise with a million-dollar view.Two years later, she had descended into anger and alcohol and left her job. She started hanging out with people who were using cocaine and became an addict herself, huddling against the wind on Skid Row here."You feel helpless to stop it," she said of the cascade of events in which she went from having her own apartment to sleeping in seedy hotels and then, for a year, in the streets, where she joined the growing ranks of homeless female veterans.Even as the Pentagon lifts the ban on women in combat roles, returning servicewomen are facing a battlefield of a different kind: they are now the fastest growing segment of the homeless population, an often-invisible group bouncing between sofa and air mattress, overnighting in public storage lockers, living in cars and learning to park inconspicuously on the outskirts of shopping centers to avoid the violence of the streets.While male returnees become homeless largely because of substance abuse and mental illness, experts say that female veterans face those problems and more, including the search for family housing and an even harder time finding well-paying jobs. But a common pathway to homelessness for women, researchers and psychologists said, is military sexual trauma, or M.S.T., from assaults or harassment during their service, which can lead to post-traumatic stress disorder.Sexual trauma set Ms. Jackson on her path. At first she thought she could put "the incident" behind her: that cool August evening outside Suwon Air Base in South Korea when, she said, a serviceman grabbed her by the throat in the ladies' room of a bar and savagely raped her on the urine-soaked floor. But during the seven years she drifted in and out of homelessness, she found she could not forget.Of 141,000 veterans nationwide who spent at least one night in a shelter in 2011, nearly 10 percent were women, according to the latest figures available from the Department of Housing and Urban Development, up from 7.5 percent in 2009. In part it is a reflection of the changing nature of the American military, where women now constitute 14 percent of active-duty forces and 18 percent of the Army National Guard and the Reserves.But female veterans also face a complex "web of vulnerability," said Dr. Donna L. Washington, a professor of medicine at U.C.L.A. and a physician at the West Los Angeles Veterans Affairs medical center, who has studied the ways the women become homeless, including poverty and military sexual trauma.Female veterans are far more likely to be single parents than men. Yet more than 60 percent of transitional housing programs receiving grants from the Department of Veterans Affairs did not accept children, or restricted their age and number, according to a 2011 report by the Government Accountability Office.The lack of jobs for female veterans also contributes to homelessness. Jennifer Cortez, 26, who excelled as an Army sergeant, training and mentoring other soldiers, has had difficulty finding work since leaving active duty in 2011. She wakes up on an air mattress on her mother's living room floor, beneath the 12 medals she garnered in eight years, including two tours in Iraq. Job listings at minimum wage leave her feeling bewildered. "You think, wow, really?" she said. "I served my country. So sweeping the floor is kind of hard."Not wanting to burden her family, she has lived briefly in her car, the only personal space she has.Some homeless veterans marshal boot-camp survival skills, like Nancy Mitchell, of Missouri, 53, an Army veteran who spent years, off and on, living in a tent."That's how we done it in basic," she said.Of more than two dozen female veterans interviewed by The New York Times,  16 said that they had been sexually assaulted in the service, and another said that she had been stalked. A study by Dr. Washington and colleagues found that 53 percent of homeless female veterans had experienced military sexual trauma, and that many women entered the military to escape family conflict and abuse.For those hoping to better their lives, being sexually assaulted while serving their country is "a double betrayal of trust," said Lori S. Katz, director of the Women's Health Clinic at the V.A. Long Beach Healthcare System and co-founder of Renew, an innovative treatment program for female veterans with M.S.T. Reverberations from such experiences often set off a downward spiral for women into alcohol and substance abuse, depression and domestic violence, she added."It just pulls the skin off you," said Patricia Goodman-Allen, a therapist in North Carolina and former Army Reserve officer who said she once retreated to a mobile home deep in the woods after such an assault.Ms. Jackson won full disability compensation for post-traumatic stress as a disabling aftermath of her sexual trauma, although she was at first denied military benefits.
WASHINGTON — After surviving a long and bruising Senate confirmation battle, Defense SecretaryChuck Hagel started his first day at the Pentagon on Wednesday morning by warning that looming cuts in military spending were one of the biggest challenges facing the Defense Department, but that the United States must continue to "engage with the world."Mr. Hagel did not speak at length about the budget, but the cuts, he said, are coming. "We need to deal with this reality," he told an audience in the Pentagon auditorium.Hours after being sworn in as the 24th defense secretary, Mr. Hagel struck a folksy tone in the roomful of both military and civilian Defense Department employees, with some of the military's top brass populating the front rows.Eschewing the lectern, he walked in front of the audience like a candidate at a town-hall-style meeting and played up his roots as an Army infantryman.He called the United States a "force for good," but said that it should not dictate its agenda to the world and must strive to build alliances among countries with common interests. "We must lead with our allies," said Mr. Hagel, who most recently served as chairman of the Atlantic Council, a centrist foreign policy group.On his first day, Mr. Hagel also received briefings on delicate intelligence and operational matters, met with the civilian secretaries of the armed services, visited the Pentagon's Sept. 11 memorial, and spoke by phone to several members of Congress, George Little, the Pentagon spokesman, said in a statement. Mr. Hagel is also expected to make his first overseas trip as secretary soon.Mr. Hagel, 66, a former two-term Republican senator from Nebraska, will be the first defense secretary in more than a decade to have to preside over deep cuts in the Pentagon's budget, which has ballooned in the years since the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks. Even if automatic budget cuts do not go into effect at the end of the week, Mr. Hagel will still have to find ways to slash billions of dollars in spending by September.Pentagon officials have warned that they may have to furlough up to 800,000 civilian employees; sharply reduce training, including flying hours for pilots; and delay deployment of an aircraft carrier strike group that was bound for the Persian Gulf.In addition to the immense budget challenges, Mr. Hagel faces a steep learning curve in mastering myriad foreign policy challenges facing the Obama administration, including deciding whether to increase aid to the Syrian opposition and confronting Iran over its nuclear program.William S. Cohen, who served as defense secretary in the Clinton administration, said in a telephone interview that Mr. Hagel should "get ready to drink from the fire hose.""He's got to demonstrate that he's up on the issues and has a firm handle on them," Mr. Cohen said. "The next few days, he's going to be putting in 18- to 19-hour days."The Senate confirmed Mr. Hagel in a 58-to-41 vote on Tuesday, with only four Republicans supporting their former colleague. It was the smallest margin for a defense secretary since the position was created in 1947, according to Senate records. He succeedsLeon E. Panetta.It remains to be seen whether the Senate confirmation battle — during which Republican senators accused him of not being tough enough on Iran and criticized past remarks that they said made him seem insufficiently supportive of Israel — has permanently crippled his ability to negotiate the cuts with lawmakers.Mr. Cohen, a former Republican senator from Maine, suggested that over time, and with plenty of one-on-one meetings, Mr. Hagel could forge a working relationship with his critics on Capitol Hill."Personal animosities, to the extent they're there, will be put aside," Mr. Cohen said. "They won't be best friends, but they also don't want to see the country's security compromised."Mr. Hagel said in his remarks that shortly after he was sworn in he visited the Pentagon's memorial to the victims of the Sept. 11 attacks and "reflected a bit on what happened that day." Recalling a phrase once used byWinston Churchill, he called the attacks "a jarring gong" that set in motion more than a decade of war.As a senator, Mr. Hagel became a vocal critic of the Iraq war, and during his confirmation fight he was challenged by Republican senators about his opposition to the troop surge ordered by PresidentGeorge W. Bush.Mr. Hagel did not raise this criticism during his speech on Wednesday, saying only that American foreign policy is fallible."We make mistakes," he said. "We've made mistakes. We'll continue to make mistakes."Mr. Hagel referred to his combat service in Vietnam several times during his remarks, and a soldier who introduced him pointed out that Mr. Hagel "knows the costs of war.""I'll never ask anyone to do anything I wouldn't do," Mr. Hagel said at one point during the speech.Mr. Hagel is the first defense secretary to have served in combat as an enlisted soldier, and he said that at times he still had the mind-set of an infantryman.He joked that while the Army's chief of staff, Gen.Ray Odierno, made him shake a bit, it was the sergeant major of the Army — its highest-ranking enlisted member — who "scares the hell out of me."
FORT MEADE, Md. — Military prosecutors announced on Friday that they had decided to try Pfc. Bradley Manning on the most serious charges they have brought against him and seek a sentence that could be life without parole, despite his voluntary guilty plea to 10 lesser charges that carry a maximum total sentence of 20 years.Private Manning admitted in court on Thursday that he had provided about 700,000 government documents to WikiLeaks, the antisecrecy group, in the most extensive leak of confidential and classified material in American history. But he pleaded guilty to the lesser charges in what is known as a "naked plea" — one made without the usual agreement with prosecutors to cap the potential sentence in return.After the plea, prosecutors and their boss, the commanding general of the Washington Military District, had the option of settling for the 10 charges to which he had admitted his guilt and proceeding directly to sentencing. Instead, they said they would continue with plans for a court-martial beginning June 3, with 141 prosecution witnesses scheduled to testify."Given the scope of the alleged misconduct, the seriousness of the charged offenses, and the evidence and testimony available, the United States intends to proceed with the court-martial to prove Manning committed the charged offenses beyond the lesser charges to which he has already pled guilty," said a statement from the military district.Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military law at Yale, said the prosecutors' decision suggested that they believed that his admissions, as extensive as they were, did not capture the full seriousness of his crimes or guarantee an adequate sentence. Most important, he said, the government wants to deter others from taking advantage of the Internet and portable storage devices to follow his example and leak government secrets on a grand scale."They want to scare the daylights out of other people," Mr. Fidell said.On Thursday, Private Manning, slight and bespectacled and dressed in a crisp Army uniform, was permitted to read a 35-page statement he had written to explain how he came to deliver to WikiLeaks voluminous archives of war reports from Iraq and Afghanistan, detainee assessments from the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, a quarter-million diplomatic cables and video showing helicopter gunships killing civilians in Iraq.His statement allowed him to put on the record his political motives — he said he leaked the material in part "to spark a debate about foreign policy" — which have drawn support from a long list of critics of American policies and open-government advocates around the world. Private Manning may also have won some points with the judge, Col. Denise R. Lind, for not forcing the government to prove that he supplied the documents to WikiLeaks and for acknowledging that he broke the law.But the confession, to the unauthorized possession and transmission of "protected information," appears to have done nothing to alter the government's determination to make an example of him or to limit the sentence he will ultimately serve. The military prosecutors' statement said they would seek to prove all the charges to which Private Manning pleaded not guilty: aiding the enemy, violating the Espionage Act and the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, larceny and the improper use of government information systems.Perhaps the biggest battle in what is expected to be a 12-week trial will be over the prosecutors' attempt to prove the rare charge of aiding the enemy — in the words of the charging document, that Private Manning did "without proper authority, knowingly give intelligence to the enemy, through indirect means." That charge can carry the death penalty, but since prosecutors have ruled that punishment out, he would face a maximum sentence of life without parole if convicted.The government has said that some of the documents that Private Manning gave to WikiLeaks ended up in the hands of Osama bin Laden, and the prosecution and defense sparred on Friday over whether and how that evidence would be presented at trial. Prosecutors said they wanted a witness who participated in the 2011 raid that killed Bin Laden to testify in disguise at the trial.In his testimony on Thursday, Private Manning went out of his way to suggest that while he corresponded online with someone from WikiLeaks who he assumed to be the group's founder, Julian Assange, no one from the organization directed his actions.That could be significant for a continuing federal grand jury investigation of WikiLeaks in Alexandria, Va. Prosecutors are exploring whether Mr. Assange or his associates conspired with Private Manning to break any laws. Mr. Assange, now hiding out in the Ecuadorean Embassy in London to avoid being extradited to Sweden, where the police want to question him about allegations by two women that he committed sexual offenses, has maintained that he merely publishes documents that others provide to the group.Reached by The Associated Press, Mr. Assange called Private Manning a political prisoner and accused the United States of trying to punish critics of its military and foreign policies.
ARLINGTON, Va. — To listen to the human side of sequestration, wait in line here for the 595 bus to Reston, Va., a journey across a suburbia grown fat and happy on a federal spending boom in the past decade, primarily military.While the rest of the country experienced a corrosive recession, unemployment in Arlington County, home of the Pentagon, never rose above 5 percent. Nearby Fairfax County, with a cyberintelligence industry that took off after the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks, gorged on government contracts to private companies."It was easy, and people got comfortable," said Stephen S. Fuller of George Mason University, an expert on the regional economy. "They haven't come to terms with the fact it isn't going to be as easy."The Washington metropolitan area, especially Northern Virginia, is in line to experience the largest economic hit of any region from the $85 billion in spending cuts that President Obama made official late Friday.Because the automatic cuts, known as sequestration, fall unevenly across the country, many Americans are greeting them with a shrug. Their nonchalance is heightened because the 2.4 percent lopped from a federal budget of $3.55 trillion is relatively small and will not happen all at once. Moreover, Congressional Republicans have accused the White House of exaggerating the impact for political gain.But in Northern Virginia the cuts will be deeply felt, economists said, assuming there is no political deal to undo them, a dimming prospect. The White House said the Defense Department would furlough 90,000 civilian employees based in Virginia, the most of any state, reducing their salaries by 20 percent this year.The ripple effect, as those employees pare expenses, put off car purchases and delay buying a home, is expected to be large. Some economists predict that Virginia will slip into recession."No more movies, no more out-to-dinners, no more fun," Robin Roberts, a civilian budget employee in the Defense Department, said as she waited for the 595 outside the Pentagon for the ride home. She and her husband, who is retired, have canceled their summer vacation. They switched to a cheaper phone plan. "It's just pay the mortgage, pay the utilities, no more frills."Americans far from Washington who say government spending is reckless and unsustainable may not shed a tear for its suburban counties, 6 of which are among the 10 richest in the country, according to the census. But that prosperity has largely rained down on government contractors; federal employees, especially younger ones, depend on their middle-class wages."Most of my paycheck goes toward child care," said Sarah Stein, another rider of the 595. "We've cut out what we can cut, and we're going to be in trouble."Ms. Stein's husband lost a job two years ago and now works for much less repairing automobile wheels. Ms. Stein said she earned $64,000 in a civilian Pentagon job and pays $24,000 in child care for her two daughters, ages 3 years and 10 months.The Pentagon has told civilian employees to plan on taking 22 days off without pay. Ms. Stein said she would not be able to save on child care even on the days she is home. "We still have to pay for five days a week, whether we go or not," she said. "People are just very worried."The Center for Regional Analysis estimates that federal spending drives 37 percent of the Northern Virginia economy, largely spending on contractors that soared in the past decade."It was mostly on the war on terrorism," said Dr. Fuller, the director of the center. "It was a spending bubble that made this economy grow two percentage points faster than the national economy."But as the federal government began cutting back two years ago — with foreign wars winding down and Congressional Republicans fighting spending — a regional slowdown that followed may be a taste of the future.Virginia employment rose in December by only 0.8 percent, half the growth in the nation as a whole, said Christine Chmura, an economist in Richmond."If the sequester occurs as it's currently stated, I would expect the state of Virginia to go into a recession," she said.The Pentagon's share of the cuts is the largest of any. Robert F. Hale, an under secretary of defense, said on Feb. 20 that the Pentagon would cut $4 billion to $5 billion through civilian furloughs and $40 billion in purchases from the private sector.Some business owners and people facing furloughs said the cutbacks were manageable, even a good thing. Moe Jafari, whose company Human Touch in McLean does technology work for the military, said he saw a new cost-consciousness in the government that pleased him."They're looking at budgets that are not unlimited," said Mr. Jafari, whose contracting includes work for the Space and Naval Warfare Systems Center in Charleston, S.C. "We see the government for the first time having discussions with us in ways we never thought. They're looking at saving money. They're starting to act like businesses."Even some government employees facing furloughs spoke of the 20 percent dock in salary as a sacrifice to a greater good. "The rest of the country is suffering and needs help; this is the least we can do," said Mort Anvari, a civilian employee of the Army.He and others who said they could manage their lower earnings were older, with savings and without children to support.Mary Ann Fontana, who works for the secretary of the Air Force, said, "We older ones feel — at least I do — to help the country, it's fine." But "the real worry are the young ones," she added, lower on the government pay scale and living paycheck to paycheck.Matthew Bourke, a public affairs specialist with the Army, fits that description. He is looking for a part-time job to make up the loss to his salary. "I'm talking the restaurant business, a server, a food runner, anything," he said."If you know something, let me know," he said before jumping on his bus.
ARLINGTON, Va. — Older women in hoop skirts and petticoats came together with youthful sailors in their dress blues for a rare public double interment at Arlington National Cemetery on Friday.After a chapel service that included remarks by the secretary of the Navy, Ray Mabus, more than 500 people, including regiments of Civil War re-enactors and teenagers in camouflage-patterned pants, watched as the coffins, carried by horse-drawn wagon, were prepared for burial by a 76-member ceremonial guard.The dead were two unidentified sailors from the ironclad warship Monitor, buried with full military honors 150 years after their ship sank during a storm off the coast of Cape Hatteras, N.C."This may well be the last time we bury Navy personnel who fought in the Civil War at Arlington," Mr. Mabus said. "But we do not hesitate to keep faith and to honor this tradition, even more than 150 years after the promise was made."The flags over the sailors' coffins had 50 stars, not the 34 they fought under. And their bones, a Navy official said, were covered with contemporary dress blues.The funeral was inspired by an enduring fascination with the sunken ironclad, which is credited with helping save the Union in the Civil War, as well as the military's pledge to leave no one behind.It was also a reminder that family ties, however tenuous, are reinforced as much by narrative as by science."I've had relatives who served in World War I, World War II," said Pete Gullo, a descendent of Jacob Nicklis, whose body may have been one of those interred. "For some reason — and it shouldn't be, because he's farther back in time — it's almost like a more direct connection."Of the 16 men who went down with the Monitor on Dec. 31, 1862, researchers have narrowed the identities of the two sailors to six possibilities. While there are no conclusive DNA matches with their descendants, forensic researchers are convinced that they will eventually find these men's stories in their bones.Getting to know the six has helped some descendants feel a deeper sense of the sacrifice. Mr. Gullo, 47, has never served in the military, but he has thought about how Mr. Nicklis might have felt, drowning in the ship's turret."What was it like to suffer through that kind of very physical event?" he said.The Monitor was a technological marvel that took the sailing — and in many ways, the sailor — out of sea warfare. It survived the world's first battle between two ironclads, fending off a much larger Rebel warship that threatened to destroy much of the Union fleet. But the Monitor's glory was short-lived."It's the irony of the ship that saved the Union," said David Alberg, superintendent of the Monitor National Marine Sanctuary. "Ten months later, it was lost in a storm."In early 1862, the 62 or 63 crew members knew they were signing up for an experiment that the whole Union was watching, volunteering to be submerged astronauts in a 19th-century arms race. John Ericsson's design was unlike the wooden steamships and sailboats of the day, and only about two feet of the deck was above the water line.Compared with the 44-gun frigates that were dominant, the Monitor was small, less than 180 feet long. It had only two guns, though with an innovation still used today: the turret rotated. The South's ironclad, the Virginia, was a Frankenstein — the salvaged hull of a destroyed Union ship, the Merrimack, 270 feet long with 10 guns.By the time the Monitor left Brooklyn and arrived in Hampton Roads in 1862, the Virginia had already destroyed two Union frigates. The clash between the ironclads, on March 9, 1862, was deemed a draw, but the nimble Monitor successfully stopped the Confederate naval advance."For the Union, she was a symbol of American ingenuity," said Anna Holloway, the curator of the U.S.S. Monitor Center at the Mariners Museum in Newport News, Va.For much of history, the Monitor's significance has overshadowed those who lived and died on it. "It's this real abstract notion," Ms. Holloway said, "and that's compounded by the fact that most of the imagery of the battle doesn't show people."
WASHINGTON — The debate goes to the heart of a deeply rooted American suspicion about the government, the military and the surveillance state: the specter of drones streaking through the skies above American cities and towns, controlled by faceless bureaucrats and equipped to spy or kill.That Big Brother imagery — conjured up by Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky during a more than 12-hour filibuster this week — has animated a surprisingly diverse swath of political interests that includes mainstream civil liberties groups, Republican and Democratic lawmakers, conservative research groups, liberal activists and right-wing conspiracy theorists.They agree on little else. But Mr. Paul's soliloquy has tapped into a common anxiety on the left and the right about the dangers of unchecked government. And it has exposed fears about ultra-advanced technologies that are fueled by the increasingly fine line between science fiction and real life.Drones have become the subject of urgent policy debates in Washington as lawmakers from both parties wrangle with President Obama over their use to prosecute the fight against terrorism from the skies above countries like Pakistan and Yemen.But they are also a part of the popular culture — toys sold by Amazon; central plot points in "Homeland" and a dozen other television shows and movies; the subject of endless macabre humor, notably by The Onion; and even the subject of poetry. ("Ode to the MQ-9 Reaper," a serious work by the Brooklyn poet Joe Pan that was just published in the journal Epiphany, describes the drone as "ultra-cool & promo slick, a predatory dart" that is "as self-aware as silverware.")Benjamin Wittes, a national security scholar at the Brookings Institution who has written extensively about drones, said he thought Mr. Paul's marathon was a "dumb publicity stunt." But he said it had touched a national nerve because the technology, with its myriad implications, had already deeply penetrated the culture."Over the last year or so, this thing that was the province of a small number of technologists and national security people has exploded into the larger public consciousness," Mr. Wittes said.On the right, Mr. Paul has become an overnight hero since his filibuster. Self-proclaimed defenders of the Constitution have shouted their approval on Twitter, using the hashtag #StandWithRand and declaring him to be a welcomed member of their less-is-better-government club."The day that Rand Paul ignited Liberty's Torch inside the beltway!" one Tea Party activist wrote on Twitter. "May it never be extinguished!"But even as the right swooned, the left did, too. Senator Ron Wyden of Oregon — the only Democrat to join Mr. Paul's filibuster — said the unexpected array of political forces was just the beginning, especially as Congress and the public face the new technologies of 21st-century warfare."I believe there is a new political movement emerging in this country that's shaking free of party moorings," Mr. Wyden said. "Americans want a better balance between protecting our security and protecting our liberty."P. W. Singer, whose 2009 book "Wired for War: The Robotics Revolution and Conflict in the 21st Century" anticipated the broad impact of drones, said he believed they had shaken up politics because they were "a revolutionary technology, like the steam engine or the computer.""The discussion doesn't fall along the usual partisan lines," he said. The dozen states that have passed laws restricting drones do not fall into conventional red-blue divisions, nor do the score of states competing to be the site of the Federal Aviation Administration's test sites for drones.The serious issues raised by the government's lethal drones seem inextricably mixed with the ubiquitous appearance of the technology in art, commerce and satire.A four-minute video by the Air Force Research Laboratory on "micro aerial vehicles" shows a futuristic bee-size drone flying in an open window and taking out an enemy sniper with a miniature explosive payload. Since it was posted in 2009, it has been viewed hundreds of thousands of times and reposted all over the Web.When Amazon advertised a six-inch model of the Predator, made by Maisto, in its toy section, people wrote politically charged mock reviews that became Internet hits: "This goes well," one reviewer wrote, "with the Maisto Extraordinary Rendition playset, by the way — which gives you all the tools you need to kidnap the family pet and take him for interrogation at a neighbor's house, where the rules of the Geneva Convention may not apply. Loads of fun!"Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, was not laughing Thursday when he took to the Senate floor to chastise Mr. Paul and defend the use of drones. In an interview with The Huffington Post, Mr. McCain dismissed Mr. Paul and the other critics of drones as "the wacko birds on right and left that get the media megaphone."But the issue is larger than Mr. Paul, whose ambitions may include a run for the presidency in 2016. For many, Mr. Paul gave voice to the dangers they whisper about to anyone who will listen: that the government is too powerful to be left unchecked."It's not merely the black helicopter crowd of the folks on the far right," said Mark Potok, a senior fellow at the Southern Poverty Law Center, which tracks extremist groups. "What Rand Paul had to say about drones absolutely fired up conspiracy theorists on the left as well as the right."Human Rights Watch plans to join other groups next month in starting an effort called the Campaign to Stop Killer Robots. The technology, fully autonomous weapons that are still at the drawing-board stage, would find and fire at their programmed targets without requiring a human being to pull the trigger.Some national security experts find the campaign overwrought, but Mary Wareham, the advocacy director for the arms division of Human Rights Watch, noted that the Defense Department in November issued a policy directive on autonomous weapons that recognized the challenges they pose.At the same time, there are people like Everett Wilkinson, a Tea Party organizer and self-proclaimed conspiracy theorist in Florida, who is hailing Mr. Paul as a "rock star for the Constitution." On Mr. Wilkinson's Web site, Liberty.com, he warns that the United States government is building "internment camps" for political dissidents. He is wary of what comes next."First they said we are just going to use drones to observe stuff, and then they put Hellfire missiles on them," Mr. Wilkinson said. "How soon are we going to have drones overhead with Tasers on them?"In Washington, Code Pink, a leftist group of antiwar activists, showed up with flowers and chocolates at Mr. Paul's Senate offices on Thursday to thank him for standing up against abuses of power. Known around Capitol Hill mainly for disrupting Congressional hearings, the group had found a new champion."People say: 'Oh, my God, Code Pink is praising Rand Paul. Hell has frozen over!' " said Medea Benjamin, a co-founder of the group. "But we were glued to C-Span to the bitter end of the filibuster. We were amazed to see the education of the public that was taking place, and that has never occurred before."
WASHINGTON — At a time when $46 billion in mandatory budget cuts are causing anxiety at the Pentagon, administration officials see one potential benefit: there may be an opening to argue for deep reductions in programs long in President Obama 's sights, and long resisted by Congress.On the list are not only base closings but also an additional reduction in deployed nuclear weapons and stockpiles and a restructuring of the military medical insurance program that costs more than America spends on all of its diplomacy and foreign aid around the world. Also being considered is yet another scaling back in next-generation warplanes, starting with the F-35, the most expensive weapons program in United States history.None of those programs would go away. But inside the Pentagon, even some senior officers are saying that the reductions, if done smartly, could easily exceed those mandated by sequestration, as the cuts are called, and leave room for the areas where the administration believes more money will be required.These include building drones, developing offensive and defensive cyberweapons and focusing on Special Operations forces.Publicly, at least, Mr. Obama has not backed any of those cuts, even though he has deplored the "dumb" approach of simply cutting every program in the military equally.Mr. Obama will visit Capitol Hill on Tuesday in another attempt to persuade lawmakers to reach a long-term deficit-reduction deal and replace the indiscriminate cuts with more targeted ones.Still, Pentagon officials are starting to examine targeted ways to cut their budget. "What we've learned in the past year is that the politics of dumb cuts is easy, because no one has to think through the implications of slicing everything by 8 percent," said one senior defense official who has been deeply involved in the planning process. "The politics of cutting individual programs is as hard as it's always been."When Mr. Obama took office four years ago, with the Iraq and Afghanistan wars raging, deep cuts in the defense budget seemed unthinkable. He forced the Pentagon to cut nearly $50 billion a year, which was regarded by many as huge.But today, deficit hawks outnumber defense hawks on Capitol Hill, and the possibility of $100 billion or more in additional annual cuts does not seem outrageous — if only agreement were possible on which programs should shrink fastest.Last week, a group of five former deputy defense secretaries — essentially the Pentagon's chief operating officers — called for a "bottom up" review that reassesses the need for each major program and weapons system, saying this was an opportunity to accomplish cuts that have long been delayed, after a decade in which the American national security budget has nearly doubled.In their more candid moments — almost always when speaking with a guarantee of anonymity — the Pentagon's top civilian and military leaders acknowledge that the painful sequestration process may ultimately prove beneficial if it forces the Defense Department and Congress to reconsider the cost of cold-war-era systems that are still in inventory despite the many changes made to the military in the last 10 years."Sequester is an ugly experience, but it could grow up to be a budget discipline swan," said Gordon Adams, a former senior budget official in the Clinton administration who is now at the Stimson Center, which studies defense issues. "It could provide the planning discipline the services and the building have been missing since 2001."The central challenge facing the Pentagon and the White House, Mr. Adams and several current senior officials said, is this: All the big, immediate budget benefits come from reducing the size of active-duty forces. By contrast, cutting new weapons systems and bases and reducing health care costs can save large amounts 5 to 10 years out, but it does little in the short term.Mr. Obama took a step in that direction in 2011, when he rejected a Pentagon request for a permanent standing force of 100,000 or so troops for future "contingency operations" like those in Iraq and Afghanistan. "That's not the way we are going to go," he told his staff after the request was received.The message quickly got back to the Pentagon that Mr. Obama had no interest in repeating the kind of lengthy interventions that have consumed more than $3 trillion since the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001.But the Pentagon's subsequent agreement to cut $500 billion in planned spending over a decade turns out to have been just a start, and military officials are now abandoning the phrase that they will have to "do more with less" and starting to assess what it would mean to just do less.
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel is beginning an internal review of a decision by a senior Air Force commander to overturn the sexual assault conviction of an Air Force fighter pilot, he said in a letter to top lawmakers made public Monday.Mr. Hagel's decision to intervene comes amid mounting criticism from Congress as well as outside advocacy groups of the Pentagon's handling of a series of high-profile sexual assault cases in the military. In particular, critics have complained about the power of commanders to unilaterally dismiss criminal charges or convictions without explanation, which they say makes it less likely that women in the military will report sexual assaults for fear of retaliation.Mr. Hagel said he would review the decision by Lt. Gen. Craig A. Franklin, the commander of the Third Air Force, to dismiss the sexual assault conviction of Lt. Col. James Wilkerson, a pilot who was also the inspector general of the 31st Fighter Wing at Aviano Air Base in Italy. Colonel Wilkerson was found guilty in November of aggravated sexual assault and was sentenced to one year in military prison. General Franklin's decision to overturn the findings of the court-martial freed Colonel Wilkerson, and allowed him to be reinstated in the Air Force.In a March 7 letter to Senator Barbara Boxer, a California Democrat, and Senator Jeanne Shaheen, a New Hampshire Democrat, Mr. Hagel said that while General Franklin's decision could not be overturned, he had asked Pentagon lawyers and the secretary of the Air Force to review the way in which General Franklin decided the case. He also said he wanted a review of whether the military should change the way it handles sexual assault cases.The furor over Colonel Wilkerson's case comes as the issue of sexual assaults in the military has been gaining prominence because of a recent string of scandals. The most wide-ranging case involves the Air Force's basic training program at Lackland Air Force Base in Texas, where 62 trainees were the victims of assault or other inappropriate actions by their instructors between 2009 and 2012. So far, 32 training instructors at Lackland have been charged, convicted or investigated in connection with the scandal.On Wednesday, a Senate Armed Services subcommittee plans to hold a hearing on sexual assaults in the military, the first Senate hearing on the issue in nearly a decade, and Colonel Wilkerson's case is expected to be one of the focuses of the hearing.The Wilkerson case has gained attention because it highlights what critics say is one of the biggest problems in how the military justice system handles sexual assault cases. In the system, senior commanders decide whether criminal charges are brought against military personnel, and even after charges are brought, the commanders also have the ability to veto the findings of a court-martial. That means the military justice system lacks the independence of the civilian law enforcement and judicial systems. For women who have been sexually assaulted, it means that their bosses decide whether charges are brought against their assailants, and that information about their assaults is shared in their workplaces.Several women in the military have complained about the commanders' control of the legal process. Last year, the secretary of defense, Leon E. Panetta, said that while there were 3,191 reported cases of sexual assault in the military in 2011, the actual number of episodes was believed to be as high as 19,000, because most women do not report the assaults.General Franklin's decision to overturn Colonel Wilkerson's conviction by a jury came after Colonel Wilkerson had failed a polygraph examination concerning the offenses, according to several people close to the case. General Franklin did not check with the victim before making his decision to dismiss the case, for which he has not given a detailed public explanation, and instead tried to promote Colonel Wilkerson and give him a new command, according to people familiar with the case.General Franklin "was looking for a way to show the pilot community he had their backs," said one person familiar with the case.Documents obtained in connection with Colonel Wilkerson's case also provide a glimpse into the fighter pilot culture of the Air Force that some women say encourages misogynistic behavior. In a personal e-mail he wrote while he was at Aviano in November 2011, Colonel Wilkerson, who had recently been named the inspector general of the Air Force's 31st Fighter Wing, describes his own behavior in a confrontation with military police. The e-mail, filled with bravado, expletives and fighter pilot jargon, describes an incident in which Colonel Wilkerson and other fighter pilots burned a couch in the middle of the base and then barked at the police and pulled rank to get them to back down when they came to investigate.He wrote to another pilot that he deserved an award for helping ensure "the ability for the bros to either continue their merriment or skip away without notice." He added that he cared "about bros and traditions," and that he wanted to be remembered by his fellow pilots as someone who is "willing to stand up to the man, flip him the most wary of middle fingers, and then daring him to touch it."The couch-burning incident was a small matter, but Colonel Wilkerson's belligerent treatment of the military security personnel who responded to the fire was considered more serious. The day after the incident, Colonel Wilkerson was dressed down by his commander, and the incident came back to haunt him during his trial, according to a person close to the case. After he attempted to provide evidence about his good military character, prosecutors were able to enter evidence about other incidents, including the couch-burning matter. Colonel Wilkerson's lawyer, Frank Spinner, did not respond to a request for comment.
WASHINGTON — Choking back tears and in voices edged with rage, two women and a man who served in the American military told a Senate panel on Wednesday how they were raped by superiors and then ridiculed or ignored by military officials from whom they sought help.The three former service members, the first military sexual assault victims to testify before a Senate panel, described a pervasive culture of harassment and danger in which victims had little or no redress.One spoke of a rape she endured during her first months of service, and another told of a sergeant who stripped naked and danced on a table during an official sexual harassment training session. After spending a year repeatedly harassed, Rebekah Havrilla, a former Army sergeant deployed to Afghanistan from 2006 to 2007, was raped by a superior a week before returning home."I chose not to do a report of any kind because I had no faith in my chain of command," Ms. Havrilla said. When she sought help from an Army chaplain, she said, he told her "the rape was God's will" and urged her to go to church.The hearing, the first the Senate has held in nearly a decade on sexual assault in the military, reflects the increasing attention to the issue because of revelations about pervasive sexual harassment at Lackland Air Force Base in Texas and throughout the military.The Pentagon estimates that roughly 19,000 service members are assaulted annually. A small fraction of the incidents are reported because most victims fear retaliation or ruined careers, and only about 10 percent of those cases go trial. One in three convicted military sex offenders remain in the service, something many policy makers want immediately corrected."The issue of sexual violence in the military is not new, and it has been allowed to go on in the shadows for far too long," said Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, who convened the hearing as chairman of the Senate Armed Services personnel subcommittee.Ms. Gillibrand delivered a blistering attack on the military for its handling of sexual assault cases: "Congress would be derelict in its duty of oversight if we just shrugged our shoulders at these 19,000 sons and daughters, husbands and wives, mothers and fathers, and did nothing. We simply have to do better by them."The focus on the topic, which Ms. Gillibrand chose for the personnel subcommittee's first hearing in the current Congress, also demonstrates the tenaciousness of the women on the Senate Armed Services Committee, now at a record seven, who have worked to bring sexual misconduct in the military to public attention.For several hours the three service members told stories with remarkably similar details to the senators and scores of military and other observers at the hearing. The three said they either hid their assaults or were subjected to further humiliations, distrust or protracted stabs at justice when they reported them."I no longer have any hope that the military chain of command will consistently prosecute, convict, sentence and carry out the sentencing of sexual predators in uniform," said BriGette McCoy, who was raped in 1988 when she was 18 years old and stationed in Germany.The testimony of victims is "highly significant," said Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine, who from her seat on the Armed Services Committee in 2004 grilled Gen. George W. Casey Jr., then a top commander in Iraq, on the issue."One reason it has been so difficult to move forward against sexual assault in spite of commitments in the Senate is because we've not put a human face on this," Ms. Collins said. "The victims make the violence very real and compel you to act."Many members of the committee said they would like to see all sex offenders in the military discharged from service and would like to replace the current system of adjudicating sexual assault by taking it outside a victim's chain of command. The senators focused in particular on a recent decision by an Air Force general to reverse a guilty verdict in a sexual assault case with little explanation.Military officials who testified appeared both chastened and defensive."The Air Force has zero tolerance for this offense," said Lt. Gen. Richard Harding, the judge advocate general of the Air Force, who testified later in the day.General Harding declined to address whether justice had been served in certain cases brought to his attention by Ms. Gillibrand. She then told the military officials that she was "extremely disturbed that each of you believes that the convening authority is what maintains discipline and order within your ranks."In the military, a "convening authority" is a commander in charge of the military justice system within his or her own ranks. As an example, the "convening authority" could be a commander of a victim's base or unit."If that is your view I don't know how you can say having 19,000 sexual assaults and rapes a year is discipline and order," Ms. Gillibrand said. "I appreciate the work you are doing, I honestly do, but it's not enough. And if you think you are achieving discipline and order with your current convening authority framework I am sorry to say you are wrong."One victim, Brian K. Lewis, a former petty officer in the Navy, said he wanted to bring attention to male victims of sexual assault, who he said were often overlooked. Mr. Lewis testified that he was raped in 2000 by a superior officer, and when his command learned of the crime, "I was misdiagnosed as having a personality disorder."
WASHINGTON — For more than three decades, the Republican Party brand has been deeply tied to a worldview in which the aggressive use of American power abroad is both a policy imperative and a political advantage.Now, a new generation of Republicans like Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky is turning inward, questioning the approach that reached its fullest expression after the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, and signaling a willingness to pare back the military budgets that made it all possible.That holds the potential to threaten two wings of a Republican national security establishment that have been warring for decades: the internationalists who held sway under the elder President George Bush and the neoconservatives who led the country to long and costly wars in Iraq and Afghanistan under President George W. Bush.Members of both camps said this week that they fear returning to a minimalist foreign policy, as articulated in different ways by Mr. Paul, Senator Mike Lee of Utah and Representative Justin Amash of Michigan. The foreign policy hawks fear it would lead to a diminished role for America in an increasingly unstable world. And they worry about their party losing its firm grasp of what has traditionally been a winning issue."A real challenge for the Republicans as they approach 2016 is what will be their brand?" said Richard N. Haass, the president of the Council on Foreign Relations and a former aide to the first President Bush. "The reason Rand Paul is gaining traction is overreaching in Iraq. What he is articulating represents an alternative to both."The split in the party was on display in muted terms here on Thursday at the opening session of the Conservative Political Action Conference when Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a possible presidential candidate in 2016, expressed concern about a return to isolationism. Without mentioning Mr. Paul directly, Mr. Rubio said that the United States "can't solve every war" but added that "we also can't be retreating from the world."Moments later, Mr. Paul told the conference that the filibuster he conducted last week over the Obama administration's drone policy was aimed at the limits on presidential power and American power abroad. "No one person gets to decide the law," he said.Some Republicans are so nervous about the positions championed by Mr. Paul and his supporters that they have begun talking about organizing to beat back primary challenges from what Dan Senor, a veteran of the younger Mr. Bush's team of foreign policy advisers, described as a push to reorient the party toward a "neo-isolationist" foreign policy. That policy, Mr. Senor said, "is sparking discussions among conservative donors, activists and policy wonks about creating a political network to support internationalist Republicans."But in Mr. Paul and the Tea Party, Republicans face a philosophical disagreement from within their ranks. Senator John McCain of Arizona, who is his party's most prominent spokesman for an aggressive foreign policy, recently dismissed Mr. Paul and those who agree with him as "wacko birds."But other party leaders are rushing to embrace Mr. Paul and Tea Party Republicans as they build coalitions of young voters who dislike the foreign wars and the cost of fighting them. Those voters may be a key to winning back the White House in 2016.After Mr. Paul's 13-hour filibuster last week, leading Republican figures heaped praise on the freshman senator. Senator Ted Cruz of Texas and Mr. Lee joined the filibuster, offering their ideological support for his cause. Reince Priebus, chairman of the Republican Party, said Mr. Paul "was able to capture some national attention in standing up to the president. My view is that he is an important voice in our party."Mr. Haass said Republican leaders are beginning to recognize the electoral power appeal among some voters to Mr. Paul's foreign policy views."Some of what Rand Paul says resonates," he said. "Either party that ignores it does so at its peril. On the other hand, one does not simply want to embrace it because it goes too far."Mr. Paul calls himself a "realist, not a neoconservative nor an isolationist." But his view of America resembles that of his father, former Representative Ron Paul, who built a deeply committed following of libertarians and Tea Party Republicans by opposing most American involvement overseas.
WASHINGTON — Seven Marines were killed and several others were injured when a mortar round unexpectedly exploded during a live-fire training exercise at a weapons depot in western Nevada, the military said Tuesday.The cause of the accident, which occurred around 10 p.m. Monday at the Hawthorne Army Depot, is under investigation, said Capt. Binford Strickland, a Marine Corps spokesman. Troops are often sent to the Hawthorne depot before being deployed to the war in Afghanistan.The names of the Marines, members of the Second Marine Division, an expeditionary ground combat unit based at Camp Lejeune, N.C., have not been released by the military.While many details remained unclear, a Marine Corps official who spoke on the condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to speak to the news media said the Marines had been training with a 60-millimeter mortar when the accident occurred. It is not known whether the mortar round exploded prematurely inside its firing tube, whether it detonated among Marines after being fired or whether more than a single round exploded.Later on Tuesday, the Marine Corps suspended the use of 60-millimeter mortars and their associated firing tubes in all training and operations worldwide until an inquiry into the episode is completed, according to a Marine spokeswoman, Capt. Kendra N. Motz.The mortars, which are used to support ground troops, are normally operated by a three-person squad. But during training missions, an instructor and others often huddle around as a mortar is loaded and fired.The depot, on 150,000 acres of desert about 100 miles southeast of Reno, is one of the sites used by the military to store, dispose and recycle conventional ammunition, according to the depot's Web site. More recently, it has been used to train troops for Afghanistan because the terrain is similar to many parts of the country, where American troops have been fighting since late 2001."We send our prayers and condolences to the families of Marines involved in this tragic incident," Maj. Gen. Raymond C. Fox, the commanding general of the Second Marine Expeditionary Force, said in a statement. "We remain focused on ensuring that they are supported through this difficult time. We mourn their loss, and it is with heavy hearts we remember their courage and sacrifice."After the accident, nine Marines were taken to Renown Regional Medical Center in Reno. One of the men later died, while three were listed in serious condition and five were in fair condition, said Mark Earnest, a hospital spokesman. The injuries to the men, all under 30, included penetrating trauma, fractures and vascular injuries, he said.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic leader, announced news of the accident on Tuesday morning on the Senate floor. "My heart goes out to the families of those who lost their lives," he said. "And my sympathies are with their fellow Marines, who are also grieving this loss."
QUANTICO, Va. — Three staff members of the Marines ' officer training school are dead after a gunman killed himself and two colleagues, a man and a woman, officials said on Friday.The shootings took place inside a barracks, Taylor Hall, on the sprawling Marine Corps base here, said the base commander, Col. David W. Maxwell.The names of the dead were not immediately released, nor did Colonel Maxwell suggest a motive, pending what he said would be "a lengthy investigation."Other officials said the episode was not thought to be a mass shooting or terrorist attack.An official identified the gunman as a sergeant, the male victim as a corporal and the female victim as a lance corporal. The victims, subordinate in rank to the gunman, were most likely in support roles at the school and not involved in training officer candidates, the official said. He would not speculate on a motive but did not rule out that a romantic triangle may have contributed."It's been a long night," Colonel Maxwell told reporters outside the base before dawn. The shooting was reported about 10:30 p.m. on Thursday, and the authorities responded within minutes, Colonel Maxwell said. Security was tightened throughout the base, with residents alerted by its "giant voice" public address system to remain in their homes with locked doors.A 2 a.m., the base Facebook page said a suspect had barricaded himself, but Colonel Maxwell later said that there had been no standoff.A Twitter message from the base's official account announced a "Code Green" around 2:30 a.m., with "all normal activities cleared to resume."The gunman and the female victim were found dead inside a room in the Taylor Hall barracks, said Sgt. Christopher Zahn, a spokesman for the base. The male victim was found earlier at a different location in the same hall.The mood was somber on and near the base on Friday, with many people describing the Marine Corps as a close-knit community despite its global mission, one already saddened this week by the deaths of seven Marines in an explosion at a weapons depot in Nevada. Officials are investigating the cause of the accident after a mortar round unexpectedly exploded on Monday night during a training exercise."It's a sad moment that lives, once again, are taken and families are going to be hurt," said Jeff Dandridge, a bus driver who lives just outside the main entrance to the base, which is spanned by a sign reading "Quantico: Crossroads of the Marine Corps."Marine Corps Base Quantico, about 35 miles from Washington, is the heart of officer training for the corps and includes not just the Officer Candidates School, where the shootings took place, but also the Basic School for newly minted officers, the Marine Corps War College and the Marine Corps Command and Staff College.Officer Candidates School is boot camp for college graduates who are vying to become officers, and graduates are commissioned as second lieutenants. Much of their time at the school is spent on physical training, as well as classroom work in leadership, basic military skills like land navigation, and military history.Much of the training at the school is conducted by sergeants, and Marine Corps officials said the gunman might have had some limited role as a trainer.At the nearby Stars and Stripes Cafe, Dave Branham and Mack McLaurin, civilian employees of the base on their lunch break, said a sense of vulnerability and loss was pervasive."Something like this shows our community, the Quantico community of Marines, is not immune from acts of violence against other human beings," Mr. Branham said.
WASHINGTON — Hundreds of thousands of Defense Department civilian employees will get a partial reprieve from the work furloughs imposed by the automatic across-the-board spending cuts known as the sequester, with their number of unpaid days off reduced to 14 from 22 between now and October.Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel made the announcement at a Pentagon news conference on Thursday, when he made clear his pleasure at being able to lessen the fiscal penalty on a civilian work force of about 800,000 people. Up to 80 percent of those employees could fall under the reduced furloughs.But the defense secretary also warned that remaining budget reductions still threaten military readiness.The decision to decrease the furlough days was made possible by a compromise spending bill negotiated on Capitol Hill and signed this week. The budget gives the Defense Department and the military more freedom to shift money within Pentagon accounts to more efficiently manage the automatic cuts. Mr. Hagel said the Pentagon's reductions under the new bill would be about $41 billion, down from the previous estimates of $46 billion. Even so, the Defense Department's accounts for military operations and maintenance will face a shortage of at least $22 billion this fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30."We're going to have to deal with that reality, and that means we're going to have to prioritize and make some cuts and do what we got to do," Mr. Hagel said.To meet the spending decrease, he said, the Pentagon will sharply cut payments for operating its bases in the United States as well as reduce training for troops — but only for those troops not preparing to deploy overseas into combat.At the same news conference, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, noted that the spending reductions being imposed on the Pentagon are not the deepest in history, but they are the swiftest because they are being imposed halfway through the fiscal year. "It's the steepest decline in our budget ever," General Dempsey said.He said that by Monday, the Defense Department will have spent 80 percent of its operating funds under the reduced spending plan."We don't yet have a satisfactory solution to that shortfall, and we're doing everything we can to stretch our readiness out," General Dempsey said. He described a process in which the Defense Department "will have to trade, at some level and to some degree, our future readiness for current operations."In layman's terms, that means that to support the fighting force today, money will have to be diverted from preparing for conflict in the years ahead."It will cost us more eventually in both money and time to recover in the years to come," General Dempsey said. "We'll be trying to recover lost readiness at the same time that we're trying to reshape the force. We can do it, but that's the uncomfortable truth."
QUANTICO, Va. — A group of Marine second lieutenants, all men, stood before the ropes on an obstacle course. They looked exhausted, though the day was far from done. One by one, they took their shots at scaling the line. One by one, most of them dropped short of the top. They were already three hours behind the front-runners in their class.Behind them, two more Marines, both women, prepared to start the course. One, a former enlisted Marine who was shivering in the 40-degree breeze, tried repeatedly to surmount the first bar, but failed. The second, a recent Naval Academy graduate, did better, meticulously, sometimes ingeniously, working her way through many of the obstacles.But as she was determinedly attempting the ropes, a captain walked briskly up to deliver bad news: Neither woman had met a time limit. Silently, they shouldered their packs and trudged into the woods, their chances of becoming the first women to complete the Marine Corps' demanding Infantry Officer Course summarily ended on its arduous first day on Thursday. (Twelve of the 108 men also were dropped that day.)And that closed the latest chapter in the effort to integrate women into Marine Corps ground combat units, a sweeping change ordered by the former secretary of defense, Leon E. Panetta, in January when he lifted a 1994 ban on women serving in direct combat.The commandant of the Marine Corps, Gen. James F. Amos, has said he is confident that women can begin joining some combat jobs, including in tank and artillery units, by early next year. But with infantry — the foot warriors who since ancient times have been called upon to march across hills and deserts, carry heavy weight and bear the brunt of fighting and death — the corps is proceeding with much caution.General Amos has said he will use the Infantry Officer Course to study how women handle the rigors of infantry training, hoping to observe 92 volunteers by 2016, when the corps must make recommendations on whether women can join the infantry. (Reaching 92 may be hard, however: the corps produces only 156 female officers a year, and only about one in 10 have volunteered to attend the course, so far, though Marine Corps officials say they expect the number to rise.)Last fall, the first two female volunteers failed to complete the course. One, a distance runner, was dropped on the first day, known as the Combat Endurance Test. The second, a soccer player, endured for over a week before instructors pulled her out because of a stress fracture in her foot. Both are now training for non-infantry jobs.In Quantico, concerns run deep among some staff members that pressure to accommodate women will lead to a softening of the Marine Corps' tough standards. Col. Todd S. Desgrosseilliers, commander of the Basic School, which includes the Infantry Officer School and the Basic Officer Course, said that would not happen."They are gender-neutral now," he said of the standards. "They aren't hard to be hard. These are the things they need to be able to do to be infantry officers."The 86-day Infantry Officer Course, which was started in 1977 by Vietnam combat veterans, is viewed with special reverence within the corps, the most infantry-centric of the armed services. Though its students tend to be top performers in basic officer training, more than one in five are dropped during the infantry course. Some are allowed to try again, but most find other jobs in the corps.Outside an auditorium where new students receive their initial briefing, a quote attributed to Thucydides, the Greek historian and Athenian general, summarizes the program's mantra: "He is best who is trained in the severest school."It all begins with the Combat Endurance Test, a slog through rolling forests that requires physical strength, endurance, military knowledge and willpower. Students must swim, assemble weapons from jumbled parts, navigate from point to point and carry weight over distances.But more than anything, the event is intended to challenge a newly minted lieutenant's ability to make decisions under sustained duress. Uncertainty and disorientation are prime features: students do not know their tasks beforehand, and are not told how long they will be given for each. Pacing oneself, thus, is virtually impossible.When Thursday's event was over, one of the instructors, a towering infantry captain with a booming voice, asked the weary Marines: "Are we done yet?" No one answered because no one knew. "We are done," he reassured them."Young Marines need a platoon commander who can manage uncertainty," said Maj. Scott Cuomo, the school director. "Because that is what combat is like."
WASHINGTON — Facing growing criticism from Congress, veterans' groups and even late-night television hosts, the Obama administration announced on Friday that it would include significant increases for veterans' programs, including money for mental health services, in the budget it unveils next week.The president's budget for the 2014 fiscal year will include $63.5 billion in discretionary funds for the Department of Veterans Affairs, a 4 percent increase over the current budget, said Denis R. McDonough, the White House chief of staff.The spending plan calls for a 13.6 percent increase in discretionary spending, to $2.5 billion, for the Veterans Benefits Administration, the embattled agency within the department that oversees benefit programs, including education and disability compensation programs. And it will include $7 billion for mental health services, a 7 percent increase.The budget will also propose spending nearly $300 million on two programs intended to digitize disability claims for wounded veterans. The department has more than 850,000 claims awaiting decisions, of which nearly 70 percent have been pending for more than 125 days, its benchmark for timely action.President Obama also intends to propose making permanent two credits created to encourage businesses to hire veterans. Those credits, which are scheduled to expire at the end of the year, range up to $9,600 for hiring disabled veterans who have been unemployed for more than six months.The president's budget proposal is largely a political document, a starting point in negotiations with Congress. But Mr. McDonough, appearing before reporters alongside the secretary of veterans affairs, Eric K. Shinseki, asserted that the proposed increases — coming amid intense budget cutting across the federal government — underscored Mr. Obama's priorities."The budget," Mr. McDonough said, "lays out in pretty stark detail the president's commitment to our vets and to their families."The Obama administration has come under fire in recent weeks for its handling of veterans' issues, largely because of persistent and growing delays in processing compensation claims for injured veterans. (Many veterans complain about delays in obtaining health care as well, but the backlog in disability compensation has been a bigger issue.)In recent weeks, Representative Jeff Miller, a Florida Republican who is chairman of the House Veterans Affairs Committee, called on Allison Hickey, the under secretary for benefits, to resign because of her failure to shrink the backlog.Perhaps more damaging to the administration, the general public now seems to equate the backlog with poor care for veterans. Joe Klein of Time magazine has called on Mr. Shinseki to resign, and Jon Stewart, host of "The Daily Show," has devoted several recent episodes to deriding the Obama administration for breaking promises on veterans' benefits, calling the backlog "criminal."Veterans' groups have consistently complained about the slow processing of claims as well, though several major groups, including the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars and Disabled American Veterans, have come to Mr. Shinseki's defense.Paul Rieckhoff, executive director of Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans of America and a leading critic of the department, called Friday's budget announcement "welcome" but added that "no one has said this is a money problem.""Really what we're talking about is execution," he said.For Mr. Shinseki, who meets regularly with veterans' groups but does not often hold news conferences, the one-hour session in an ornate room at the Eisenhower Executive Office Building represented something of a departure, intended perhaps to counter criticism that he is aloof.Most of the questions focused on the mountainous claims inventory, for which Mr. Shinseki did not offer any new proposals. Instead he emphasized the department's core strategy, which involves digitizing the paper-clogged process in every regional office by the end of the year.Mr. McDonough also said that he had also begun convening experts from several federal agencies, like the Social Security Administration and Department of Health and Human Services, to offer advice on taming the claims inventory.As he has consistently in the past, Mr. Shinseki asserted that the department was on schedule to eliminate the backlog by 2015. Asked whether he meant the beginning or end of that year, he replied simply, "2015."Mr. Shinseki also noted that delays in processing claims were partly the result of Obama administration policies that expanded benefits, like for Vietnam veterans exposed to Agent Orange. "It was the right thing to do," he said.
WASHINGTON — President Obama's effort to control federal spending would require the largest cuts from the government's biggest programs — health care and the military — while preserving or increasing spending on favored initiatives like early education, manufacturing and research.The president's proposed budget, for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, will be extensively rewritten in Congress, but is designed to reduce the growth of federal health spending by $401 billion over 10 years.The budget would require $57 billion in higher payments by Medicare beneficiaries, cut $306 billion in projected Medicare payments to health care providers and squeeze $19 billion out of Medicaid, the program for low-income people.Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, said Wednesday that the president was requesting $1.5 billion to operate health insurance supermarkets, known as exchanges, in 2014. In addition, the administration plans to raise $450 million by charging insurance companies fees to sell their products to consumers and small businesses in the exchanges. The federal government will have the primary responsibility for operating the exchanges in more than 30 states.The largest share of the new payments by Medicare beneficiaries, $50 billion over 10 years, would come from additional premiums paid by high-income people for coverage of doctors' services and prescription drugs.The Defense Department's proposed $526.6 billion base budget is a reduction of $3.9 billion, or 0.7 percent, from the enacted budget for 2012. It includes substantial reductions for the Army, which has carried the bulk of the combat operations over the past decade. The Army's budget proposal is 4 percent lower in constant dollars, while the Air Force's rose 3 percent and the Navy's, which includes Marine Corps spending, was steady.The budget proposes spending $2.4 billion over five years to conduct another round of politically difficult base closings, which Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said would deliver "significant savings" over the long term.The inventory of remotely piloted vehicles, commonly called drones, would grow through 2017 and then level off, Pentagon officials said, and money would be preserved for the new way of war as fought by Special Operations forces and in cyberspace.While the budget outlines sizable cuts at many agencies, it proposes a 4.6 percent increase in discretionary funding for the Education Department over 2013 spending.At the center of Mr. Obama's education agenda is a program that would guarantee public preschool for all 4-year-olds from families with low and moderate incomes. To pay for it, the administration has proposed an increase in federal cigarette taxes to $1.95 per pack from $1.01. That would cover the $66 billion cost of providing preschool and the $11 billion cost of voluntary home-visiting programs for poor families, both over 10 years.The budget also calls for a one-time outlay of $11.8 billion to preserve teaching jobs and increase hiring as the economy recovers.The president's budget reflects his determination that manufacturing will be a major component of American middle-class job growth and a worthy recipient of increased federal spending.In his budget message to Congress, Mr. Obama called manufacturing a "first priority," and he noted that manufacturers had added more than 500,000 workers in the last three years after a decade of precipitous decline."Companies large and small are increasingly deciding to bring jobs back to America," Mr. Obama wrote, urging Congress to devote federal money to accelerate the trend. His budget requests financing for 15 manufacturing research and training "hubs," tax credits, and incentives to draw foreign business to the United States.The White House offered a pre-emptive reduction for the Environmental Protection Agency, a favorite target of Republican budget-cutters on Capitol Hill. The administration's proposed budget provides $8.2 billion for the E.P.A., a decrease of $296 million, or 3.5 percent, from current spending.The cuts would be felt most deeply by state and local governments, whose federal financing for drinking water and wastewater treatment projects would fall by $472 million. The agency said smaller and underserved communities would be spared, although the broader programs are shrinking. The Clean Water and Drinking Water State Revolving Funds would receive $1.9 billion, down from nearly $2.4 billion in the current year.On health care, the president would require new Medicare beneficiaries to pay co-payments for home health services, starting in 2017. And he would impose a surcharge on Medicare premiums for new beneficiaries who buy the most generous private insurance policies to supplement Medicare. Such Medigap policies reduce the incentive for beneficiaries to consider the costs of services, the White House said.The home health co-payments and premium surcharges would raise $3.6 billion from 2017 to 2023, the administration said. Mr. Obama would require drug manufacturers to provide additional discounts, or rebates, to Medicare for prescription drugs bought by low-income beneficiaries. Medicare would thus get discounts similar to those that drug makers now provide to Medicaid.The White House said this proposal would reduce budget deficits by $123 billion over 10 years. Drug makers have beaten back similar proposals in the past, saying they amount to price controls.
WASHINGTON — Supporters of the Rev. Emil J. Kapaun, an Army chaplain who died a prisoner in the Korean War, are still working to have him declared a Catholic saint for his lifesaving ministrations to them. But for now, they have the satisfaction of seeing him posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor at the White House.In an East Room ceremony on Thursday, President Obama presented the blue sash and five-pointed star to an emotional Ray Kapaun, a nephew. At 56, the nephew has been alive for less time than his uncle's comrades have labored to get recognition for their chaplain, who died nearly 62 years ago, at the age of 35, in a prisoner-of-war camp."This is an amazing story," Mr. Obama said. "Father Kapaun has been called a shepherd in combat boots. His fellow soldiers who felt his grace and his mercy called him a saint, a blessing from God. Today, we bestow another title on him — recipient of our nation's highest military decoration."He added, "I know one of Father Kapaun's comrades spoke for a lot of folks here when he said, 'It's about time.' "Father Kapaun was honored for his heroism during combat at Unsan, in November 1950 when his unit — the Third Battalion, Eighth Cavalry Regiment, First Cavalry Division — was attacked by Chinese Communist forces, according to the citation read aloud as Mr. Obama and Mr. Kapaun stood at attention.The chaplain "calmly walked through withering enemy fire" and hand-to-hand combat to provide medical aid, comforting words or the last rites of the Roman Catholic Church to the wounded, the citation said. When he saw a Chinese soldier about to execute a wounded comrade, Sgt. First Class Herbert A. Miller, he rushed to push the gun away. Mr. Miller, now 86, was at the White House for the ceremony with other veterans, former prisoners of war and members of the Kapaun family."This is the valor we honor today," Mr. Obama said. "An American soldier who didn't fire a gun, but who wielded the mightiest weapon of all, a love for his brothers so pure that he was willing to die so that they might live."At such ceremonies, the president, who wrote a best-selling memoir, seems to relish the narrative of a compelling tale. For this one, he went beyond the citation, saying "the incredible story of Father Kapaun does not end there."Since the priest was from a small town near Wichita, Kan., like Mr. Obama's grandparents who helped raise him, "I have a sense of the man he was," Mr. Obama said. He told of how Father Kapaun carried Mr. Miller and helped soldiers who faltered on a forced march to a prisoner-of-war camp, where the Chinese sent them after the attack. Through the winter, as the American prisoners froze to death, he offered his clothes, sneaked out to bring back grain and cleaned the soldiers' wounds.Guards tortured him for his shows of faith, but on Easter, Father Kapaun offered Mass in church ruins at the camp as guards looked on.One of the veterans told him, the president said, that the chaplain "kept a lot of us alive."The priest had a blood clot, dysentery and then pneumonia, and in May 1951, guards sent him into isolation, without food or water, to die. As Mr. Obama recounted, based on testimony from Father Kapaun's comrades, the priest looked at the guards and said, "Forgive them, for they know not what they do."His remains were never recovered. At war's end, the surviving P.O.W.'s walked out of the camp with a four-foot wooden crucifix they had made in his honor.
WASHINGTON — After a series of scandals involving high-ranking officers, the American military for the first time will require generals and admirals to be evaluated by their peers and the people they command on qualities including personal character.The new effort is being led by Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, as part of a broad overhaul of training and development programs for generals and admirals. It will include new courses to train the security detail, executive staffs and even the spouses of senior officers.Saying he was "disturbed about the misconduct issues," General Dempsey said that evaluations of top officers needed to go beyond the traditional assessment of professional performance by superior officers alone. He said that he had decided the changes were necessary "to assess both competence and character in a richer way.""You can have someone of incredible character who can't lead their way out of a forward operating base because they don't have the competence to understand the application of military power, and that doesn't do me any good," General Dempsey said. "Conversely, you can have someone who is intensely competent, who is steeped in the skills of the profession, but doesn't live a life of character. And that doesn't do me any good."A significant number of military personnel have been investigated, penalized and fired in recent months for poor judgment, financial malfeasance and sexual improprieties or sexual violence. Others were relieved for inappropriate leadership judgment while in command.General Dempsey said that regularly scheduled professional reviews would be transformed from top-down assessments to the kind of "360-degree performance evaluation" often seen in corporate settings. He acknowledged that the change had already drawn concern from some in the military's senior ranks, who warned that it risked damaging a hierarchical command system based on discipline and adherence to orders from above.General Dempsey described the results of his review of officers' "professional character" during an interview in which he  repeatedly stated his deep pride in the conduct of the vast majority of senior officers.He said he had found that the number of senior officers investigated by the Defense Department inspector general was not at an unusually high level. But the central role in national life played by the military since the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001 — a time in which some general officers attained the stature, and entourages, of rock stars — put them in the spotlight."We've been living with unconstrained resources for 10 years and, frankly, we've developed some bad habits," General Dempsey said, vowing to combat complacency. "It's those bad habits we are seeking to overcome."Richard H. Kohn, a professor emeritus at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill, who specializes in military culture, said he thought the 360-degree evaluation would have a positive effect on the leadership styles of many officers. "It will reduce what the military calls 'toxic leadership,' elevating those who are highly competent but also fair and less brusque and peremptory," Dr. Kohn said.As for the new training programs, Dr. Kohn said that while it may be impossible to prevent willful infractions, "most officers need to be reminded of the rules and regulations on a routine basis."General Dempsey said the demands of combat deployments in the past decade had prevented officers from attending the academic programs that historically had been integrated into an officer's career every few years, and he pledged to rebalance that.It is likely that the review will lead to a reduction in the overall number of generals and admirals, and the size of personal staffs, communications teams and security details. The review also looked at whether administrative staff members assigned to commanders had been used to run personal errands for officers and their spouses.Among the serious cases of misconduct in recent months, the four-star general who previously served as the top officer in Africa, William Ward, was demoted to three-star general after an investigation into misuse of government funds, including lavish travel with his wife. A one-star officer, Jeffrey A. Sinclair, is facing a court-martial on sexual misconduct charges involving a subordinate.
Under pressure to reduce its immense inventory of disability claims for injured and sick veterans, the Department of Veterans Affairs announced on Friday its plans to process 250,000 claims that are one year or older within the next six months.The plan calls for regional offices of the Veterans Benefits Administration to issue so-called provisional rulings on all claims that are one year or older, provided a minimum level of evidence has been submitted to support those claims.If claims are given provisional approval, veterans will start receiving benefits immediately, said Allison A. Hickey, the under secretary for benefits. Those benefits are based on ratings that quantify the severity of a disability. If veterans believe that their ratings are too low, they will have a year to submit additional information.Once that year is over, the provisional rating will become final, under the new policy. From then on, veterans will be able to challenge decisions through the existing appeals process, a multilayered bureaucracy that can take years to adjudicate cases.The 250,000 claims that have been awaiting decisions for one year or longer are part of the department's backlog, which includes all claims pending for at least 125 days. That backlog is now at 570,000 claims.Representative Jeff Miller, Republican of Florida, who is chairman of the House Veterans Affairs Committee, has called for Ms. Hickey's resignation, and some veterans' advocates have questioned President Obama's commitment to veterans because of the department's inability to tame the backlog.Eric K. Shinseki, the secretary of veterans affairs, has said that the department would eliminate the backlog in 2015, mainly by digitizing the process. But many advocates say that is unrealistic.Both Democrats and Republicans responded to the initiative with a mixture of praise and skepticism. "While this new approach sounds promising, we will be monitoring it closely to make sure it's good policy rather than just good P.R.," Mr. Miller said in a statement.Similarly, Paul Rieckhoff, founder of Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans of America, called for "presidential leadership" to eliminate the backlog. And Paul Sullivan, director of veteran outreach for a law firm, Bergmann & Moore, questioned the new policy because it would not expedite claims that are on appeal, some of which are many years old.In a telephone conference with reporters, Ms. Hickey said the new policy would almost certainly cause the average time required to complete a new claim — now 286 days — to increase temporarily, while processors focused on older claims. New claims filed on paper, instead of digitally, may face the biggest delays, the department said.Ms. Hickey also said that the department would continue to give priority status to certain claims even if they were not one year old, including those from former prisoners of war and veterans who are terminally ill, homeless or in financial distress.She added that the department would not hire processors to expedite the older claims, relying instead on personnel who have worked on Agent Orange claims for Vietnam veterans.
WASHINGTON — President Obama said on Tuesday that he would recommit himself to closing the Guantánamo Bay prison, a goal that he all but abandoned in the face of Congressional opposition in his first term and that faces steep challenges now."It's not sustainable," Mr. Obama said at a White House news conference. "The notion that we're going to keep 100 individuals in no man's land in perpetuity," he added, makes no sense. "All of us should reflect on why exactly are we doing this? Why are we doing this?"Describing the prison in Cuba as a waste of taxpayer money that has had a damaging effect on American foreign policy, Mr. Obama said he would try again to persuade Congress to lift restrictions on transferring inmates. He also said he had ordered a review of "everything that we can do administratively."But there is no indication that Mr. Obama's proposal to close the prison, as he vowed to do upon taking office in 2009 after criticizing it during the presidential campaign, has become any more popular. Mr. Obama remarked that "it's a hard case to make" because "it's easy to demagogue the issue."The plan for Guantánamo he proposed — moving any remaining prisoners to a Supermax-style prison in Illinois — was blocked by Congress, which barred any further transfers of detainees onto domestic soil. A spokesman for Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader and one of the leading opponents of closing the prison, said on Tuesday that "there is wide, bipartisan opposition in Congress to the president's goal of moving those terrorists to American cities and towns."Mr. Obama made his remarks following the arrival at the prison of more than three dozen Navy nurses, corpsmen and specialists to help deal with a mass hunger strike by inmates, many of whom have been held for over 11 years without trial. As of Tuesday, 100 of the 166 prisoners were officially deemed to be participating, with 21 now being force-fed a nutritional supplement through tubes inserted in their noses."I don't want these individuals to die," Mr. Obama said.Both conservatives and civil libertarians said that under existing law, Mr. Obama could be doing more to reduce the number of low-level detainees held at the prison.The chairman of the House Armed Services Committee, Representative Howard P. McKeon, Republican of California, noted that the Obama administration had never exercised the power it has had since 2012 to waive, on a case-by-case basis, most of the restrictions lawmakers have imposed on transferring detainees to countries with troubled security conditions."For the past two years, our committee has worked with our Senate counterparts to ensure that the certifications necessary to transfer detainees overseas are reasonable," Mr. McKeon said. "The administration has never certified a single transfer."Human rights groups also urged Mr. Obama to direct the Pentagon to start issuing waivers, and said he should appoint a White House official to run Guantánamo policy with the authority to resolve interagency disputes. For example, because of disagreements over evidence tainted by torture, the administration has missed by more than a year a deadline to begin parole-style hearings by so-called Periodic Review Boards."There's more to be done, but these are the two essential first steps the president can take now to break the Guantánamo logjam," said Anthony D. Romero, executive director of the American Civil Liberties Union.Another group, the Center for Constitutional Rights, which represents detainees, urged Mr. Obama to lift his self-imposed ban on repatriations to Yemen, where a branch of Al Qaeda is active. Of the 86 low-level detainees who were designated in January 2010 for potential transfer but remain incarcerated, 56 are Yemenis.Asked for greater details about Mr. Obama's intentions, a National Security Council spokeswoman, Caitlin Hayden, said the president was "considering a range of options for ways that we can reduce the population there," including "reappointing a senior official at the State Department to renew our focus on repatriating or transferring" lower-risk detainees. The administration reassigned the previous diplomat charged with that task in January and has not replaced him."We will also work to fully implement the Periodic Review Board process, which we acknowledge has not moved forward quickly enough," she added.
WASHINGTON — Not long after Adm. William H. McRaven led the mission to kill Osama bin Laden, he was put in charge of the nation's entire contingent of Special Operations forces, and set to work revamping them to face a widening array of new threats as America's combat role in the Middle East and southwest Asia winds down.His efforts to apply the lessons learned from more than a decade of fighting in the shadows of the larger wars in Iraq and Afghanistan have high-level support from a White House and Pentagon eager to avoid large-scale foreign interventions and to encourage allies to assume more of the burden of combating extremism and instability.Admiral McRaven's goal is to recast the command from its popular image of commandos killing or capturing terrorists, and expand a force capable of carrying out a range of missions short of combat — including training foreign militaries to counter terrorists, drug traffickers and insurgents, gathering intelligence and assessing pending risk, and advising embassies on security.But along the way, the ambitious Admiral McRaven has run into critics who say he is overreaching, or as one Congressional critic put it, "empire building" at a time when the military is shrinking its footprint in Afghanistan and refocusing on other hot spots around the world. Congress has blocked, at least temporarily, an idea to consolidate several hundred of the command's Washington-based staff members in a $10 million-a-year satellite office here, saying it would violate spending limits on such offices.At the same time, Admiral McRaven has also faced criticism that he is encroaching on the turf of the military's traditionally powerful regional commanders.Shortly before leaving the Pentagon, former Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta granted Admiral McRaven new authority to make staffing decisions in the Special Operations units assigned to the regional commanders. While they will still have the final say on missions in their region, Admiral McRaven will now have the ability to allocate the much sought-after 11,000 deployed Special Operations forces where he determines intelligence and world events indicate they are most needed.Indeed, in the past year, the command has conducted three classified exercises to determine where it can expand Special Operations forces in regions where they have not operated in large numbers for the past decade, especially in Asia, Africa and Latin America."I don't command and control anything," Admiral McRaven said in an interview. "I hope to be able to influence some of their decisions. But I'm not going to move pieces around the chessboard."As for the office he has sought in Washington, Admiral McRaven couches his plans to consolidate the command's disparate operations into a new "National Capital Region" office in similar reform-minded terms, telling Congress in April that it would "better support coordination and decision-making" with other federal agencies.Supporters described the plan as a management efficiency for the 373 people serving as liaison officers scattered in dozens of executive branch departments and the intelligence community, as well as members of a legislative affairs office that has operated here since the mid-1980s.If the plan is approved, an additional 70 Special Operations personnel could be assigned to the Washington office. By comparison, the Central Command, which oversees the Middle East and South Asia, has just 15 people in Washington. The Africa Command has 10.The headquarters would be overseen by a three-star officer and is envisioned to have an annual budget of $10 million, although some of that money is already in the command's budget for staff assigned to duties here.But Congress ordered that no money be set aside for the effort until Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel's office provides a waiver that "describes the purpose of, and activities to be performed," by the new office as well as "an explanation of the impact of this proposal on existing activities" of Special Operations Command.A command spokesman, Kenneth McGraw, said the waiver was being prepared but had not been submitted to the Pentagon.
The officer in charge of sexual assault prevention programs for the Air Force was arrested early Sunday and charged with sexual battery, the Arlington County, Va., Police Department said on Monday.The police said the officer, Lt. Col. Jeffrey Krusinski, 41, approached a woman in a parking lot in Crystal City, near the Pentagon, just after midnight and grabbed her breasts and buttocks before she fended him off and called 911. Colonel Krusinski, who the police said did not know the woman, was arrested near the parking lot shortly after.Colonel Krusinski was released on $5,000 bail on Sunday. A booking photo released after his arrest showed him with facial cuts, but a police department spokesman said those wounds had not been sustained during his arrest.An Air Force spokeswoman, Lt. Col. Laurel Tingley, said Colonel Krusinski had been removed from his job as chief of the sexual assault prevention and response branch. He had been in the job for about two months.The Air Force has come under sharp criticism in recent years for a string of sexual assault cases. In March, Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel began a review of the decision by an Air Force general to dismiss an officer's sexual assault conviction.
WASHINGTON — The problem of sexual assault in the military leapt to the forefront in Washington on Tuesday as the Pentagon released a survey estimating that 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010, and an angry President Obama and Congress demanded action.The study, based on a confidential survey sent to 108,000 active-duty service members, was released two days after the officer in charge of sexual assault prevention programs for the Air Force was arrested and charged with sexual battery for grabbing a woman's breasts and buttocks in an Arlington, Va., parking lot.At a White House news conference, Mr. Obama expressed exasperation with the Pentagon's attempts to bring sexual assault under control."The bottom line is, I have no tolerance for this," Mr. Obama said in answer to a question about the survey. "If we find out somebody's engaging in this stuff, they've got to be held accountable, prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged. Period."The president said he had ordered Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel "to step up our game exponentially" to prevent sex crimes and said he wanted military victims of sexual assault to know that "I've got their backs."In a separate report made public on Tuesday, the military recorded 3,374 sexual assault reports last year, up from 3,192 in 2011, suggesting that many victims continue not to report the crimes for fear of retribution or a lack of justice under the department's system for prosecution.The numbers come as the Pentagon prepares to integrate women formally into what had been all-male domains of combat, making the effective monitoring, policing and prosecuting of sexual misconduct all the more pressing.Pentagon officials said nearly 26,000 active-duty men and women had responded to the sexual assault survey. Of those, 6.1 percent of women and 1.2 percent of men said they had experienced sexual assault in the past year, which the survey defined as everything from rape to "unwanted sexual touching" of genitalia, breasts, buttocks or inner thighs.From those percentages, the Pentagon extrapolated that 12,100 of the 203,000 women on active duty and 13,900 of the 1.2 million men on active duty had experienced some form of sexual assault. In 2010, a similar Pentagon survey found that 4.4 percent of active-duty women and fewer than 0.9 percent of active-duty men had experienced sexual assault.Pentagon officials could not explain the jump in assaults of women, although they believed that more victims, both men and women, were making the choice to come forward. In the general population, about 0.2 percent of American women over age 12 were victims of sexual assault in 2010, the most recent year for which data is available, according to the Justice Department's Bureau of Justice Statistics.In response to the report, Mr. Hagel said at a news conference on Tuesday that the Pentagon was instituting a new plan that orders the service chiefs to incorporate sexual assault programs into their commands."What's going on is just not acceptable," Mr. Hagel said. "We will get control of this."The report quickly caught fire on Capitol Hill, where women on the Senate Armed Services Committee expressed outrage at two Air Force officers who suggested that they were making progress in ending the problem in their branch."If the man in charge for the Air Force in preventing sexual assaults is being alleged to have committed a sexual assault this weekend," said Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, "obviously there's a failing in training and understanding of what sexual assault is, and how corrosive and damaging it is to good order and discipline."Ms. Gillibrand, who nearly shouted as she addressed Michael B. Donley, the secretary of the Air Force, said that the continued pattern of sexual assault was "undermining the credibility of the greatest military force in the world."She and some other members of the committee are seeking to have all sex offenders in the military discharged from service, and she would like to replace the current system of adjudicating sexual assault by taking it outside the chain of command. She is particularly focused on decisions, including one made recently by an Air Force senior officer, to reverse guilty verdicts in sexual assault cases with little explanation.Senator Claire McCaskill, a Missouri Democrat who is also on the Senate Armed Services Committee, is holding up the nomination of that Air Force officer, Lt. Gen. Susan J. Helms, to be vice commander of the Air Force's Space Command. Ms. McCaskill said she wanted additional information about General Helms's decision to overturn a jury conviction in a sexual assault case last year.Gen. Mark A. Welsh III, the Air Force chief of staff, told the committee at the same hearing on Tuesday that he was "appalled" by the conduct and the arrest of Lt. Col. Jeffrey Krusinski, the Air Force officer accused of sexual battery on Sunday. The police say that Colonel Krusinski was drunk when he approached the woman in the parking lot and that the victim was ultimately able to fend him off and call 911.Mr. Hagel called Mr. Donley on Monday evening to express his "outrage and disgust" over the matter, a Pentagon statement said.Ms. McCaskill was particularly critical of Colonel Krusinski as well as the Air Force for placing him in charge of sexual assault prevention. "It is hard for me to believe that somebody could be accused of that behavior with a complete stranger and not have anything in his file," she said.While Mr. Hagel and others in the military seem open to changes to the system that allows cases to be overturned, they remained chilly to the idea of taking military justice out of the chain of command."It is my strong belief that the ultimate authority has to remain within the command structure," Mr. Hagel said, which is almost certain to meet with objections as the issue continues to come under the scrutiny of the Armed Services Committee.Under Mr. Hagel's plan, the military would seek to quickly study and come up with ways to hold commanders more accountable for sexual assault. The chiefs of the Army, Navy and Air Force and the commandant of the Marines have until Nov. 1 to report their findings. Mr. Hagel also directed the services to visually inspect department workplaces, including the service academies, for potentially offensive or degrading materials, by July 1.
WASHINGTON — The Air Force removed 17 officers assigned to standing watch over nuclear-tipped Minuteman missiles after finding safety violations, potential violations in protecting codes and basic attitude problems.The action, which was taken in April, was disclosed in a blunt memo by Lt. Col. Jay Folds, the deputy commander of a unit that runs the launching control centers for Minuteman III missiles at Minot Air Force Base in North Dakota."We as an operations group have fallen," Colonel Folds wrote in the memo, which complained about "rot in the crew force."The memo was first disclosed by The Associated Press. Air Force leaders sought to put the best face on the disclosure, casting it as an effort by commanders to hold their subordinates to exacting standards.The secretary of the Air Force, Michael B. Donley, told Congress on Wednesday that the nuclear missile force was secure and that it was important for commanders to "ride herd" on junior officers to keep up standards.But Bruce G. Blair, a former Minuteman missile launch control officer, said that the conditions the memo criticized were indicative of a decline of morale within the ranks of the missile force."The nuclear missile crews know that there is no career future for them in their field," said Mr. Blair, who is the co-founder of Global Zero, which advocates the elimination of nuclear weapons. "And that has led to low morale, some loss of discipline and sloppier performance, including the intentional violation of nuclear safety rules."The memo by Colonel Folds was drafted after an inspection at the 91st Missile Wing. The wing earned the equivalent of a "D" on Minuteman III missile launching operations, The A.P. reported.As part of the unit's assignment, two officers are on constant alert inside an underground launching control center, where they are supposed to be ready to launch the nuclear missiles if ordered by the president.The 17 officers who were removed from their posts will be given at least 60 days of refresher training. There are 150 officers in the unit."Get back to the basics and crush any rules violators," Colonel Folds wrote. "We are, in fact, in a crisis right now."An Air Force spokeswoman said that the Air Force was determined to maintain its standards."The 91st Operations Deputy Group Commander's e-mail was intended as an internal command communication to the unit's officer crew force to re-emphasize the high standards expected in the nuclear mission area," said Maj. Shelley Laver of the Air Force's Global Strike Command.She said that the e-mail was prompted by a "marginal rating" in one of 22 areas and that the missile wing received an overall "satisfactory rating""A marginal grade in one area, although passing, is less than desired to airmen who are entrusted with the most powerful weapons in our nation's arsenal," she said.
WASHINGTON — Air Force officials scouring the personnel records of the officer who ran its sexual assault prevention and response branch and was arrested last weekend on a sexual battery charge have found no sign of trouble, an official familiar with internal discussions said on Wednesday.The arrest of the officer, Lt. Col. Jeffrey Krusinski, 41, has embarrassed the military amid rising concern over sexual assault in the armed forces and its handling of such cases, including a decision by an Air Force general to dismiss the conviction of a fighter pilot who had been found guilty of aggravated sexual assault.Colonel Krusinski was arrested early Sunday. An Arlington County, Va., police blotter item on the arrest said: "A drunken male subject approached a female victim in a parking lot and grabbed her breasts and buttocks. The victim fought the suspect off as he attempted to touch her again and alerted police."Colonel Krusinski will be arraigned on Thursday at the Arlington courthouse, and his lawyer, Sheryl A. Shane, said in a phone interview that he would plead not guilty. She also urged people to look at her client as an individual, not a symbol."Every time his name is mentioned, it seems that he's being blamed for everything in the military," she said. "This is just a misdemeanor case, not a felony, and a lot of focus is on him. It's almost like he is a pawn in a chess game."Colonel Krusinski's case is receiving intense scrutiny. The Pentagon on Monday said Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel spoke to Michael B. Donley, the Air Force secretary, and "expressed outrage and disgust over the troubling allegations and emphasized that this matter will be dealt with swiftly and decisively."And on Tuesday, Senator Claire McCaskill, a Missouri Democrat and leading critic of the military's handling of sexual assault cases, grilled the Air Force chief of staff, Gen. Mark A. Welsh III, about Colonel Krusinski's vetting and qualifications at a Senate hearing."It is hard for me to believe that someone would be accused of that behavior by a complete stranger and not have anything in their file that would indicate a problem in that regard," Ms. McCaskill said.General Welsh replied that as an initial step, he had talked to Colonel Krusinski's supervisor and "officer record of performance" and found no red flags."His record is very good," he testified, adding, "There is no indication in his professional record of performance or in his current workplace that there is any type of a problem like this."The official familiar with internal discussions said on Wednesday that a deeper search had examined records as far back as his years as a student at the Air Force Academy, and turned up no issues. A public records search by The New York Times also uncovered no previous instance of any arrest.Colonel Krusinski was commissioned at the Air Force Academy in 1994, according to military records. Information on what apparently is his Facebook page said he graduated from an Ohio high school in 1990, and displayed several "likes," including pages for two suburban Washington bars — the Tortoise & Hare Bar and Grill and the Crystal City Sports Pub — on the block where he was arrested, a night-life strip.A man who answered the phone at Crystal City Sports Pub said he did not recognize Colonel Krusinski's picture, but Brian Montgomery, a co-owner of the Tortoise & Hare, said he was a regular who came in about once a week, although he had not been seen there that night.Mr. Montgomery said there was "nothing that we could point a finger at" in terms of any previous signs of misbehavior by Colonel Krusinski.The Air Force's sexual assault prevention and response program conducts training sessions at bases on issues like urging bystanders to intervene if they see problems, and it supports officials who assist victims. It is a personnel program and is not involved in prosecutions.A longtime personnel officer, Colonel Krusinski was the chief of a five-person Pentagon office that administers the program, handling staffing, policy and budgetary matters, from February until his removal on Monday, the military said. He had previously worked for more than two years at a policy office for the service's personnel directorate.The Air Force on Tuesday asked Theo Stamos, the Arlington County attorney, to turn the case over to the military justice system, but she declined. The military could still later prosecute him before a court-martial as well.The Air Force must now find a replacement for Colonel Krusinski. Ms. McCaskill told General Welsh that she "will be watching very carefully who is selected to replace Lieutenant Colonel Krusinski because I think it is one of those times you're going to be able to send a message, and I think it's important you do it."
WASHINGTON — An aviation commander for the Navy was raped by a co-worker, but there was no prosecution and the female accuser was denied re-enlistment. A noncommissioned officer was assaulted by a captain, who was found guilty but then granted clemency without explanation.Both cases come from the victims' accounts, and as in all military criminal cases, the person in charge of deciding whether to prosecute and whether to uphold a conviction was a senior commander — the boss — of the accused.As Washington grows increasingly alarmed about sexual assault in the military, lawmakers of both parties and in both chambers of Congress are moving to introduce legislation seeking to prevent and to better prosecute abuses. President Obama has expressed fury over the issue and this week the administration asked lawmakers to the White House to discuss the legislation with Valerie Jarrett, a senior adviser to Mr. Obama.Embarrassed military officials have repeatedly pledged that they are working to stop the abuse; a Pentagon survey released Tuesday estimates that 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year.But they are largely opposed to what many experts and lawmakers believe is a crucial step toward reducing assault and more effectively punishing abusers: the reversal of a centuries-old policy stemming from English law that gives commanders the power to decide whether and how an offender should be tried.The policy comes from a time before there were military judges and a court-martial appeals process. Unlike civilian judges, a military commander decides who gets prosecuted for what crimes and at what level of severity. The commander who convenes the court-martial picks the jurors who will hear the case and after trial must approve or disapprove findings of guilt and sentences."We have a system partly from the 20th century and partly from the 18th century," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teachers military justice at Yale Law School. Commanders believe "as an article of faith that they must have the power to decide who gets prosecuted."Victims and their advocates say that such a process serves as a disincentive for reporting sexual assault because victims fear and often experience retribution from their peers and superiors and are not given the due process civilians receive."Placing the fate of a case with one person from beginning to end is illogical, it's not practical and it also is a completely unjust system in which neither the victim nor the accused is well served," said Anu K. Bhagwati, the director of the Service Women's Action Network.Next week, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, will introduce legislation — certain to be controversial at the Pentagon — that would modify the current system by giving military prosecutors rather than commanders the power to decide which cases to try. The legislation would also abolish a commander's post-trial powers."It's essential that we do this," Ms. Gillibrand said. "This has been elevated to national consciousness."She will seek to include her bill in the coming defense authorization act. Should that fail, it will be up to Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, to bring it to the floor as a separate measure.The effort will be uphill. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, who appeared shaken and embarrassed by the findings released this week, has expressed an openness to changing the part of the system that allows commanders to overturn convictions and modify sentences. But in a Pentagon news conference on Tuesday, Mr. Hagel remained opposed to the idea of taking military justice out of the chain of command, saying that would have a negative impact on good order and discipline."It is my strong belief that the ultimate authority has to remain within the command structure," he said. The matter is certain to be hotly debated by the Senate Armed Services Committee.
WASHINGTON — In a sign that the White House is increasing its focus on the problem of sexual assault in the military, one of President Obama's closest advisers met with a group of Congressional lawmakers on Thursday morning to discuss their legislative strategy for addressing the issue.More than a dozen members of Congress, mostly women from the Senate and House Armed Services Committees, met with Valerie Jarrett, a senior adviser to Mr. Obama, and other administration officials, including Elizabeth Sherwood-Randall, a White House coordinator for defense policy, to discuss the best ways to prevent assault through cultural changes in the military and to improve the judicial process for those who are abused."People felt a real sense of urgency," said Senator Amy Klobuchar, Democrat of Minnesota, who has been working for years on measures to improve the record-keeping of reports of sexual assaults. "They are completely committed to turning this around," she said of White House staff members.Of principal interest to many senators is addressing the system for prosecuting violent crimes in the military, in which the person in charge of deciding whether to prosecute, picking the juries and then determining whether to uphold a conviction is a senior commander.Next week, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, will introduce legislation that would give military prosecutors, rather than commanders, the power to decide which cases to try, and would also abolish a commander's post-trial powers. The measure, which Ms. Gillibrand and Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, aim to place in a broad defense bill next month, is expected to meet fierce resistance from Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel.According to a Pentagon study made public this week, the military recorded 3,374 sexual assault reports last year, up from 3,192 in 2011, and in a separate survey, thousands more said they had been victims of abuse and not reported it.The hourlong meeting at the White House also focused on various factors that prevent victims from reporting crimes, including perceived and actual retribution and career damage, and on legislation to combat those problems.Some of the bills discussed are new, like one introduced this week by Senators Patty Murray, Democrat of Washington, and Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, that would provide victims of sexual assault with a special military lawyer and would change some of the procedures for courts-martial in the case of sexual assault charges.But older legislation is also getting renewed attention in light of the focus from the White House; Mr. Obama is expected to press the military to accept some changes to the judicial system.Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, has proposed legislation that would end a commander's ability to nullify a jury verdict and require a commander to provide written justification for any decision commuting or lessening a sentence after a guilty verdict in a court-martial.Ms. Klobuchar, who has passed amendments to guarantee storage of some documents connected with sexual assaults — previously often destroyed — is now sponsoring a bill with Senator Lisa Murkowski, Republican of Alaska, that would expand that record-keeping and remove the requirement that a victim request that retention.
WASHINGTON — An Army sergeant who served as a sexual assault prevention and response coordinator at Fort Hood, Tex., is under investigation for allegations of pandering, abusive sexual contact, assault and maltreatment of subordinates, Pentagon officials said late Tuesday.The inquiry comes as the White House, the Pentagon and the armed services are struggling to deal with the deepening problem of sexual assault in the military. The Pentagon released a survey last week estimating that 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010. A separate report recorded 3,374 sexual assault reports last year, a much lower number than the survey, suggesting that many victims are not reporting the crimes.The noncommissioned officer under investigation had been working as an "equal opportunity adviser and sexual harassment/assault response and prevention program coordinator" with a battalion of troops — about 2,000 soldiers — assigned to the Army's III Corps at Fort Hood when the allegations surfaced, the Pentagon said in a statement.The suspect was not identified by name. One official, speaking on the condition of anonymity because no charges have been filed, said the portion of the inquiry related to pandering refers to allegations that the soldier was involved in managing a prostitution operation, perhaps involving a subordinate.George Little, the Pentagon press secretary, said Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel felt deep "frustration, anger and disappointment over these troubling allegations and the breakdown in discipline and standards they imply."Senator Carl Levin, the Michigan Democrat who serves as chairman of the Armed Services Committee, said, "Tragically, the depth of the sexual assault problem in our military was already overwhelmingly clear before this latest highly disturbing report."Mr. Levin said the committee was considering a number of measures, including changes to the Uniform Code of Military Justice, to address sexual assault in the military.
WASHINGTON — President Obama, military officials and lawmakers on Capitol Hill are in broad agreement that the sexual assault problem in the military has reached a level of severity that can no longer be tolerated. But that is far different from concurring on how it should be fixed.After a Pentagon finding that an estimated 26,000 assaults took place last year, a flurry of legislative proposals — seeking changes to the way prosecution decisions are made and how records of sex-crime accusations are kept and perhaps requiring automatic dishonorable discharges for anyone convicted of sexual assault, among other things — is flowing through Capitol Hill, some at cross purposes.On Thursday, Mr. Obama will meet with senior Pentagon officials to discuss legislative responses to the sexual assault crisis.Also on Thursday, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, the New York Democrat who has made this her signature issue this year, will introduce legislation that would give military prosecutors rather than commanders the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try. Ms. Gillibrand's goals are to increase the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation and to give legal power to military prosecutors.The legislation, which many military justice experts said they believed was key to stemming the problem, is gaining some support but also prompting ambivalence on Capitol Hill, where many lawmakers are reluctant, for various and often opposing reasons, to remove prosecutorial powers from military commanders.There is also disagreement over whether sex crimes should be singled out for different prosecutorial treatment than other serious crimes.It is not clear that Ms. Gillibrand's measure as written has enough votes to pass even the Senate Armed Services Committee, where a record seven women hold seats and where lawmakers are struggling to balance public outrage over the crimes with alienating military brass or creating a multitiered justice system within the military."I just want to make sure we understand all the consequences here," said Senator Tim Kaine, Democrat of Virginia, a state with numerous military installations.While the dissent breaks down somewhat along party lines, it appears to be more determined by the background of the lawmaker, with many former prosecutors in Congress saying the complex task of investigating sexual assault should not be left in the hands of commanders, and those with close ties to the military uncomfortable with a change to a 200-year-old tradition that many Western allies have abandoned."When charges are brought," said Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri and a former prosecutor, "it has to have the power and gravitas of the convening authority. There is not the embedded respect" for a military prosecutor in their place, she said.But others said they believed that removing the commander from the prosecution would help increase the amount of widely underreported sexual assault crimes by victims who fear retaliation."Reporting is the biggest problem right now," said Senator Susan Collins, the Republican co-sponsor of Ms. Gillibrand's bill. "We have to remove the stigma and negative consequences" of reporting crimes.The failure of the military to contain the problems of abuse was underscored over the last week, during which an Air Force officer and an Army sergeant who led sexual assault prevention programs were accused of assault themselves.Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel has so far offered largely tepid solutions, like retraining of sexual assault program directors. Further measures, however, are expected."The secretary is frustrated, angered and disappointed over these troubling allegations as well as the breakdown in discipline and standards they imply," said Cynthia Smith, a Defense Department spokeswoman. Mr. Hagel directed the services to retrain, re-credential and rescreen all sexual assault prevention and response personnel and military recruiters, she added.Valerie Jarrett, a senior adviser to Mr. Obama, has met and spoken extensively with lawmakers about the issue.Ms. Gillibrand's legislation would transfer authority for all serious crimes, a source of disagreement; Ms. Collins noted that sexual assault had unique problems with reporting that did not affect other crimes and therefore might not need to come under the jurisdiction on an outside prosecutor. (An exemption would be made for performance-related offenses.)Some legal experts believe that singling out sex crimes for special treatment would marginalize them and miss the broader institutional reason for the change."We preach the rule of law all over the world," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale Law School. "You're talking about legal decisions being made right now by nonlawyers. Congress has to make some hard decisions, and the next step is a significant one, but it is one we should take."Other lawmakers seek modified changes. Senators Patty Murray, Democrat of Washington, and Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, are sponsoring a bill that would provide victims of sexual assault with a special military lawyer and would change some of the procedures for courts-martial in the case of sexual assault charges. "I think we are going to come to an agreement," Ms. Ayotte said.Ms. Collins is sponsoring a bill to remove convicted sex offenders from the military. Ms. McCaskill has proposed legislation that would end a commander's ability to nullify a jury verdict and would require a commander to provide written justification for any decision commuting or lessening a sentence after a guilty verdict in a court-martial.Ms. McCaskill is holding up the nomination of Lt. Gen. Susan Helms of the Air Force, for vice commander of the U.S. Space Command, because Ms. Helms overturned a jury conviction in a sexual assault case without public explanation.On Wednesday, Ms. McCaskill met with General Helms to discuss the matter.She also has a bill with Senator Amy Klobuchar, Democrat of Minnesota, that would require the Pentagon to establish strict criteria on who can serve in sexual assault prevention positions.Many of the women remain optimistic that a melding of the bills will come together in the Senate Armed Services Committee, "and really do something strong and special," Ms. McCaskill said.
Living in Limbo: A former combat videographer, Kathryn Robinson, describes trying to get her life back on track after her return from Iraq left her with P.T.S.D. and thoughts of suicide.After Specialist Freddy Hook, a medic with the Army's 82nd Airborne Division, killed himself in 2010, the trail of possible causes seemed long.He had used illegal drugs: Was it the demons of addiction? His rocky relationship with his fiancée? A wrenching deployment to earthquake-ravaged Haiti or the prospect of an impending tour in Afghanistan?As with most of suicides plaguing the military today, no one will know for sure."There are so many factors," said his mother, Theresa Taylor, of Lafayette, La. "Everything that was important to him was having problems."Of the crises facing American troops today, suicide ranks among the most emotionally wrenching — and baffling. Over the course of nearly 12 years and two wars, suicide among active-duty troops has risen steadily, hitting a record of 350 in 2012. That total was twice as many as a decade before and surpassed not only the number of American troops killed in Afghanistan but also the number who died in transportation accidents last year.Even with the withdrawal from Iraq and the pullback in Afghanistan, the rate of suicide within the military has continued to rise significantly faster than within the general population, where it is also rising. In 2002, the military's suicide rate was 10.3 per 100,000 troops, well below the comparable civilian rate. But today the rates are nearly the same, above 18 per 100,000 people.And according to some experts, the military may be undercounting the problem because of the way it calculates its suicide rate.Yet though the Pentagon has commissioned numerous reports and invested tens of millions of dollars in research and prevention programs, experts concede they are little closer to understanding the root causes of why military suicide is rising so fast."Any one variable in isolation doesn't explain things," said Craig J. Bryan, associate director of the National Center for Veterans Studies at the University of Utah. "But the interaction of all of them do. That's what makes it very difficult to solve the problem. And that's why we haven't made advances."An emerging consensus among researchers is that, just as among civilians, a dauntingly complex web of factors usually underlie military suicide: mental illness, sexual or physical abuse, addictions, failed relationships, financial struggles. Indeed, the most recent Pentagon report of suicides found that half of the troops who killed themselves in 2011 had experienced the failure of an intimate relationship and about a quarter had received diagnoses of substance abuse.Studies have also found that certain patterns of suicide among civilians seem intensified within the military. Among civilians, young white males are one of the most likely groups to kill themselves. In the military that group, which is disproportionately represented, is even more likely to commit suicide. Among civilians, firearms are the most common means; in the military, as might be expected, guns are used even more often, in 6 of every 10 instances.Deployment and exposure to combat can act as catalysts that worsen existing problems in a service member's life, like drug abuse, or cause new ones, like post-traumatic stress disorder or traumatic brain injuries, which may contribute to suicidal behavior. Indeed, a study published this week in the medical journal JAMA Psychiatry found that troops with multiple concussions were significantly more likely to report having suicidal thoughts than troops with one or no concussions.Yet deployment and combat by themselves cannot explain the spiking suicide rates, researchers say. Pentagon data show that in recent years about half of service members who committed suicide never deployed to Iraq or Afghanistan. And more than 80 percent had never been in combat."This probably is the keenest misconception the public has: that deployment is the factor most related to the increased rates of suicide," said Cynthia Thomsen, a research psychologist at the Naval Health Research Center in San Diego.Another question lingers: Is the current trend unique, or typical of war throughout the ages? Because detailed data on military suicides was not collected until after Vietnam, it is impossible to know, though many experts believe that suicides rose during and after the two World Wars, Korea and Vietnam.
WASHINGTON — With arrests in the military continuing to shadow its program to combat sexual harassment, President Obama summoned the Pentagon's senior leaders to the White House on Thursday, telling them that the levels of sexual assault across the armed services were a disgrace that undermined the trust essential for the military to carry out its mission effectively.The tableau of the commander in chief speaking so forcefully at the end of a meeting with the Pentagon's top civilian and military leaders was a sign of the administration's concern with sexual assault and sexual harassment. Yet no specific new initiatives were announced, and Mr. Obama cautioned that "there is no silver bullet."But the president made clear his distress."So not only is it a crime, not only is it shameful and disgraceful, but it also is going to make and has made our military less effective than it can be," Mr. Obama said. "And as such it is dangerous to our national security."Mr. Obama said he had asked Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, to lead a process that would improve enforcement of the law and hold accountable those who violate it. The president also insisted that training be improved.The White House session came as Army officials confirmed Thursday that commanders at Fort Campbell, Ky., had relieved a lieutenant colonel from his position as supervisor of the base's sexual assault program after a domestic dispute with his ex-wife that led to his arrest.Mr. Obama said the military must find ways to protect victims of sexual assault or harassment and even empower them. "When victims do come forward, they deserve justice," he said. "Perpetrators have to experience consequences."Across the military, senior officers have acknowledged that the issue has reached the level of crisis. The Pentagon found that an estimated 26,000 assaults took place last year."We're losing the confidence of the women who serve that we can solve this problem," General Dempsey said in an interview with the American Forces Press Service, the Pentagon's internal news organization. "That's a crisis."Also on Thursday, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, continued to gain support for a measure that would give military prosecutors rather than commanders the ability to decide which sexual assault cases to try. The goal is to increase the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation and to give more power to military prosecutors. Ms. Gillibrand's measure attracted three Republican co-sponsors: Senators Susan Collins of Maine, Charles E. Grassley of Iowa and Mike Johanns of Nebraska."The most ardent advocates of this kind of measure will be members of the military themselves," said Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut. "They would welcome the fairness and efficiency." Mr. Blumenthal said he would introduce his own measure to establish a victims' compensation system and a mandatory punitive discharge for all sexual assault convictions.
The 30-second Web video has the edgy quality of a campaign-season attack ad, including ominous music, grainy photos and a closing demand: "It's time for new leadership."But the target is not an elected official, or a politician at all. It is President Obama's secretary of veterans affairs, Eric Shinseki, the man being held accountable for his overwhelmed agency's problems.And for one problem in particular: "the backlog," the huge and probably still growing inventory of claims for disability compensation filed by wounded or ill veterans. As of Monday, just under 600,000 claims qualified as backlogged, meaning they had been pending for over 125 days.Though the numbers have grown, delays in processing disability claims are nothing new, and neither are complaints about the backlog. Just last year, some veterans advocates tried to make the backlog a presidential campaign issue. They failed. But this year, something changed: the criticism grew louder and perhaps more partisan, and began reaching a wider audience.A new conservative-leaning nonprofit organization, Concerned Veterans for America, produced the Web video calling for Mr. Shinseki's resignation and is sponsoring a similar online petition, which has been signed by more than 9,000 people. Representative Duncan Hunter, a California Republican and Marine Corps veteran of both the Iraq and Afghanistan wars, has joined the call.Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans of America, the largest organization representing the new generation of veterans, has also made the backlog the focus of aggressive lobbying in Washington, writing a letter signed by 67 senators that urges Mr. Obama to "take direct action" to resolve the problem. The group has stopped short, however, of calling for Mr. Shinseki's resignation.And perhaps most embarrassing for the administration, the backlog has become a repeated topic of outraged ridicule on "The Daily Show," on which the host, Jon Stewart, has skewered the paper-choked bureaucracy in a series titled "The Red Tape Diaries."Describing Mr. Shinseki's promise to end the backlog in two years, Mr. Stewart — reflecting the sentiment of many veterans — sarcastically observed in one segment: "In only two more years, they are hoping to have you wait only four more months."Mr. Shinseki, a former four-star general and Army chief of staff, remains deeply respected in Congress and, for the moment, secure in his job. The White House has expressed support for him, as have many mainline veterans organizations, including the American Legion and Veterans of Foreign Wars.Even the Republican chairman of the House Veterans Affairs Committee, Representative Jeff Miller of Florida, called him "an honorable, trustworthy gentleman" in an interview. But Mr. Miller raised questions about the secretary's staff, calling for the firing of Allison A. Hickey, the under secretary who oversees disability compensation.The chairman of the Senate Veterans Affairs Committee, Bernard Sanders, an independent of Vermont, also praises Mr. Shinseki for doing something rare in Washington: setting a deadline, in this case to end the backlog by 2015, mainly by replacing paper claims with a digital process."How many secretaries or presidents say, 'I'm going to do something by a certain date?' " Mr. Sanders said in an interview.But even if Mr. Shinseki stays in his job, the sharper tone of the criticism suggests that the department, the second largest in the federal government, after the Department of Defense, will continue facing closer scrutiny than in the past."You never had Jon Stewart talking about this before, and that is huge," said Paul Rieckhoff, founder and chief executive of the Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans. "The situation is so bad it makes for great comedy."Intensified media coverage is part of the new equation. Many newspapers and television news programs have done major reports on the backlog this year. And a nonprofit news organization, the Center for Investigative Reporting, has created a database loaded with documents, statistics and an interactive map showing the varying processing times for disability claims at the department's 58 regional offices.There also is a generational component to the debate. Older, more traditional veterans groups have supported Mr. Shinseki and endorsed his plan for ending the backlog. Those groups agree with him that the backlog is less about incompetence and more about an antiquated processing system overwhelmed by new veterans, aging veterans and expanded benefits programs.
WASHINGTON — When Jude Kenan Mohammad was about 18 and living in Raleigh, N.C., according to people who knew him, he came under the influence of an older man, Daniel Patrick Boyd, who taught him a violent, radical version of Islam.Mr. Boyd would be charged in 2009 and eventually imprisoned as the ringleader of a group of North Carolina residents who had vowed to carry out a violent jihad both in the United States and overseas. Mr. Mohammad was also charged, but by then, partly at the direction of Mr. Boyd, he had traveled to Pakistan, where he had joined a group of militants in that country's tribal area.On Wednesday, the United States government officially acknowledged for the first time what had long been rumored among his friends in Raleigh: that Mr. Mohammad was killed in a C.I.A. drone strike on a compound in South Waziristan, Pakistan, on Nov. 16, 2011. He was 23.He was one of at least four Americans to have been killed in "counterterrorism operations," Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. said in a letter sent on Wednesday to Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, chairman of the Judiciary Committee.Only one of those killed, the radical Yemeni-American cleric Anwar al-Awlaki, was deliberately targeted, Mr. Holder said. The others were killed in strikes that did not specifically target them, he said, including Samir Khan, another young man from Raleigh who had joined the Qaeda branch in Yemen and was killed with Mr. Awlaki; Mr. Awlaki's 16-year-old son, Abdulrahman, killed two weeks later; and Mr. Mohammad.American officials said on Wednesday that Mr. Mohammad had been killed with about 12 other insurgents in what the C.I.A. calls a "signature strike," an attack based on patterns of activity, such as men toting arms in an area controlled by extremist groups. Such strikes have prompted the sharpest divisions inside the Obama administration, with some officials questioning whether killing unidentified fighters is legally justified or worth the local backlash.After the strike, the family friend said, Mr. Mohammad's wife, whom he had met and married after moving to Pakistan, called his mother in North Carolina to say he had been killed.Reflecting the covert nature of the drone program in Pakistan, the F.B.I. had left Mr. Mohammad's name on its wanted list after his death. An F.B.I. spokesman, Kathleen Wright, said on Wednesday that it would be removed.While Mr. Mohammad was not directly targeted, he had come under increasing scrutiny by American counterterrorism officials, who said he was involved in recruiting militants for Al Qaeda and the Pakistani Taliban, as well as making videos on YouTube to incite violence against the United States."He had risen to the top of the U.S. deck," said Seth G. Jones, a senior political scientist at the RAND Corporation and former adviser to the military's Special Operations Command. Mr. Jones said that while in Pakistan, Mr. Mohammad had made contact with five young Virginia men who disappeared from their homes around Thanksgiving in 2009 and turned up seeking to join militant groups. Instead they were arrested and remain in Pakistani custody.A family friend, who asked not to be named because she did not want to offend Mr. Mohammad's family, called him "a good kid, but a follower." His Pakistani father, Taj Mohammad, met his mother, Elena, an American who converted from Catholicism to Islam, in New York in the early 1980s. They lived in Pakistan for several years, but in the late 1990s, Elena moved back to the United States with their son.Jude Mohammad dropped out of high school but later earned his high school equivalency certificate and attended Wake Technical Community College. He was "a regular around the mosque" in Raleigh and often volunteered in the mosque kitchen to help prepare communal meals, the friend said."He'd put food on the back of his bike and ride a couple of miles to deliver groceries to the homebound," she said.Later, after dropping out of school, he used drugs and described himself as "lost," the friend said. "He was looking for a father figure."After meeting Mr. Boyd, a convert to Islam who called himself Saifullah, he came to see going overseas to fight as a way to purify himself.Mr. Boyd, who had trained in terrorist camps in Pakistan and Afghanistan from 1989 to 1992, was later banned from the mosque in Raleigh as a troublemaker. In September 2009, he was indicted with his two sons, Mr. Mohammad and four other men for conspiring to plot terrorist acts at home and abroad.Among other things, Mr. Boyd was accused of carrying out "reconnaissance" of the Marine base at Quantico, Va., and plotting to stage attacks on service members there.While he was a fugitive in Pakistan, Mr. Mohammad would sometimes call his American friends and family, especially on Muslim holidays, staying on the phone just long enough to offer a greeting for fear of having the call traced.The calls stopped after November 2011, the friend said, and the reports of his death began to circulate through Raleigh's Muslim community.
Sergeant Accused of Filming Cadets: Thom Shanker explains why members of the nation's top military academy, where 15 percent of the 4,500 cadets are women, shared information with The Times about the latest case of sexual misconduct.WASHINGTON — A sergeant first class on the staff of the United States Military Academy at West Point has been accused of videotaping female cadets without their consent, sometimes when they were undressed in the bathroom or the shower, according to Army officials.The Army is contacting about a dozen women to alert them that their privacy may have been violated by the suspect, identified as Sgt. First Class Michael McClendon, and to offer support or counseling, officials said.The allegations at West Point, the nation's oldest and most prestigious military academy, come in the midst of growing outrage in Congress, at the Pentagon and from President Obama over reports of sexual harassment and assault in the armed services. They also come as the Army has begun integrating women into combat positions, bringing added demands for fair and equal treatment of those in uniform.The revelations are especially startling at West Point, which has had problems with sexual assault but also has many progressive faculty members and prides itself on having an environment of discipline and respect. Women have been enrolled at the two-century-old institution, on a commanding bank of the Hudson River in upstate New York, for nearly 40 years.Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, who is to deliver the commencement address at West Point on Saturday, was briefed on the case Wednesday morning. Pentagon officials described him as "concerned and disturbed" by the allegations.Sergeant McClendon, of Blakely, Ga., faces charges under four articles of the Uniform Code of Military Justice, for indecent acts, dereliction in the performance of duty, cruelty and maltreatment, and actions prejudicial to good order and discipline. Sergeant McClendon, who had been assigned to the academy since 2009, was transferred to Fort Drum, N.Y., before charges were filed on May 14, Army officials said.During his tenure at West Point, Sergeant McClendon served as a tactical noncommissioned officer, a position described in academy personnel documents as a staff adviser "responsible for the health, welfare and discipline" of a company of 125 cadets. The person in the position is expected to "assist each cadet in balancing and integrating the requirements of physical, military, academic and moral-ethical programs."The student body at West Point numbers about 4,500 cadets. Slightly more than 15 percent are female, and senior Army officials pledged immediate action to try to regain their trust."The Army is committed to ensuring the safety and welfare of our cadets at the Military Academy at West Point — as well as all soldiers throughout our Army," Gen. John F. Campbell, the Army vice chief of staff, said on Wednesday. "Once notified of the violation, a full investigation was launched, followed by swift action to correct the problem. Our cadets must be confident that issues such as these are handled quickly and decisively, and that our system will hold those responsible accountable."Officials said some of the videos were taken in the showers or the bathrooms, and some elsewhere on campus. Documents in the case indicate that in some instances Sergeant McClendon entered women's bathroom and shower areas without knocking.The number of sexual assaults reported at the military's service academies has been steadily rising in recent years. In the 2011-12 academic year, there were 80 reports of sexual assault, compared with 65 in 2010-11 and 25 in 2008-9. The Defense Department is required by Congress to track sexual assault reports at the military academies.The Army made no announcement of the charges against Sergeant McClendon, but it provided details after The New York Times learned of the inquiry from people with ties to West Point who said they were alarmed by the allegations and wanted to learn of the academy's plans to investigate and prevent future violations.George Wright, an Army spokesman, said the service and West Point would "rebuild trust" through their response. He said the Army was committed to "providing the full range of support to those whose privacy was violated," as well as "keeping them updated on the case.""The Army will ensure the military justice system works through to its proper conclusion," Mr. Wright said.According to military service records, Sergeant McClendon joined the Army in 1990 and trained as a combat engineer. He deployed to Iraq from 2004 to 2005 and from 2007 to 2009 and was awarded a Bronze Star.In recent weeks, allegations of sexual harassment and assault against women in the military have prompted vows from the Pentagon's highest officials that they will confront the problem."It is time we take on the fight against sexual assault and sexual harassment as our primary mission," Gen. Ray Odierno, the Army chief of staff, wrote in a message to all of his service personnel last week. "It is up to every one of us, civilian and soldier, general officer to private, to solve this problem within our ranks."These acts, General Odierno wrote, "violate everything our Army stands for.""They are contrary to our Army values," he added, "and they must not be tolerated."Mr. Obama last week summoned the Pentagon's senior leaders to the White House, telling them that the levels of sexual assault across the armed services were a disgrace that undermined the trust essential for the military to carry out its mission.At the White House on Wednesday, Jay Carney, Mr. Obama's press secretary, said the president had "zero tolerance for sexual assault in the military.""Those who participate in it dishonor the uniform they wear," Mr. Carney said, and "those who are victims of it and who wear the uniform should know that the commander in chief has their backs."
WASHINGTON — At times on Thursday, it seemed President Obama was taking part in a debate rather than giving a speech.Deep into an address at the National Defense University, where Mr. Obama sought to redefine America's approach to fighting terrorism, a heckler repeatedly interrupted from the back of the room, demanding an end to drone strikes and the closing of the Guantánamo Bay detention center in Cuba.The heckler — though she objected strenuously to being described that way — was Medea Benjamin, a co-founder of Code Pink, a group opposed to United States military actions. She is a familiar face on Capitol Hill, where she has repeatedly interrupted proceedings."Excuse me, President Obama, you are the commander in chief," she yelled as the president tried to continue speaking."Why don't you sit down, and I'll tell you exactly what I'm going to do," Mr. Obama said.In an interview, she said she had been invited by someone at the university who agrees with her views. She said military police officers and agents from the F.B.I. and Secret Service had pushed her out and questioned her.Secret Service officials declined to comment on the incident. The National Defense University said in a statement that Ms. Benjamin "was given access via the list of media attendees expected." Officials at Fort McNair, the home of the university, did not return calls."People around the world are tired of nice words from President Obama, and they want some concrete action," Ms. Benjamin said. "Some say it's rude to interrupt the president, but it's rude to kill innocent people with drones."Before she was removed, Ms. Benjamin interrupted the president twice more. A few minutes after her first outburst, she prompted a mild lecture about responsibilities in a democracy."Now, this is part of free speech, is you being able to speak, but also you listening and me being able to speak," Mr. Obama said. "All right? Thank you."A few minutes later, as the president listed terrorists who have been tried in criminal courts, Ms. Benjamin yelled a question about a 16-year-old American, the son of a radical cleric, who died in a drone strike in Yemen: "How about Abdulrahman al-Awlaki? Why was he killed?"As security dragged her out, she demanded that Mr. Obama "apologize to the thousands of Muslims that you have killed" and asked if he would "compensate the innocent family victims.""I love my country! I love the rule of law!" she said.Mr. Obama then departed from his text and said: "The voice of that woman is worth paying attention to. Obviously I do not agree with much of what she said, and obviously she wasn't listening to me in much of what I said. But these are tough issues, and the suggestion that we can gloss over them is wrong."
WASHINGTON — House Speaker John A. Boehner on Thursday called the rise of sexual assaults in the military a "national disgrace" as lawmakers in both chambers of Congress moved closer this week to legislation to address the problem.Mr. Boehner's comments came after several weeks of continued reports of sexual assault in the armed forces and after a Pentagon survey estimated that 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010.On Thursday, Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, and Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine, said they would introduce a bill to limit a military commander's ability to change or dismiss a court-martial conviction for sexual assault.The bill would also require mandatory dismissals or dishonorable discharges for anyone in the military convicted of rape or sexual assault. Ms. McCaskill said she was hoping for bipartisan support."The important thing is to try to get as many of us to agree so we don't end up with a party-line vote," Ms. McCaskill said.The legislation, which is intended to crack down on offenders and keep commanders from reversing guilty verdicts in sexual assault convictions — which has occurred in recent years — is among a flurry of legislative proposals flowing through Capitol Hill. A House panel this week passed a similar measure to prohibit commanders from dismissing sexual assault findings.The developments on Capitol Hill came a day after Army officials said that a sergeant on the staff of the United States Military Academy at West Point had been accused of videotaping female cadets when they were undressed in the bathroom or the shower."It's outrageous," Mr. Boehner told reporters on Capitol Hill, adding that Representative Howard McKeon of California, the chairman of the House Armed Services Committee, would add provisions to a new defense bill that would make changes to military law. While members of Congress have tried to take action on the sexual assault issue over the years, there is widespread agreement on Capitol Hill that the sheer volume of cases — and their escalating outrageousness — has made the need for legislation too urgent to ignore."There will be legislation, I'm confident, that makes changes" to military law, said Senator Carl Levin, the Michigan Democrat who is chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee.The biggest question is how far such legislation can go. Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, has introduced the most controversial and sweeping proposal, which would give military prosecutors, rather than commanders, the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try. While her measure, intended to increase the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation, is gaining supporters, others suggest it goes too far."Taking away the power of a commander has some very significant implications in terms of the commander's ability to deal with the problem," said Mr. Levin, who will hold hearings on the measure after next week's spring recess.On Thursday, new details emerged about the soldier accused of surreptitiously taking videos of a dozen female cadets.In at least some of the cases, according to Army officials briefed on the inquiry, Sgt. First Class Michael McClendon, who had been assigned to the academy since 2009, is believed to have entered a bathroom-shower area in a women's barracks when few others were there. The officials said he perhaps had used the video function on a smartphone to capture images of women in the curtainless showers.Officials said the accusations had come to light in two ways: They were alerted after Sergeant McClendon was spotted leaving the women's bathroom-shower area, and after the video images of undressed female cadets that he had in his possession were seen by another cadet.After the disclosure about Sergeant McClendon, the leadership at West Point moved late Wednesday and Thursday to try to assure parents of cadets that the Army "is committed to ensuring the safety and welfare of our cadets," said Lt. Col. Webster M. Wright III, the West Point spokesman.Messages posted at social media sites open only to West Point parents, and distributed in direct e-mails, described how a noncommissioned officer "is involved in an ongoing investigation for possession of inappropriate images taken without consent."The messages said the Army and West Point "are pursuing all criminal allegations."Similar messages have been distributed across West Point alumni networks, but they did not explain why the school or the Army had not notified cadets and parents until after the charges were disclosed in news reports.
WASHINGTON — President Obama , in one of his most significant speeches since taking office, did not simply declare an end to the post-9/11 era on Thursday. He also offered a vision of America's role in the world that he hopes could be one of his lasting legacies.It is an ambitious vision — one that eschews a muscle-bound foreign policy, dominated by the military and intelligence services, in favor of energetic diplomacy, foreign aid and a more measured response to terrorism. But it is fraught with risks, and hostage to forces that are often out of the president's control.From the grinding civil war in Syria and the extremist threat in Yemen to the toxic American relationship with Pakistan and the withdrawal of American troops from Afghanistan with no clear sense of what comes afterward, there are a multitude of hurdles to Mr. Obama's goal of taking America off "perpetual war footing."One of the most daunting is a sprawling wartime bureaucracy that, after nearly a dozen years, has amassed great influence and has powerful supporters on Capitol Hill. It will be difficult to roll back what has been a gradual militarization of American foreign policy, even in an era of budget cuts for the Pentagon.Nor can Mr. Obama escape his own role in putting the United States on a war footing. He came into office pledging to wind down America's wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, but within a year had ordered 30,000 more troops to Afghanistan and oversaw a significant expansion of the Bush administration's use of clandestine drone strikes."We have no illusions that there are not challenges," said Benjamin J. Rhodes, a deputy national security adviser who wrote Mr. Obama's address. "But we should not be defined by our role in terrorism, by the airstrikes we order or the people we put in prison."Of all these threats, Mr. Rhodes said the White House was most worried about a surge of extremism in the wake of the Arab Spring. And yet the bloodiest of those conflicts, in Syria, reveals the limits of Mr. Obama's policy. He has steered clear of American involvement, despite signs that extremist groups with ties to Al Qaeda are making gains.Amid this uncertainty, it was telling that neither the president in his speech nor his aides afterward made firm declarations about where the United States could carry out targeted killings, or about whether drone strikes would be carried out by the Pentagon or the Central Intelligence Agency.Administration officials spoke of a "preference" to use the military to conduct lethal operations, but said that Mr. Obama's hands would not be tied and that he reserved the right to use the C.I.A. for covert drone strikes in far-off countries.In a White House "fact sheet" issued Thursday about new standards for lethal operations, the administration cautioned that "these new standards and procedures do not limit the president's authority to take action in extraordinary circumstances when doing so is both lawful and necessary to protect the United States or its allies."Even if Al Qaeda's core network is routed, Mr. Rhodes said, "you'll want to preserve certain capabilities we've developed." That is a discreet way of saying that the United States, having discovered the grim efficiency of drones, is unlikely to stop using them.At the same time, Mr. Obama put renewed emphasis on diplomacy and foreign aid, saying these were important ways to address "the underlying grievances and conflicts that feed extremism," even if the progress made by diplomats can be painfully slow.As if to underline his point, John Kerry has proved to be a surprisingly activist secretary of state, plunging into shuttle diplomacy between the Israelis and the Palestinians and becoming the administration's point man for dealing with the strife in Syria.It is also true, though, that the administration is pushing a diplomatic solution in Syria because there is so little public support for military engagement and all the available options carry risks."The real question over time may be whether we can mobilize others to join with us to deal with these threats," said Dennis B. Ross, a former senior adviser to Mr. Obama on the Middle East. "Look at Syria: would others be prepared to do more that could be effective if they saw that we were prepared to do more?"Another problem with this new focus is that the administration cut the budget of the State Department and the United States Agency for International Development by 6 percent, to $47.78 billion, from $51 billion in the current year, reflecting the broader budget squeeze.The impact of those cuts is even greater since there are increases of $1.5 billion for additional security personnel and upgrades to embassies and other diplomatic buildings.
Obama Addresses the U.S. Naval Academy: On Friday, President Obama delivered a commencement speech at the United States Naval Academy and addressed issues of sexual assault in the military.ANNAPOLIS, Md. — President Obama used a commencement speech before Naval Academy graduates on Friday to urge them to follow their "inner compass" and to warn that rising numbers of sexual assaults in the military threatened to erode America's faith in the armed forces.The president praised the military as the nation's "most trusted institution," but took note of the recent cases in which service members have been charged with sexual assault. He said those people "threaten the trust and discipline which makes our military strong.""We need your honor, that inner compass that guides you," the president said, essentially using the platform at Navy-Marine Corps Memorial Stadium to scold those who have strayed from that direction recently. "Even more than physical courage, we need your moral courage — the strength to do what's right, even when it's unpopular."In his four years in office, Mr. Obama has presided over a military that has often convulsed with change. He pushed for the end to "don't ask, don't tell" so that gay men and lesbians could serve openly. He has sought to bring an end to both major overseas wars. And he has watched as the armed forces have grown more diverse. Of the 1,047 graduates Friday, 206 were women — the most in the history of the academy.Before the president spoke, under cloudy, drizzly skies, Ray Mabus, the secretary of the Navy, said jokingly that the graduates had completed a journey "you began once you turned down your acceptance to West Point."It was the second time Mr. Obama had addressed the graduates of the academy, most of whom will receive commissions in the Navy, the Marine Corps or the Air Force, and he was welcomed with enthusiastic cheers as he congratulated them on becoming the military's latest officers. He echoed his remarks from a day earlier, telling the graduates that they enter the services at a time of transition in the war against terrorism."We still need to conduct precise, targeted strikes against terrorists before they kill our citizens," he said, noting the end of the Iraq war and next year's expected end of the American role in Afghanistan. But he said, "we need to stay ready for the full range of threats."Mr. Obama affirmed his plans to redefine the way America wages the fight against terrorism. In a speech at the National Defense University on Thursday, the president said the country needed to continue to attack terrorist cells while getting off the war footing it has been on for more than a decade.That message is most likely to be of intense interest to the graduates as they prepare for military careers. Mr. Obama has largely ended the war in Iraq and is winding down American involvement in Afghanistan.In the four years since the president last spoke at commencement here, the specter of the growing number of sexual assaults in the armed forces gave the speech more of a somber tone. Mr. Obama said that the episodes threatened to undermine the military's credibility just as failures of integrity undermine trust in politicians, financial institutions and government workers."As we've seen again in recent days," the president said, apparently referring to the actions of officials at the Internal Revenue Service in targeting conservative groups. "It only takes the misconduct of a few to further erode the people's trust in their government."He referred directly to the sexual assaults, saying that "if we want to restore the trust that the American people deserve to have in their institutions, all of us have to do our part."The issue has become a major concern in the wake of several episodes, some involving military officials who were supposed to be in charge of preventing sexual assaults. A Pentagon study this month estimated that as many as 26,000 members of the military were sexually assaulted last year.After summoning his top military officials to the White House this month, Mr. Obama said they told him they were ashamed of the behavior of some in the services. At a news conference early this month, Mr. Obama expressed impatience with his commanders on the issue."I don't want just more speeches or awareness programs or training but, ultimately, folks look the other way," Mr. Obama said in an East Room event with Park Geun-hye, the president of South Korea. "If we find out somebody is engaging in this stuff, they've got to be held accountable — prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged. Period. It's not acceptable."Concerns about sexual harassment and sexual assault in the military are not new. In 1991, dozens of women were assaulted by members of the Navy and the Marines at a Las Vegas hotel where the Tailhook Association was having its annual convention. Tailhook is a nonprofit association that supports naval aviators.
DOVER AIR FORCE BASE, Del. — The soldier bent to his work, careful as a diamond cutter. He carried no weapon or rucksack, just a small plastic ruler, which he used to align a name plate, just so, atop the breast pocket of an Army dress blue jacket, size 39R.Capt. Aaron R. Blanchard, a 32-year-old Army pilot, had been in Afghanistan for only a few days when an enemy rocket killed him and another soldier last month as they dashed toward their helicopter. Now he was heading home.But before he left the mortuary here, he would need to be properly dressed. And so Staff Sgt. Miguel Deynes labored meticulously, almost lovingly, over every crease and fold, every ribbon and badge, of the dress uniform that would clothe Captain Blanchard in his final resting place."It's more than an honor," Sergeant Deynes said. "It's a blessing to dress that soldier for the last time."About 6,700 American service members have died in the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, and almost every one of their remains have come through the Dover Port Mortuary. Yet only since 2009 have journalists been allowed to photograph coffins returning from the war zones, the most solemn of rites at this air base. The intimate details of the process have been kept from public view.But recently the Air Force, which oversees the mortuary, allowed a reporter and a photographer to observe the assembling of dress uniforms for those who have died. A small slice of the process, to be sure, but enough to appreciate the careful ritual that attends the war dead of the United States military.And enough to glimpse the arc of two long wars.Housed in a partly unheated building before the wars began, the mortuary moved into a new 72,000-square-foot building in 2003 after the invasion of Iraq. Then, as the wars expanded, so did the mortuary staff: from 7 workers in 2001 to more than 60 today.War also brought, for a time, unrelenting work. During the peak of fighting in Iraq in 2006 and 2007, 10 to 20 bodies arrived here each day, and embalmers often worked all night to get remains home on time."I have deployed to Afghanistan," said Col. John M. Devillier, the commander of Air Force Mortuary Affairs Operations. "But I've seen more war here."For each of the war dead, the journey through Dover begins with the arrival of a cargo jet that is met by military officials and, usually, family members. A team of service members wearing white gloves carries the coffins, covered with flags, to a white van that takes them to the Armed Forces Medical Examiner. Once an autopsy is completed, the work of the mortuary staff begins.Remains are first embalmed and then washed. Hands are scrubbed clean, hair is shampooed. Where appropriate, bones are wired together and damaged tissue is reconstructed with flesh-toned wax. Using photographs, or just intuition, the embalmers try to recreate the wrinkles in faces, the lines around mouths, the corners and lids of eyes."It has to look normal, like someone who is sleeping," said Petty Officer First Class Jennifer Howell, a Navy liaison at the mortuary who has a mortician's license.Once the body is ready, the mortuary staff prepares dress uniforms for each, even if the coffin is closed at the funeral with the uniform laid on top of the remains, and even if the body is to be cremated.Work on Captain Blanchard's uniform began the morning after his body arrived at Dover, in a room lined with wood closets and walls hung thick with military accouterments. There, Sergeant Deynes, guided by the captain's official military record, began assembling the dozens of badges, medals, unit patches and ribbons that would go on the dress jacket.Purple, orange and gold captains' bars, denoting an aviator. Purple Heart. Overseas Service Badge. Sergeant Deynes searched along the walls and in tiny plastic drawers for each. Then he assembled the ribbons denoting the captain's awards in the proper order according to precedence: a Bronze Star, his highest medal, went on the top, and the others followed like the words on a page.When finished, he slipped them onto a metal "ribbon rack" and pinned it above the jacket's left breast pocket. Then he took a photograph to be sent to Army personnel headquarters at Fort Knox for double checking. The process has to be "100 percent perfect," said William Zwicharowski, the Dover Port Mortuary branch chief, because "a lot of times, families are in denial and they want to find something that gives them hope that it wasn't their son or daughter."
WASHINGTON — The Memorial Day commemoration on Monday honors the 1.25 million Americans who have fallen for their country. It also affords an opportunity to show concern for living service members, active and retired.The picture is complex and contradictory. The U.S. military is more capable than ever, and well provided for despite threats of mindless across-the-board spending cuts under the so-called sequestration. At the same time, the armed forces are plagued by soaring suicide rates and rising incidents of sexual assault and worn down by multiple tours of combat duty.Conditions for veterans are similarly mixed. The Veterans Affairs budget has more than doubled in less than a decade; the United States and China are the only countries whose military budgets exceed what the United States spends on veterans alone. An updated version of the G.I. Bill has sent more than one million veterans to college. Thanks to White House prodding, employment opportunities for former service members are improving. Still, joblessness and homelessness are higher for veterans than the national average, and many face lengthy bureaucratic nightmares to get their military disability benefits."Our active military force today is remarkable; never has a force been so continuously involved for so long in combat," says Senator Jack Reed of Rhode Island, a Democrat who served as a paratrooper in the 82nd Airborne Division and is an influential voice on military matters. "This service has taken a toll; we see many pressures. There are other pressures on those who've served before."Most experts agree with Mr. Reed's assessment of the current force."There never has been in the history of the planet a military even three-quarters as good as ours," said Michael E. O'Hanlon, a military affairs scholar at the Brookings Institution.If the war in Afghanistan winds down next year, as President Barack Obama has promised, and if no new conflict arises, the military budget can be pared back, though more modestly and carefully than it would be under sequestration. Mr. O'Hanlon, a close associate of David H. Petraeus, the former C.I.A. chief, argues that the active-duty army and Marine levels can be reduced; the navy, rather than increasing the size of its fleet, can deploy its resources more efficiently, and the air force only needs about half of the new F-35 joint strike fighters it has ordered.The social problems may be thornier. The suicide rate for active-duty personnel reached a record high last year. While the Pentagon is devoting more resources to mental health, tragedies remain too common.About 15 percent of the military are women; sexual assaults have risen, capturing the attention of both the president and Congress. In the military justice system, commanding officers have the authority to change the penalties in an assault conviction; the administration and lawmakers are seeking to change that loophole. Some want to go so far as requiring an automatic dishonorable discharge for anyone convicted of sexual assault.The outlook for veterans is full of good as well as disturbing news. The robust defense budget is largely intact, even under sequestration. And despite the unemployment rate of almost 10 percent among veterans of the post-Sept. 11 era, there's progress on the jobs front. The armed services' training and job placement efforts are better, and the continuing education benefits are substantial.Led by the first lady, Michelle Obama, the administration has received commitments to hire veterans from major corporations, including Wal-Mart, McDonald's, Blackstone and Home Depot.Serious problems persist. About 15 percent of all veterans are homeless, according to the Department of Housing and Urban Development.And the Department of Veterans Affairs has failed to fix the lengthy delays in processing benefits. More than 500,000 claims have been pending for more than four months; some are held up for years. This infuriates veterans.Mr. Reed notes that the head of the V.A., Eric K. Shinseki, is himself a veteran with disabilities — part of his foot was blown off in Vietnam — and "understands what these veterans are going through." He says the results so far are unsatisfactory, however.Two-thirds of the senators have called on Mr. Obama to become personally engaged in addressing this debacle. Paul Rieckhoff, the founder of the Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans of America, said that in March, he suggested to the White House chief of staff, Denis R. McDonough, that the president should speak out on this issue. "We're still waiting," Mr. Rieckhoff said.Whatever the difficulties, the United States treats returning warriors with a regard, affection even, that once was lacking.During Vietnam, "the whole country turned against the war," says Colin L. Powell, who served as an army officer in Vietnam and later became chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff and secretary of state.Now, with a volunteer military, the public has shown appreciation and respect for veterans since the first Gulf War in the early 1990s, Mr. Powell notes with satisfaction.
WASHINGTON — President Obama on Monday paid homage to the nation's military, especially troops serving in Afghanistan, using his traditional Memorial Day address at Arlington National Cemetery to exhort Americans to honor their "sacred obligation" to veterans and to remind the country that "our nation is still at war."Mr. Obama's remarks, delivered under sunny skies after he participated in a somber wreath-laying ceremony at the Tomb of the Unknowns, came on the heels of his address last week on counterterrorism policy, in which he said he hoped to move the nation off a war footing.On Monday, Mr. Obama made glancing reference to the policy speech he gave on Thursday, in what seemed to be an effort to tamp down Republican criticism that as he prepares to withdraw troops from Afghanistan, he had declared a premature end to the war on terrorism."This time next year, we will mark the final Memorial Day of our war in Afghanistan," Mr. Obama said, "and so as I said last week, America stands at a crossroads. But even as we turn a page on a decade of conflict, even as we look forward, let us never forget as we gather here today that our nation is still at war."Visiting the cemetery, whose rows of perfectly aligned white headstones spread over the rolling hills of Northern Virginia across the Potomac River from the capital, has been a Memorial Day ritual for many presidents. Mr. Obama described the cemetery as "a sacred place where we honor our fallen heroes," contrasting it with the "city of monuments" across the river."It is here on this hallowed ground," the president said, "where we choose to build a monument to a constant thread in the American character — the truth that our nation endures because it has always been home to men and women who are willing to give their all, lay down their lives to preserve and protect this land that we love."Mr. Obama, noting that this year is the 60th anniversary of the end of fighting in Korea, said he wanted to give a "special salute" to veterans of that conflict. But he lamented that too many Americans these days were removed from the sacrifice of war, perhaps because with an all-volunteer military, service is a choice, not a requirement."Today, most Americans are not directly touched by war," the president said. "As a consequence, not all Americans may always see or fully grasp the depths of sacrifice, the profound costs that are made in our name."He went on to quote a letter from a soldier who said he was "concerned that our work in Afghanistan is fading from memory," and another from the mother of two Marines, one serving in Afghanistan, who pleaded with him not to forget about her son."A mother's plea: 'Please don't forget,' " Mr. Obama said. "On this Memorial Day, and every day, let us be true and meet that promise." The president went on to bless the troops, and America.After the commander in chief finished speaking, a bugler played taps, whose unofficial, and unsung, lyrics are a soldier's reminder: "All is well, safely rest."
KILLEEN, Tex. — Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan , the Army psychiatrist charged in the deadly shooting rampage at Fort Hood in 2009, asked a judge on Wednesday to allow him to release his team of court-appointed military lawyers so he can represent himself when his trial starts in four weeks.After Major Hasan made his request at a hearing at Fort Hood, the judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, said she wanted him to undergo a physical examination before she would rule on the request.Major Hasan, who was shot at the time of the attack, is paralyzed below the chest. On Wednesday, he sat at the defense table in a wheelchair, wearing a bushy beard and dressed in a camouflage Army uniform.The judge said a psychiatric evaluation had found that Major Hasan had the mental capacity to conduct his own defense, but she questioned whether he was physically capable. She said his defense lawyers had told her that he was unable to sit for long periods and would not be able to participate in the courtroom for more than five hours a day."I'm concerned about your physical limitations," she told Major Hasan.He is accused of killing 13 people and wounding 32 others at Fort Hood in November 2009, and he faces the death penalty if convicted. A jury made up of high-ranking officers from Fort Sill, Okla., is scheduled to be selected beginning next Wednesday. The trial, at Fort Hood, is set to start July 1.The hearing on Wednesday was held amid tight security. The courthouse was recently lined with barriers like those used in war zones to protect against explosions; they resemble giant hay bales stacked upright, and they were packed with sand and wrapped in steel wire. A Fort Hood spokesman said the security measures were not a response to a specific threat, but were installed as a precaution.Major Hasan's last physical exam was a year ago. Another exam was scheduled for May 11, but the judge said the appointment had been canceled because of a lack of government financing. It was unclear why the money could not be provided.Major Hasan had initially opposed being examined by doctors from the Fort Hood medical center because he believed they would be biased against him, but on Wednesday he withdrew that objection. He did, however, ask that the exam not be performed by Lt. Col. Harry Wright, the chief of physical medicine at the medical center, where Major Hasan had been assigned before the 2009 shooting.A different physician will perform the exam and issue a report to the judge by Friday, and will then testify at a hearing on Monday. Colonel Osborn said she would decide how to handle Major Hasan's request after reading the report and hearing the physician's testimony.Major Hasan has been represented by lawyers from the Army Trial Defense Service. His lead lawyer, Lt. Col. Kris R. Poppe, had been working on his case for three years and had helped him win several legal victories, including the removal of the previous judge because of an appearance of bias.Major Hasan's defense team also successfully challenged the previous judge's attempts to have him forcibly shaved before the trial. Army regulations prohibit soldiers from wearing beards, and the previous judge, Col. Gregory Gross, had called it a distraction. But a military appeals court vacated Colonel Gross's order to have Major Hasan shaved and removed the colonel from the case.It was unclear why Major Hasan had decided to split from his defense team. Colonel Poppe said after the hearing that he could not discuss Major Hasan's reasoning. Inside the courtroom, the judge told Major Hasan's defense lawyers that for now they remained his counsel. As a result, Colonel Poppe told the judge that the lawyers' role under these circumstances was uncertain.In July 2011, Major Hasan released the civilian lawyer who had been his lead defense counsel, John P. Galligan, a retired Army colonel and military judge. Mr. Galligan has declined to discuss the reason. On Wednesday, he said he believed that Major Hasan could effectively represent himself."I think it's more important that his constitutional right to represent himself be honored than to force a defense team to represent him against his wishes," he said. "I think the judge will be duty-bound to honor the request."
WASHINGTON — Concerned about possible flaws in criminal proceedings against American troops accused of killing or abusing civilians in a war zone, a Defense Department panel has proposed that investigations and prosecutions of crimes be carried out by a senior commander in the theater of combat and not the branch of the armed services in which the accused serves.The panel's study was commissioned by Pentagon leaders after the collapse of efforts to prosecute Marines involved in a 2005 massacre of 24 Iraqi civilians in Haditha, Iraq, which resulted in widespread outcry and raised the prospect that the system of having a service hold its own courts-martial for members accused of war crimes was broken.The panel was appointed last year by Leon E. Panetta, then the defense secretary, and Jeh C. Johnson, the Pentagon general counsel at the time; Mr. Panetta and Mr. Johnson specifically asked the panel members to study the proposal they eventually supported.Members of the panel — former officers and military justice experts — acknowledged Thursday that the proposal was already generating criticism from some senior officials concerned that each branch of the armed services should be responsible for disciplining those under its command.According to the logic of the proposal, the senior commander in the war zone, regardless of service branch, would be more motivated to maintain discipline across the theater of combat operations. That so-called joint force commander also has to deal with the impact of a population outraged by allegations of murder or abuse by American troops in their country.In both Iraq and Afghanistan, the killing of civilians by American troops and the time it took to prosecute and punish those troops had disastrous consequences, putting the mission in both countries in jeopardy.The panel's recommendations come as a separate effort is under way in Congress to transfer responsibility for dealing with sexual assault cases from the victims' commanders to an outside authority.Among the 50 other recommendations in the 200-page review released Thursday is one that calls for placing all United States government civilian contractors in the war zone under the control of military justice, regardless of which agency or department hired them. There have been a number of high-profile cases in which security contractors — some hired by departments other than the Pentagon — have been accused of killing civilians; questions of jurisdiction complicated some of those cases.The panel, a subcommittee of the Defense Legal Policy Board, was asked to review the process for reporting, investigating and adjudicating accusations of wrongdoing that caused death, injury or abuse of civilians in Afghanistan and Iraq. The full policy board will now edit the recommendations and submit a final set of proposals to Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel for possible action.The panel was not asked to reinvestigate any past cases involving American troops in the combat zone. But members of the panel acknowledged that a number of high-profile cases in which American troops were accused of massacring civilians — in particular the killings in Haditha — animated the effort.In Haditha, in November 2005, 24 Iraqis, including women, children and a man in a wheelchair, were killed after the roadside bombing of a Marine convoy. But details of the massacre went publicly unreported until March 2006, when Iraqi human rights advocates and press accounts accused the Marines of killing civilians, and the military belatedly opened an inquiry that found Iraqi civilians had been killed.Eventually, though, the legal case fell apart, in part because of long delays in getting official investigators to the scene. Forensic evidence was difficult to gather because bodies had been buried and bullet-scarred walls had been repaired. Later in the process, prosecutorial errors were said to include giving immunity to squad mates whose credibility as witnesses was questioned.By the time the trial ended in January 2012, charges against six Marines had been dropped, and another Marine had been acquitted in a court-martial. The last remaining defendant, who admitted telling his men to "shoot first and ask questions later" after the bombing, agreed to a plea deal allowing him to avoid prison time.One panel member, W. Kipling At Lee Jr., a retired Air Force colonel who served as his service's deputy general counsel, said Haditha was "a case study" in how the military should not manage cases of alleged criminal action by American service personnel. He noted that the attack had not been reported accurately or rapidly to senior commanders, most likely because of improperly placed loyalties.Another member, Gen. Peter W. Chiarelli, retired as the Army's vice chief of staff after serving as commander of the Multinational Corps-Iraq, in effect the senior commander for day-to-day military operations across the entire war zone. The Haditha attack belatedly came to light during his command, and he was forced to deal with the consequences."This is one of the most important recommendations we have," General Chiarelli said, though he added that "this will be a real tough one" to push through to approval.In response to criticism from officials in the armed services, panel members pointed out that the joint force commander in the war zone would have the authority to return legal oversight of the investigation and trial to the armed service, but that would not be the automatic legal default.
On the night of Feb. 2, William Doyle was working on "American Gun," a book he was writing with Chris Kyle, the retired Navy SEAL who had vaulted to celebrity status with his first book, "American Sniper: The Autobiography of the Most Lethal Sniper in U.S. Military History," one year earlier.Mr. Kyle provided the framework and ideas for the new book, the full title of which is "American Gun: A History of the U.S. in Ten Firearms." Mr. Doyle, an established nonfiction author, did much of the research and writing.Sometime after midnight, Mr. Doyle, sitting at his desk in New York City, finished reading some e-mails from Mr. Kyle, then called up the Huffington Post Web site. "Chris Kyle Dead," read the headline at the top of the page. Mr. Kyle, 38, and his friend Chad Littlefield, 35, had taken a veteran, Eddie Ray Routh, 25, to a remote shooting range in Erath County. Mr. Kyle had devoted much of his time to helping fellow veterans adjust to civilian life and had taken Mr. Routh there to unwind.According to the authorities, Mr. Routh turned his weapon on the two men, shooting and killing them before fleeing in Mr. Kyle's truck."My immediate thought was for his family," Mr. Doyle said. "But since I happened to be working on the book when I heard the news, I was thinking, what happens to the book?"Peter Hubbard, the editor of "American Gun," learned of Mr. Kyle's death later that morning. "It was devastating, and the difficult thing is, it wasn't like you could escape it for a few days," Mr. Hubbard said. "There was a huge surge of interest in 'American Sniper,' and we were trying to respect Chris's legacy. We had to put out statements, and then figure out what we were doing with the new book."For Mr. Hubbard's employer, HarperCollins, the stakes were high. "American Sniper," a memoir of Mr. Kyle's service in Iraq, where he killed more enemies than any sniper in the history of the American military, sold more than a million copies. Though "American Gun" is a very different book, it was expected to be a major release.But the book was incomplete at the time of Mr. Kyle's death. "It felt right to finish something he started," Mr. Hubbard said. "But I wanted to get the O.K. from Taya, his widow, before we did anything."Taya Kyle's life spun into a blur in the weeks after her husband's death. She spoke at Mr. Kyle's memorial service — attended by 7,000 people at Cowboys Stadium in Arlington — and turned to the projects he had been working on.Once she was able to focus on the book, she realized that it needed to be finished. She knew how much Mr. Kyle had enjoyed working on "American Gun," which is being be published on Tuesday."He was getting back to his roots, being reflective on guns and the Old West," Ms. Kyle said of her husband, who grew up in Odessa and Midlothian and dreamed as a child of becoming a cowboy. "There's a long pistol that Jesse James used, and Chris would walk around the house and do quick draws with replicas and twirl them around his finger."The quick draw wasn't easy, because the pistol was so heavy. The gun was designed so heavy because when you ran out of ammo, you could hit someone in the head with it. Chris was fascinated with details like that."Seeing her husband's book through to completion, she said, "was like taking care of him."Even though the book's trajectory was not affected by the movie theater massacre in Aurora, Colo., or the elementary school killings in Newtown, Conn., Jim DeFelice, a co-author of "American Sniper," added an epilogue that obliquely addresses the debate over gun control that emerged after those shootings. "There were terrible detours," he wrote, "injustices, unnecessary violence, and criminals who found a way to use for evil what should have been, what were, instruments of progress."In an interview, Mr. DeFelice, who was brought in to help finish the book at Ms. Kyle's urging, said that Mr. Kyle "saw any weapon as something to be respected, as a tool to protect freedom and other people, and as something that can be used for evil.""That would've been in the book no matter what," Mr. DeFelice said.Nor did Mr. Kyle's death alter the book's tone. "No shadow hangs over these pages, despite the circumstances," Mr. Hubbard wrote in a publisher's note appended to "American Gun" that is the only acknowledgment of the shooting."It felt like an elephant in the room," Ms. Kyle said. "We had to address it, but that definitely isn't the point of the book."Instead, she hopes that "American Gun" will move her husband's legacy beyond the image created by "American Sniper." Mr. Kyle never wanted to write that book, Ms. Kyle said, but did so because he was told that others would write books about him. He wanted to tell his own story, she said, and give credit to the men he served with."I didn't fall in love with a Navy SEAL, I fell in love with Chris," she said. "He's a cowboy, and he's a patriot, and he's funny and humble. To me, this book is a way he could express that side, instead of the side he felt maybe forced into with 'American Sniper.' "
Senator McCaskill on Military Assaults: Claire McCaskill discusses the record number of women on the Senate Armed Services Committee and their impact on the debate about sexual assault in the military.WASHINGTON — Senator Claire McCaskill wandered down the dais at the Senate Armed Services Committee's first hearing of the year and noticed a startling tableau: women to the left, women to the right.Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, a veteran Republican member of one of the Senate's most testosterone-driven panels, was now flanked by them on both sides, including by two Republican colleagues, Senator Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire and Senator Deb Fischer of Nebraska.Ms. McCaskill's joke reflected the seven women now on the Armed Services Committee, a high, and the role that a record 20 female senators are playing on powerful committees. Of the four most prestigious Senate panels — Appropriations, Armed Services, Finance and Foreign Relations — women now hold 18 spots, an increase of nearly 65 percent over the last decade.But nowhere is the presence of so many women more pronounced than on the Senate Armed Services Committee, where the women on the 26-member panel have forced the long-simmering issue of sexual assault in the military to the forefront on Capitol Hill. Lawmakers have tried to pursue the sexual assault problem for years, with little impact. But now a slew of attention-grabbing bills — most written by women — are intended to end what senior military officials say is a crisis and President Obama has called a disgrace."When I raised the issue of rape in the military seven years ago, there was dead silence," said Senator Bill Nelson, a Florida Democrat and member of the committee. "Clearly they are changing things around here."At a widely watched committee hearing last month, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, narrowed her eyes with disdain as Michael B. Donley, the secretary of the Air Force, expressed regret about recent assault cases. She then excoriated him and Gen. Mark A. Welsh III, the chief of staff of the Air Force, when they suggested that they were making progress on the problem."I do not think you should pat yourself on the back," Ms. Gillibrand admonished them. Sexual assault, she said, is "undermining the credibility of the greatest military force in the world." She has since introduced legislation that would give military prosecutors rather than commanders the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try. Her goal is to increase the number of people who report sex crimes without fear of retaliation.The sexual assault issue has caught the attention of the women on the committee in part because some have law enforcement backgrounds. Ms. McCaskill is a former prosecutor who handled sex crimes and homicides, and Ms. Ayotte was the head of the homicide division in the New Hampshire attorney general's office."When I saw how the military was dealing with this problem, I realized how out of step they were with the criminal justice system," Ms. McCaskill said. Although the sexual assault issue had been brought before the committee over the years, she said, "the main people asking questions during the hearings are women. That has never really happened on this committee before."The women do not dominate the panel on more traditional military issues — the defense budget, the future of the Army, weapons procurement and nuclear policy, to name a few. In those cases, Senator Carl Levin, a Michigan Democrat who is the chairman of the committee, and Senator John McCain, the highest-profile Republican member, have the most powerful voices. Other forceful members include Mr. Graham and Senator Jack Reed, a Rhode Island Democrat.The men lead on those issues in large part because of their longevity on the committee or because they have the kind of military experience not historically open to women. Mr. Levin has served on the committee for more than three decades, Mr. McCain is a former Navy pilot, Mr. Reed is a former Army Ranger, and Mr. Graham is in the Air Force Reserves.Ms. Gillibrand said there was a similar male-female pattern when she served on the House Armed Services Committee. "The men asked all the questions about ships, hardware, that sort of thing," she said. "We asked why divorce and suicide rates were so high."But Senator Jeanne Shaheen, Democrat of New Hampshire, said she saw that dynamic changing. "Women have started to challenge many of the assumptions in the department," she said, referring to the Pentagon. For example, Ms. McCaskill, a former Missouri state auditor, has repeatedly questioned waste in defense contracting and has made war profiteering one of her signature issues.
WASHINGTON — Senator Roy Blunt sat silently for nearly an hour as his colleagues on the Armed Services Committee questioned one military leader after another on Tuesday about what they were doing to address the problem of sexual assault in the military, and then assessed their responses: "Stunningly bad."In particular, Mr. Blunt chided Adm. Jonathan W. Greenert, the chief of naval operations, for displaying scant knowledge of how military allies of the United States had dealt with sexual assault in their ranks, and for thanking Senator Jeanne Shaheen, Democrat of New Hampshire, for "the tip" that other countries had grappled with the issue."Has anybody who works for you been asking this?" Mr. Blunt, Republican of Missouri, asked with clear exasperation.In a rare appearance together, a majority of the members of the Joint Chiefs of Staff — as well as the commandant of the Coast Guard and other military officials — testified before the committee about how the military should approach the problem as Congress prepares to vote on several measures that would significantly change military policy."Discipline is the heart of the military culture, and trust is its soul," said Senator Carl Levin, Democrat of Michigan and the chairman of the committee. "The plague of sexual assault erodes both the heart and the soul."Senators from both parties pressed the leaders, at times using strong language, about why, decades after the full integration of women into the military, the problem seems to have worsened. Senator John McCain, an Arizona Republican, recalled meeting with a woman whose daughter was considering entering the military if Mr. McCain, a former naval aviator, could offer his "unqualified support" of the choice. "I could not," he said.Over hours of testimony, each officer expressed remorse. "I took my eye off the ball in the commands I had," said Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.But they collectively resisted some of the more robust changes that have been proposed. "I recommend a measured approach," said Gen. Ray Odierno, the Army chief of staff.The hearing followed several weeks of reports of sexual assault in the armed forces and a Pentagon survey that estimated that 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010. Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, who on Tuesday called sexual assault in the military "beyond the pale," said the Senate would move to address the problem in the coming defense bill. "Something has to be done about it," he said.Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, has introduced the most sweeping proposal, which would give military prosecutors, rather than commanders, the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try. She has said the measure is principally intended to increase the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation and professionalize the process, but it has been largely rejected by military brass."Making commanders less responsible and less accountable will not work," General Odierno said.Among other measures that the committee is considering are those that would limit a military commander's ability to change or dismiss a court-martial conviction for sexual assault, require dismissal or a dishonorable discharge for anyone in the military convicted of rape or sexual assault, and expand to all service branches an Air Force program that provides a special counsel to victims of sexual assault.This week, the House Armed Services Committee is expected to pass provisions aimed at combating sexual assault within its Defense Authorization Act; the full House is scheduled to consider that bill next week. The provisions include one similar to the Senate measure that would limit a commander's ability to overturn sentences and another that would require minimum sentences for sexual assault convictions.Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, is particularly interested in the ability of commanders to overturn sexual assault convictions, and repeatedly questioned why a service record could mitigate such a conviction. Ms. McCaskill called a letter from Lt. Gen. Craig A. Franklin explaining his reversal of a fighter pilot's conviction "astoundingly ignorant."Ms. Gillibrand also chided the leaders for sometimes understating the gravity of some of the crimes before them, noting that one commander had told a victim that he believed her assailant had not "acted like a gentleman" but had not committed a crime. "Not every commander can distinguish between a slap on the ass and a rape," Ms. Gillibrand said.Several advocates for victims of sexual assault also testified, in some cases offering chilling testimony about women and men who had been sexually abused and then lost their careers by seeking justice. "The military does not create rapists," said Anu Bhagwati, who served as a Marine captain and is executive director of the Service Women's Action Network. But, she said, it does "condone sexual violence."
KILLEEN, Tex. — Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan, the Army psychiatrist accused of killing 13 people, told a judge on Tuesday that he believed he was defending the lives of the Taliban leadership in Afghanistan from American military personnel when he went on a shooting rampage at Fort Hood here in November 2009.Major Hasan's remarks were the first public explanation about the motive for one of the deadliest mass shootings at an American military base. His comments came a day after the judge granted his request to release his court-appointed military lawyers so that he could represent himself.On Monday, one of Major Hasan's first legal maneuvers had been to ask the judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, for a three-month delay in his trial, scheduled to begin on July 1. His primary reason in asking for the delay was to change his defense to a "defense of others." At a new hearing on Tuesday, Colonel Osborn asked him pointedly whom he was defending."The leadership of the Islamic Emirate of Afghanistan, the Taliban," he said, specifically naming Mullah Muhammad Omar, the founder of the Islamic insurgent group.His comments, delivered in a soft, matter-of-fact tone, stunned many in the courtroom. Seated in the gallery behind him were Army soldiers, military police officers and relatives of some of his victims. Colonel Osborn then asked him to explain his defense, and Major Hasan asked for a recess to gather his thoughts.When the hearing resumed a few minutes later, the judge again asked him to explain the facts supporting his defense, and he said he preferred to submit his thoughts in written form. "I don't want to brainstorm in front of the court," he told her.But the judge pressed him further. When she asked if he was defending one person or a group of people, he said it was the group of Taliban leaders in Afghanistan, including Mullah Omar. The judge asked him to explain the connection between the Taliban leaders and the people he is accused of murdering and attempting to murder."They're part of the United States military," he said.The judge delayed the start of jury selection, which had been set to begin on Wednesday, to give Major Hasan one day to find the legal authority to apply such a defense to his case. He was ordered to submit a brief to the judge by Wednesday morning, and Army prosecutors were asked to submit their own brief in response. Colonel Osborn did not rule on whether to grant Major Hasan's request for a delay, but instead set another hearing for Wednesday afternoon to further discuss the "defense of others" issue.The "defense of others" strategy requires a criminal defendant to prove that he was compelled to use force against an aggressor to protect a person or a group from being harmed or killed by that aggressor. In this case, Major Hasan is claiming that he was protecting Taliban leaders from death by using deadly force against Fort Hood military personnel deploying to Afghanistan.The defense is not typically used in military trials, and Colonel Osborn seemed to question whether Major Hasan had any facts or evidence to support such a defense.Military legal experts called his theory ludicrous and said it fell outside the legal parameters of "defense of others" cases. They said that those with a legitimate "defense of others" case must prove that the people being protected were victims of unlawful force and were facing an immediate threat or danger. Those two elements do not apply to the Fort Hood shooting, they said, because Taliban leaders were lawful objects of attack and faced no immediate threat from anyone at Fort Hood that day."I think the defense in this context makes no sense at all," said Richard Rosen, the director of the Center for Military Law and Policy at the Texas Tech University School of Law in Lubbock. "These people were unarmed. They were thousands of miles from the battlefield," he said. "If the Taliban leadership were present at the time of the shooting, I suppose then you might be able to raise the defense, but even then I think it would not fly."On Tuesday, two of Major Hasan's former lawyers sat at the defense table with him, and a third sat behind him. The judge had ordered them to remain as standby counsel, and Major Hasan frequently asked questions of his former lead lawyer, Lt. Col. Kris R. Poppe, throughout the hearing.Major Hasan is accused of killing 13 people and wounding more than 30 others at the Fort Hood base on Nov. 5, 2009. He could face the death penalty if convicted.His role in the attack has never been in dispute, and much of the courtroom activity at his pretrial hearings in recent months has centered on procedural matters. In the past, he had offered to plead guilty to the charges. Military law prohibits defendants charged in capital punishment cases from pleading guilty, and it was unlikely that Army prosecutors would drop their pursuit of the death penalty in order for him to plead guilty.
FORT MEADE, Md. — Adrian Lamo, the former computer hacker who reported Pfc. Bradley Manning to military authorities in May 2010 after Private Manning confided that he had provided vast archives of secret government documents to WikiLeaks, testified at the soldier's court-martial on Tuesday that he saw parallels between his own youthful hacking offenses and those of the young Army intelligence analyst.Mr. Lamo, who testified for about half an hour, has been a polarizing figure in the WikiLeaks case. He is despised by many of Private Manning's supporters for betraying the trust of a person they see as an important whistle-blower; Mr. Lamo has maintained that turning Private Manning in was the socially responsible thing to do because his wholesale leaking recklessly endangered others.Mr. Lamo, who wore black clothing and a light beard, recounted how Private Manning sent him an encrypted e-mail from his personal Google e-mail account, and later contacted him via an online chat service around May 20, 2010. The two later connected on Facebook as well, but did not meet in person.Mr. Lamo said he first contacted a government official the day after the first online conversation, while continuing to chat online with Private Manning over the next week — sometimes from his home in California, and sometimes from two nearby Starbucks where there was Internet access. The last chat, he said, was around May 26; soon after, Private Manning was arrested.When Mr. Lamo was 22 — the same age Private Manning was when he sent the information to WikiLeaks — he hacked into the networks of several companies, including The New York Times. He pleaded guilty in 2004 to the offenses and was sentenced to six months of house arrest and two years of probation. He has since become a network threat analyst, and in 1998 he was appointed to a San Francisco government task force on lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender youth issues.During cross-examination, Private Manning's lawyer, David Coombs, focused on the portions of the chat logs showing that his client had reached out to Mr. Lamo at a time when he was struggling with his own sexual identity, had just spent several months downloading government secrets and sending them to WikiLeaks, and was scared and in turmoil.Mr. Coombs raised the parallels between Private Manning and Mr. Lamo, asking whether, based on their conversations, Mr. Lamo had seen "someone very familiar" to himself, a "young 22-year-old with good intentions like you were?"Mr. Lamo replied, "That was not lost on me."Asked if Private Manning had represented himself as a person who tried to investigate to find out the truth about matters, Mr. Lamo said, "Something that I could appreciate, yes."Mr. Lamo answered with a simple "yes" to many other questions, like whether Private Manning had described some of the documents as exposing casualties in Iraq and whether he had expressed hope that his disclosures would prompt worldwide discussions and reforms. He also acknowledged asking Private Manning why he did not sell the documents to a foreign government, and said Private Manning had replied that the information should be public.But he also distanced himself from some of Private Manning's assertions in the chat logs. For example, asked if Private Manning had also told him how the more than 250,000 diplomatic cables he had leaked "explained in detail how first world countries exploited third world countries," Mr. Lamo replied, "He made that representation, yes."After Mr. Coombs finished, a prosecutor got Mr. Lamo to agree that Private Manning had mentioned Julian Assange, the WikiLeaks founder, and asked whether the private had admitted "to compromising classified information at the thousands of documents level."Private Manning, now 25, sat quietly as the opposing lawyers questioned Mr. Lamo. He did not turn his head to watch as Mr. Lamo, who had testified at a pretrial hearing as well, walked out of the courtroom after being excused from the witness stand. Mr. Lamo later posted on Twitter a picture of a subpoena requiring him to appear and wrote: "My work here is done. Elsewhere, just beginning."There was a sharp drop from Monday in the presence of news organizations and protesters at the trial, which opened Monday at this military base near Baltimore, as it shifted from the drama of the opening statements toward chain-of-custody issues and other evidentiary matters.Mr. Lamo said he had allowed federal agents to take a hard drive from a laptop and a second computer he used for the chats, where the transcripts were automatically saved by the program he was using. He said he did not alter those transcripts, but did make copies of them and redact some portions before sending them to reporters for Wired magazine and The Washington Post.A forensic computer analyst also testified that he had recovered matching chat logs on computers belonging to Mr. Lamo and Private Manning covering May 21 to May 25, 2010.In addition, a former instructor testified that he trained Private Manning in 2008 to protect classified secrets and not to post information on the Internet that could help adversaries. He said Private Manning had stood out because he asked many questions in class and was the butt of jokes by classmates.A former sergeant who oversaw Private Manning's training unit, Brian Madrid, recalled an incident in which Private Manning drew scrutiny for making a YouTube video describing his schedule and training; it used terms like "Top Secret" although it did not include any secrets.Mr. Madrid required him to make a class presentation on protecting operational information. Afterward, Private Manning said it would not happen again.A prosecutor asked Mr. Madrid whether it had happened again."I believe so — that's why we're here," he replied.
KILLEEN, Tex. — The long-delayed court-martial of the Army psychiatrist accused in a shooting rampage at Fort Hood here will most likely be delayed again after a judge on Wednesday instructed prospective jurors from other posts to return home while the court clears up logistical and legal issues arising out of the defendant's decision to represent himself.The psychiatrist, Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan, appeared in a Fort Hood courtroom a day after he told the judge that he was protecting Taliban leaders in Afghanistan from American military personnel when he opened fire on the base in 2009. Major Hasan had asked the judge to delay the trial three months so he could prepare his "defense of others" claim, describing Taliban leaders as the others he was defending and Fort Hood military personnel being deployed to Afghanistan as the perpetrators. The trial is set to start July 1.The judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, had given Major Hasan 24 hours to submit a brief explaining the legal basis for his defense. On Wednesday, he filed his motion — 90 minutes past the deadline — but the judge gave him until Monday to resubmit it because she learned that he had not been given access to some of the tools and resources he needed to work on his case, including law journals. She scheduled another hearing for Tuesday to hear arguments from Major Hasan and Army prosecutors about the legality of his "defense of others" claim and his request for a delay.Previously, the judge had delayed the start of jury selection to Monday at the earliest. On Wednesday, she said those prospective jurors who had already arrived — high-ranking officers from several Army bases — could return to their posts. She did not set a new date for jury selection.It appeared unlikely that the trial would start on July 1 regardless of whether the judge granted Major Hasan's request for a delay. Jury selection in a military court-martial can take as long as four weeks, and the trial cannot begin until at least four days after it is complete, to give witnesses time to arrive.A new trial date would be the latest in a string of delays in the Army's attempt to prosecute Major Hasan in one of the worst mass shootings on an American military base. He is accused of killing 13 people and wounding 32 at Fort Hood on Nov. 5, 2009, and could face the death penalty if convicted. More than three years after the attack and nearly two years after his formal arraignment, the case has remained in pretrial hearings.Major Hasan's claim that he was protecting the Taliban angered relatives of the victims, nearly all of whom were military personnel, but it has had other effects. Pentagon officials have described the Fort Hood attack as an episode of workplace violence and not an act of terrorism, and numerous victims' relatives, survivors of the shooting and lawmakers have been pushing the Army to officially classify it as terrorism. The families and survivors say they have been denied combat-related medical benefits and Purple Hearts.After Major Hasan made his claim in court, two lawyers who represent some of the victims and their relatives called on the Army to admit that the Fort Hood attack was terrorism and provide families with the necessary benefits and recognition."Now the government's 'workplace violence' lie has been fully exposed," the lawyers, Reed D. Rubinstein and Neal M. Sher, said in a statement. "By his own admission, Hasan was a jihadist who killed innocent Americans to defend the Taliban."In the days since Major Hasan was allowed to release his court-appointed military lawyers and represent himself, those lawyers, prosecutors and other officials have had to contend with a number of logistical matters. Major Hasan was assigned Army paralegals to assist him, and he has at least two places to work on his case, a room at the jail where he is being held and a room in a trailer near the courthouse. The judge said on Wednesday that she wanted his former lawyers — whom she ordered to remain as his standby counsel — and Army prosecutors to confirm that the resources Major Hasan needs to file meaningful responses and motions were in place.Major Hasan has access to a copier and printer, as well as a laptop computer with unclassified discovery material and other exhibits in the case. The judge said she did not want him to do Internet research either at the jail or in the trailer, but asked his standby counsel and paralegals to do it for him. She said she did not want him even looking over the shoulder of someone doing online research for him.Major Hasan, in one of the few times he addressed the judge on Wednesday, asked if he could indeed look over someone's shoulder at a document online instead of having it printed out, stating that he was concerned that too many trees would be killed. The judge denied his request.
WASHINGTON — Two weeks ago, President Obama went before an audience of generals and spies to declare that "all wars must end" and that he could see a day when even the amorphous struggle with terrorists would essentially come to a close.But that day is clearly not here.The disclosure of the government's vast surveillance of American telephone records and foreigners' e-mail and other Internet communications on Thursday served as a potent reminder that Mr. Obama continues to deploy many of the national security tools he inherited from his predecessor even as he seeks to turn the corner in the way the United States responds to terrorism.Whatever his ambivalence about what President George W. Bush called a global war, Mr. Obama has used some of the same aggressive powers in the name of guarding national security even, in the view of critics, at the expense of civil liberties. Rather than dismantling Mr. Bush's approach to national security, Mr. Obama has to some extent validated it and put it on a more sustainable footing.The altered landscape of terrorism politics a dozen years after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks was illustrated by the reaction to a report in The Guardian on the government's highly classified program. On the one side were Mr. Obama and, in effect, although he made no public comment, Mr. Bush, as well as the establishment leaders of both parties. On the other was a collection of critics from the right and left, an amalgamation that brought the American Civil Liberties Union and the Tea Party-affiliated Freedom Works into the same camp."Is it just me, or is secret blanket surveillance obscenely outrageous?" former Vice President Al Gore, the former Democratic presidential nominee, wrote in a Twitter message. On his own Twitter account, Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, a possible Republican presidential candidate, condemned the surveillance as "an astounding assault on the Constitution."Congressional leaders from both parties stood by a program that they had effectively sanctioned through the passage of counterterrorism laws over the years. Senators Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, and Saxby Chambliss, Republican of Georgia, the chairwoman and vice chairman of the intelligence committee, released a joint statement defending the surveillance."The threat from terrorism remains very real and these lawful intelligence activities must continue, with the careful oversight of the executive, legislative and judicial branches of government," they wrote.Mr. Obama seems to encapsulate the debate himself. He came to office promising to end what he had characterized as the excesses of his predecessor, but found that many of those policies had already been modified by Mr. Bush under pressure from courts and Congress and out of a desire to make them more palatable.After his inauguration in 2009, Mr. Obama signed an order banning what Mr. Bush euphemistically called "enhanced interrogation techniques" and what critics called torture, but by that point waterboarding had been halted for nearly six years. Mr. Obama promised to close the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, but found it just as hard as did Mr. Bush, who had expressed the same desire, though less firmly.By the time he took over, the warrantless surveillance program Mr. Bush had started had been legalized by an act of Congress, with the support of Mr. Obama when he was a senator. Mr. Obama kept a system of military commissions while building in further procedural safeguards and gave up an effort to try Sept. 11 plotters in civilian court. He released some secret documents about past programs but continued to invoke national secrecy in other instances.When he talked about how all wars must end in his speech at National Defense University last month, Mr. Obama said it was time to begin a new phase in the battle against Al Qaeda and allied extremists, narrowing the scope of the conflict and cutting back on the use of drone strikes overseas. He suggested the threat of terrorism had receded to the level it had been before Sept. 11, a regular danger but not the overarching issue it had become.But just as an unmanned aerial vehicle strike in Pakistan days after the speech made clear the drone war is not over, so too did fresh revelations about government surveillance indicate little retreat from the expansive tactics of the past."You have a president who's basically arguing against himself," said James Jay Carafano, a senior fellow for national security and homeland security at the Heritage Foundation. "It's almost Shakespearean. In the speech, he's saying we're going to stop doing this stuff, it's bad. But then he keeps doing it."Former Senator Ben Nelson, a Nebraska Democrat, questioned whether such expansive sweeps of data were even effective. "If everything's a priority, then nothing is," he said. "I think prioritization is a far better way to go about doing it. Just because they have the authority doesn't mean they should exercise it."Aides said Mr. Obama's approach is necessarily subtle, neither excessively hawkish nor overly restrained. The president believes in sustaining some post-Sept. 11 abilities to fight Al Qaeda, aides said, but has made a point of imposing stronger oversight and checks and balances that were not present immediately after the attacks on New York and Washington."We've come a long way in terms of narrowing our focus and constraining our actions," said Benjamin J. Rhodes, a deputy national security adviser to Mr. Obama. "It's only natural, and healthy, that as the nation considers the current scale of the threat of terrorism, we will also consider whether the balance between security and privacy is appropriate."He pointed out that Congress "overwhelmingly supported the reauthorization of these authorities."
WASHINGTON — Edward J. Snowden's employer, Booz Allen Hamilton , has become one of the largest and most profitable corporations in the United States almost exclusively by serving a single client: the government of the United States.Over the last decade, much of the company's growth has come from selling expertise, technology and manpower to the National Security Agency and other federal intelligence agencies. Booz Allen earned $1.3 billion, 23 percent of the company's total revenue, from intelligence work during its most recent fiscal year.The government has sharply increased spending on high-tech intelligence gathering since 2001, and both the Bush and Obama administrations have chosen to rely on private contractors like Booz Allen for much of the resulting work.Thousands of people formerly employed by the government, and still approved to deal with classified information, now do essentially the same work for private companies. Mr. Snowden, who revealed on Sunday that he provided the recent leak of national security documents, is among them.As evidence of the company's close relationship with government, the Obama administration's chief intelligence official, James R. Clapper Jr., is a former Booz Allen executive. The official who held that post in the Bush administration, John M. McConnell, now works for Booz Allen."The national security apparatus has been more and more privatized and turned over to contractors," said Danielle Brian, the executive director of the Project on Government Oversight, a nonprofit group that studies federal government contracting. "This is something the public is largely unaware of, how more than a million private contractors are cleared to handle highly sensitive matters."It has gone so far, Ms. Brian said, that even the process of granting security clearances is often handled by contractors, allowing companies to grant government security clearances to private sector employees.Companies like Booz Allen, Lockheed Martin and the Computer Sciences Corporation also engage directly in gathering information and providing analysis and advice to government officials. Booz Allen employees work inside the facilities at the N.S.A., among the most secretive of the intelligence agencies. The company also has several office buildings near the agency's headquarters in Fort Meade, Md.The company employs about 25,000 people, almost half of whom hold top secret security clearances, providing "access to information that would cause 'exceptionally grave damage' to national security if disclosed to the public," according to a company securities filing.In January, Booz Allen announced that it was starting work on a new contract worth perhaps as much as $5.6 billion over five years to provide intelligence analysis services to the Defense Department. Under the deal, Booz Allen employees are being assigned to help military and national security policy makers, the company said.Representative Peter T. King, a New York Republican and former chairman of the House Homeland Security Committee, said he had no reason to believe that a private contractor was more likely to become a source to reporters than a government official, because both need a security clearance before they can handle top secret information."Security is so tight and procedures so strictly enforced, this is really a surprise," he said of the leaks by Mr. Snowden. "This will have to be fully investigated, inside and out, to find out what happened here. Were there warning signs? Were there issues in his background?"Stewart A. Baker, who served as general counsel at the N.S.A. in the 1990s and more recently as a top official at the Department of Homeland Security, said he worried that the reliance on outside contractors might, in some ways at least, make the government more vulnerable to leaks."Inside the government, there are structures designed to make sure that people understand that they can raise concerns about the lawfulness of particular activities in a variety of established channels," Mr. Baker said. "You can go to the inspector general or to the Intelligence Committees, and you don't have to pierce the veil of secrecy to get high-level attention to your concerns without exposing national secrets. It is a little less obvious to employees at a contractor."Booz Allen, which notes in securities filings that its business could be damaged by leaks, acknowledged in a statement that Mr. Snowden had been an employee.The company, based in Virginia, is primarily a technology contractor. It reported revenues of $5.76 billion for the fiscal year ended in March and was No. 436 on Fortune's list of the 500 largest public companies. The government provided 98 percent of that revenue, the company said.Its rapid growth, fueled by government investment after the Sept. 11 attacks, led to a 2008 buyout by the Carlyle Group, a private equity firm, followed by a public offering in 2010.Booz Allen has formed a particularly close relationship with the intelligence agencies, and others besides Mr. Clapper and Mr. McConnell have spent time in the company's executive offices.Mr. McConnell has been an advocate for increased federal spending on cybersecurity. He told the CBS News program "60 Minutes" in 2010 that foreign governments had the capacity to bring down the country's power grid and financial system."The United States is not prepared for such an attack," he said.The company has also had at least one previous highly publicized problem maintaining data security. In 2011, files maintained by Booz Allen were acquired by the online activist group Anonymous, which claimed to have stolen tens of thousands of encrypted military passwords.
WASHINGTON — In a striking showdown between Senator Carl Levin , the chairman of the Armed Services Committee, and a member of his own party, Mr. Levin said on Tuesday that he would remove a measure aimed at curbing sexual assault in the military from a defense spending bill.Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, offered a measure that would give military prosecutors rather than commanders the power to decide which sexual assault crimes to try, with the goal of increasing the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation. Mr. Levin, Democrat of Michigan, said he would replace Ms. Gillibrand's measure — which has 27 co-sponsors, including four Republicans — with one that would require a senior military officer to review decisions by commanders who decline to prosecute sexual assault cases. Although Mr. Levin's measure would change the current system, it would keep prosecution of sexual assault cases within the chain of command, as the military wants.Mr. Levin's decision to support military brass in their resistance to Ms. Gillibrand's proposal sets up a confrontation between a long-serving chairman of the committee with strong ties to the armed forces and a relatively new female member — one of a record seven women serving on the committee — who has made sexual assault in the military a signature issue."They basically embrace the status quo here," said Senator Barbara Boxer, Democrat of California, a co-sponsor of Ms. Gillibrand's bill. "It's outrageous."A recent Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 assaults took place last year. Senior military officials have repeatedly traipsed to Capitol Hill this spring to lament the problem but have been ridiculed by members of both parties of the Armed Services Committee for failing to make a dent in the problem.In an odd twist Tuesday, Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont, told Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel that Congress could seek to replace commanders in power with state prosecutors to deal with the military sexual assault cases. "To do things as they've always been done is not acceptable," Mr. Leahy said.Mr. Leahy made his comments during a spending hearing that included Mr. Hagel and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. "I'm just throwing that out there," Mr. Leahy said. "I'm not looking for an answer."State courts already have the authority over rape and sexual assault cases should a victim choose to go to civilian law enforcement, but such cases are rare because the military prefers to prosecute its own personnel."If word gets out that the military justice system is not properly attentive to these cases, military personnel will vote with their feet," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale Law School.The House this week is expected to pass its own defense bill, which contains provisions to punish sexual assault crimes in the military more harshly and make it difficult for commanders to overturn convictions.The Senate bill is also expected to include measures that would provide victims of sexual assault with a special military lawyer and that would automatically remove convicted sex offenders from the military. Other expected provisions would require a commander to provide written justification for any decision commuting or lessening a sentence after a guilty verdict in a court-martial.Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, is in the meantime still holding up the nomination of Lt. Gen. Susan Helms of the Air Force to become vice commander of the United States Space Command because General Helms overturned a jury conviction in a sexual assault case without public explanation."I continue to have deep concerns with Lieutenant General Helms's decision, while a commander and courts-martial convening authority, to overturn the jury verdict of a military court-martial in which the jury found an Air Force officer guilty of sexual assault," Ms. McCaskill said in remarks submitted to the Congressional Record.Ms. Gillbrand may have a chance to renew her measure on the Senate floor this summer, something she will almost certainly seek. "Senator Gillibrand has nerves of steel," Mr. Fidell said. "Whether her bill is what Congress should enact I don't know, but I commend her for standing her ground."
KILLEEN, Tex. — Days after the Army major charged in the Fort Hood shooting rampage here in 2009 argued that he had carried out the attack to protect Taliban leaders from American soldiers, a military judge effectively tossed out his defense, ruling on Friday that the claim had no legal merit.Last week, Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan told the judge he was protecting Taliban leaders in Afghanistan from danger when he opened fire at the base on Nov. 5, 2009, killing 13 people. In describing his new defense — known in legal terms as a "defense of others" — he said he was defending the lives of Taliban leaders, including Mullah Muhammad Omar, the group's founder, from Fort Hood soldiers deploying to Afghanistan.On Friday, the judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, told Major Hasan that his defense in this case failed as a matter of law, and that no one at Fort Hood posed an immediate threat to anyone in Afghanistan that day. In addition, she told him that the legitimacy of the United States' involvement in the war in Afghanistan was not at issue in the case, and that as a soldier, he had no justification to kill other soldiers. He was forbidden to present evidence and testimony relating to his "defense of others" argument when his trial begins.Major Hasan, who is representing himself after releasing his court-appointed military lawyers, sat in a wheelchair at the defense table, listening quietly as she delivered her ruling. He was shot by the police in the attack and is paralyzed from the waist down."I object to your ruling, for the record," he told Colonel Osborn, a former Army prosecutor and combat veteran of the 1991 Persian Gulf war.She then quickly moved on to the next subject. She did not address Major Hasan's request for a three-month delay of his trial in order to prepare his defense. He had filed legal briefs outlining the facts and evidence he believed supported his claim.Some delay will be necessary, regardless of whether she grants his request, because jury selection has not begun. It had been scheduled to start last week, and the trial had been set for July 1.Major Hasan's next steps were unclear. He could appeal aspects of her ruling, experts in military law said, though such issues may have to wait until the end of the trial before being heard by a military appeals court.A "defense of others" claim requires a defendant to prove he was compelled to use force against an aggressor to protect others from being harmed or killed by that person. Former military lawyers said Major Hasan's theory failed to meet the criteria of "defense of others" cases, and even his former lawyers were opposed to such a defense, he told the judge at a previous hearing.Experts in military law said "defense of others" cases required defendants to prove that those they were protecting were victims of unlawful force and faced an immediate threat or danger. The threat to the Taliban was neither immediate nor unlawful, they said, adding that they believed the judge was on solid legal ground in tossing out the defense."A defendant has no right to present a defense theory that cannot in any way, shape or form be supported by the facts," said Geoffrey S. Corn, an adviser to the National Institute of Military Justice and a professor at the South Texas College of Law. "It would be like Charles Manson claiming self-defense. Judges are very, very liberal in allowing defenses, but there has to be some plausible factual basis for the defense theory."But Major Hasan's former civilian lawyer, John P. Galligan, called Colonel Osborn's ruling a mistake and said it opened up a potential appellate issue: By prohibiting him from presenting evidence and testimony on his defense, Major Hasan can argue that the judge prevented him from taking the stand at his trial, though her ruling did not specifically restrict him from testifying."In the context of a death penalty case, I'd be very, very leery of a judge seeking to put restrictions on what a defendant can assert, in terms of his mental state and what he perceives as being a defense," Mr. Galligan said. "Every criminal defendant has a fundamental right to present a defense."Mr. Galligan  said he was not surprised by Major Hasan's statements about wanting to protect the Taliban.  "He's not insane," he said. "I believe that there are a lot of people in this world that have that belief. They're going to say that statement makes perfect sense, whether you accept it or not."
WASHINGTON — When Senator Carl Levin of Michigan stripped a measure aimed at curbing sexual assault in the military out of a defense bill this week, it was widely seen as a trampling by a long-serving male committee chairman on female lawmakers seeking justice for victims.But the truth reflects a more complex battle driven by legislative competition, policy differences and the limits of identity politics in a chamber where women's numbers and power are increasing.The vote to replace the measure offered by Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, in favor of a more modest provision pushed by Mr. Levin, the Democrat who is chairman of the Armed Services Committee, did not break down along gender lines: of the seven women on the committee, three, including a fellow Democrat, Senator Claire McCaskill of Missouri, sided with Mr. Levin. "I think all of us need to acknowledge that this isn't a gender issue," said Senator Deb Fischer, Republican of Nebraska, at a recent hearing.Nor was it particularly partisan. Senator Ted Cruz of Texas and Senator David Vitter of Louisiana, two of the most conservative Republicans on the committee, sided with Ms. Gillibrand, while seven Democrats and an independent peeled away.Ms. Gillibrand's measure, which she is likely to revive on the Senate floor this fall, would give military prosecutors rather than commanders the power to decide which sexual assaults to try, with the goal of increasing the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation.Mr. Levin's bill requires a senior military officer to review decisions by commanders who decline to prosecute sexual assault cases. Although his measure would change the current system, it would keep prosecution of such cases within the chain of command, as the military wants.Mr. Cruz did not buy it. "The data indicates that there is persistent reluctance to report sexual assault," he said. "Senator Gillibrand made an effective case."Unlike so many Congressional policy battles that end with an empty pot, the search for sexual assault legislation is likely to result in significant policy changes to military laws. All told, more than a dozen sexual assault provisions were approved by the committee this week and are headed for the Senate floor.On Friday, the House passed a defense bill that contained some of the broadest changes to military law intended to curb and more strongly punish sexual assault. The bill would strip commanders of their authority to dismiss a finding by a court-martial, establish minimum sentences for sexual assault convictions, permit victims of sexual assault to apply for a permanent change of station or unit transfer, and ensure that convicted offenders leave the military.Many lawmakers say commanders wield too much power on both the front and back end of prosecutions. A Navy judge ruled this week in a pretrial hearing that two defendants in military sexual assault cases could not be punitively discharged because President Obama, in public remarks, exercised "unlawful command influence" when he said offenders should be "prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged. Period." The decision was first reported by Stars and Stripes."Statements by high officials have always been problematic," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teachers military justice at Yale Law School. "On the one hand, people do look to them to take a stand on things; on the other hand, we are administrating justice here." Should Congress pass a measure that would require sexual assault offenders to be dishonorably discharged, it would not necessarily render this type of contention moot, Mr. Fidell said, because "those comments would have a distorting effect on the question of conviction."The measures in the Senate include a mandatory review of decisions by commanders not to prosecute sexual assault; making retaliation a crime; and subjecting sex offenders to automatic dishonorable discharges. Commanders would also no longer be able to overturn jury convictions unilaterally.
WASHINGTON — Women will be permitted to serve in the most intense and physically hazardous combat positions in the military, including the Navy SEALs , the Army Rangers and the Marine infantry, senior defense officials said Monday.Leaders of each service branch are expected to make public at the Pentagon on Tuesday their plans for how they will integrate women into the units without reducing rigorous standards.Although Leon E. Panetta announced in January in one of his last decisions as defense secretary that he was lifting the military's official ban on women in combat, he did not specify which of the hundreds of thousands of front-line combat positions might be open to them.The plans to be released on Tuesday under Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel indicate for the first time that the military is prepared to integrate women into the most elite combat units, like the SEALs, who carried out the raid that killed Osama bin Laden.The elite units are among the most physically and psychologically demanding in the military, requiring the carrying of enormous amounts of weight on foot over long distances and on dangerous missions. Most male applicants fail to qualify for the positions.Under the plan announced by Mr. Panetta, the service branches have until January 2016 to decide which combat positions should be open to women. But the emphasis is on inclusion: If a branch of the military decides that a specific job should not be opened to women, representatives of the branch will have to ask the defense secretary for an exception.The integration of women into combat roles comes as the Pentagon is struggling with the problem of sexual assault in the military — and as Congress is losing patience with what many lawmakers say is the military's failure to act. A Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 assaults took place last year.In January, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said it was possible that officially allowing women in combat might alleviate some problems of sexual harassment and assault."We've had this ongoing issue with sexual harassment, sexual assault," General Dempsey said at the time. "I believe it's because we've had separate classes of military personnel, at some level. Now, you know, it's far more complicated than that, but when you have one part of the population that is designated as warriors and another part that's designated as something else, I think that disparity begins to establish a psychology that in some cases led to that environment. I have to believe, the more we can treat people equally, the more likely they are to treat each other equally."Many members of Congress have long pushed to officially integrate women into combat roles since in reality many women found themselves in combat in Iraq and Afghanistan."Officially recognizing women in combat will strengthen our country both morally and militarily," said Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, Democrat of New York and a member of the Armed Services Committee."By officially opening combat roles," she added, "more women will be able to advance their careers to the senior ranks and increase the diversity of our military leadership."Some members of Congress were less enthusiastic. At the time of Mr. Panetta's announcement, Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, the highest-ranking Republican on the Armed Services Committee, said in a statement: "If necessary, we will be able to introduce legislation to stop any changes we believe to be detrimental to our fighting forces and capabilities."Women make up about 15 percent of the armed forces, and many of them serve in dangerous roles on the front lines. Of the roughly 280,000 women deployed to Iraq and Afghanistan, more than 100 were killed in action.Under the combat exclusion policy, the 1994 Pentagon rule that restricted women from artillery, armor, infantry and other combat roles, women nonetheless served in combat, particularly in Iraq and Afghanistan, when they were "attached" to combat units. But the bureaucratic sidestep gave them no official credit for the combat experience that is required for advancing up the ranks of the military.
WASHINGTON — "The days of Rambo are over," the two-star general in charge of personnel policy for Special Operations Command said on Tuesday in explaining the changes in military culture that led to opening front-line combat positions to women.The officer, Maj. Gen. Bennet Sacolick, director of force management for Special Operations Command, which trains elite Rangers, Green Berets and SEAL units, said the military today required as much intellectual power as firepower."We're looking for young men that can speak and learn a foreign language and understand culture, who can work with indigenous populations," he said at a Pentagon briefing about moving women into combat jobs. "When people fail in the Special Forces qualification course, predominantly they fail because they're not doing their homework."He said that female troops already deploy effectively in combat zones as members of Special Operations cultural support teams carrying out counterinsurgency missions at the village level. "I was encouraged by just the physical performance of some of the young girls that aspire to go into the cultural support teams," General Sacolick said. "They very well may provide a foundation for ultimate integration."Even so, as the individual armed services unveiled their plans on Tuesday for carrying out the order to integrate women into hazardous and demanding combat positions, General Sacolick and others said that it might be as difficult for women to fit into male-dominated combat units as to meet physical requirements likes loading heavy tank shells.As proof of that concern, Special Operations Command will survey its personnel for their views about integrating women into teams that operate in distant and difficult environments. It is an acknowledgment that commando units present the greatest challenge to integrating women into more combat positions."The concern is privacy issues and health and welfare of female operators in an austere environment," General Sacolick said. Even so, he said that no Special Operations unit is off-limits for consideration as the military assesses dropping gender barriers.However, despite a tableau of senior personnel officers gathered at the Pentagon to explain how they were marching toward a future of gender integration in combat, the process will be slow and deliberate.The military has until Jan. 1, 2016, to open all combat positions to women — or convince the defense secretary of the rationale for exempting some units from gender integration. Congress must be notified along the way of decisions that could, potentially, open 237,000 combat positions to women, who make up 15 percent of the military.The services have identified a few previously closed combat jobs that can be opened more rapidly to women.The Navy pledged that, by July, it will inform Congress of plans to bring women into its Coastal Riverine Force, which operates along shorelines in harbors, rivers and bays. And the Air Force's director of force management, Brig. Gen. Gina Grosso, noted that today's high-tech, computerized warplanes are intellectually demanding to operate and repair, and that the physical ability of a pilot to say, carry a heavy toolbox, is less important.
WASHINGTON — A 16-year-old law that bars American aid to foreign security forces that violate human rights is drawing unusual fire from some top military commanders who say it undermines their ability to train the troops to fight militants and drug traffickers.The rare dispute involving some of the military's top uniformed officers, the State Department and a powerful Democratic senator is important because as the Obama administration winds down the war in Afghanistan and reins in the Central Intelligence Agency's armed drone program, the Pentagon is increasingly training and equipping local security services to combat militants in their countries so American troops do not have to.The complaints about the law's requirements come from several ranking admirals and generals, including Adm. William H. McRaven, a member of the Navy SEALs who led the raid that killed Osama bin Laden and who now heads the Special Operations Command, as well as senior commanders who oversee operations in Africa and in Latin America.The criticism of the prominent human rights law comes at a time when President Obama has elevated two longtime proponents of protecting human rights: Susan E. Rice to be national security adviser and Samantha Power to be United States ambassador to the United Nations.At issue is the so-called Leahy amendment, a 1997 provision to a foreign aid bill named after its author, Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont, which bars the United States from providing training or equipment to foreign troops or units who commit "gross human rights violations" like rape, murder or torture.Over the years, the United States has invoked the law to bar assistance to troops of major allies like Pakistan and Indonesia, and dozens of other nations. Human rights advocates have hailed the law as instrumental in preventing human rights violators from receiving American taxpayer-financed assistance."It's a really important tool, but it's not a panacea," said Stephen Rickard, Washington director of the Open Society Foundations.Admiral McRaven and other top officers say that they support the spirit of the Leahy amendment, but that changes in the law two years ago aimed at strengthening its enforcement have complicated their ability to train and equip foreign security forces, many of which are now front-line units fighting Al Qaeda and its affiliates.The revised law emphasizes that the United States must suspend aid to an entire unit even if only one or two members are implicated in human rights violations. Assistance to the unit is suspended while the allegation is investigated. Aid cannot be restored until the home country deals with the culprits, a process that can take weeks or months, if it happens at all, critics say."We absolutely want to ensure that the forces we're working with understand and appreciate their requirement to maintain appropriate human rights," Admiral McRaven told Congress in March, the first of several public comments he has made on the law's impact in recent months. "Unfortunately, it has restricted us in a number of countries across the globe in our ability to train units that we think need to be trained."In 2011, 1,766 individuals and units from 46 countries, out of a total of about 200,000 cases, were denied assistance because of human rights concerns, according to the State Department. It is a significant figure, proponents say, even though it represented less than 1 percent of all candidates for assistance. The figures are roughly the same for 2012 and so far this year, officials said.But military commanders looking at the same cases say valuable training has been suspended for hundreds of troops not implicated, training that could prevent future abuses."We're always going to comply with Leahy vetting, but the conundrum it presents us is that the nations whose militaries have had human rights violations perhaps are the ones that need U.S. engagement the most," said Vice Adm. Charles J. Leidig Jr., the Africa Command's military deputy.The officers also say the vetting process can be slow, sometimes taking weeks or months, and the path to rehabilitation for a wayward unit is vague.
Sexual assault has emerged as one of the defining issues for the military this year. Reports of assaults are up, as are questions about whether commanders have taken the problem seriously. Bills to toughen penalties and prosecution have been introduced in Congress.But in a debate that has focused largely on women, this fact is often overlooked: the majority of service members who are sexually assaulted each year are men.In its latest report on sexual assault, the Pentagon estimated that 26,000 service members experienced unwanted sexual contact in 2012, up from 19,000 in 2010. Of those cases, the Pentagon says, 53 percent involved attacks on men, mostly by other men."It's easy for some people to single out women and say: 'There's a small percentage of the force having this problem,' " said First Lt. Adam Cohen, who said he was raped by a superior officer. "No one wants to admit this problem affects everyone. Both genders, of all ranks. It's a cultural problem."Though women, who represent about 15 percent of the force, are significantly more likely to be sexually assaulted in the military than men, experts say assaults against men have been vastly underreported. For that reason, the majority of formal complaints of military sexual assault have been filed by women, even though the majority of victims are thought to be men."Men don't acknowledge being victims of sexual assault," said Dr. Carol O'Brien, the chief of post-traumatic stress disorder programs at the Bay Pines Veterans Affairs Health Care System in Florida, which has a residential treatment program for sexually abused veterans. "Men tend to feel a great deal of shame, embarrassment and fear that others will respond negatively."But in recent months, intense efforts on Capitol Hill to curb military sexual assault, and the release of a new documentary about male sexual assault victims in the military, "Justice Denied," have brought new attention to male victims. Advocates say their plight shows that sexual assault has risen not because there are more women in the ranks but because sexual violence is often tolerated."I think telling the story about male victims is the key to changing the culture of the military," said Anu K. Bhagwati, executive director of the Service Women's Action Network, an advocacy group that has sharply criticized the Pentagon's handling of sexual assault. "I think it places the onus on the institution when people realize it's also men who are victims."The Department of Defense says it is developing plans to encourage more men to report the crime. "A focus of our prevention efforts over the next several months is specifically geared towards male survivors and will include why male survivors report at much lower rates than female survivors, and determining the unique support and assistance male survivors need," Cynthia O. Smith, a department spokeswoman, said in a statement.In interviews, nearly a dozen current and former service members who said they were sexually assaulted in the military described fearing that they would be punished, ignored or ridiculed if they reported the attacks. Most said that before 2011, when the ban on openly gay service members was repealed, they believed they would have been discharged if they admitted having sexual contact — even unwanted contact — with other men."Back in 1969, you didn't dare say a word," said Gregory Helle, an author who says he was raped in his barracks by another soldier in Vietnam. "They wouldn't have believed me. Homophobia was big back then."Thomas F. Drapac says he was raped on three occasions by higher-ranking enlisted sailors in Norfolk in 1966. He said he had been drinking each time and feared that if he told prosecutors they would assume it was consensual sex. Parts of his story are corroborated in Department of Veterans Affairs records."If you made a complaint, then you are gay and you're out and that's it," he said.Mr. Drapac, 66, said that over the coming decades he kept the rapes to himself, combating recurring nightmares and doubts about his sexuality with alcohol and drugs. But he began seeing a Department of Veterans Affairs therapist several years ago, and decided to tell his story recently after seeing accounts of female sexual assault victims."The best thing going on right now is that the women's issue is coming to the fore and you see some mention about male rapes," he said.
WASHINGTON — Gen. Ray Odierno , the Army chief of staff, said Tuesday that the Army would institute the largest organizational change since World War II by eliminating combat forces from 10 bases across the United States, part of a planned reduction of 80,000 active-duty troops over the next five years.The announcement supports the Army's effort to downsize the active-duty force to 490,000 as the military winds down from the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan. The cuts were a result of the 2011 Budget Control Act that required $487 billion in military spending cuts over a decade. This is the fourth round of budget cuts for the military since President Obama took office.Under the plan, the Army will cut its brigade combat teams to 33 from 45 by 2017 at bases in Colorado, Georgia, Kansas, Kentucky, New York, North Carolina, Texas and Washington State. A brigade is roughly 3,500 to 5,000 people. Two additional brigades in Germany, at Baumholder and Grafenwöhr, have already been scheduled for elimination this year.General Odierno said the cutbacks are only a precursor to further action. "There is going to be another reduction," he said at a Pentagon news conference. "There is no away around it."The across-the-board budget cuts known as sequestration, which calls for some $500 million in military spending reductions by 2022, could force the Army to speed up its current plans for cuts.General Odierno said that most of the troop reductions will occur with natural attrition, but if "full sequestration occurs," then the Army will have to cut more officers, including colonels, lieutenant colonels and captains.The cuts are certain to be unpopular in the communities where the bases are a significant source of local jobs, although General Odierno said the Army had tried to minimize the damage. In the past year, the Army has conducted an extensive study on the economic impacts of the reductions and held community meetings across the country."I know in the local communities it will have its impact," General Odierno said. But "we've tried to make it as small an impact as possible for as many communities as we could."The brigades will be cut from Fort Drum, N.Y.; Fort Campbell, Ky.; Fort Knox, Ky.; Fort Hood, Tex.; Fort Bliss, Tex.; Fort Bragg, N.C.; Fort Carson, Colo.; Fort Riley, Kan.; Fort Stewart, Ga.; and Joint Base Lewis-McChord, Wash.Representative Howard P. McKeon, the California Republican who is chairman of the House Armed Services Committee, said that he would take a close look at the cuts. "As damaging as they are, these cuts don't begin to reflect the crippling damage sequestration will do to our armed forces and national security," he said in a statement. He added that "we all must understand that this is only the tip of the iceberg, much deeper cuts are still to come."Representative Adam Smith of Washington, the ranking Democrat on the Armed Services Committee, also warned about sequestration. "Given the drawdown in Afghanistan, the Army can manage this reduction in end strength," he said in a statement. But, he said: "The real hazard to military effectiveness will persist as long as Congress fails to act on sequestration. If sequestration is not removed, then more extensive force structure changes will need to be made."
WASHINGTON — The former second-ranking officer in the United States military, retired Gen. James E. Cartwright of the Marines, is a target of an investigation into the leak of classified information about American cyberattacks on Iran's nuclear program , a person familiar with the investigation confirmed Thursday night.The leak investigation, being carried out by the United States attorney for Maryland, Rod J. Rosenstein, was announced by Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. after articles in The New York Times described an ambitious series of cyberattacks under the code name Olympic Games that were intended to slow Iran's progress toward a nuclear bomb. That General Cartwright is a focus of the leak inquiry was first reported by NBC News.The general, 63, who served as vice chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff from 2007 to 2011, became a favorite adviser of President Obama and was considered an influential voice in the White House on security matters.A lawyer for General Cartwright, Gregory B. Craig, who served as White House counsel early in the Obama administration, declined to comment.Marcia Murphy, a spokeswoman for Mr. Rosenstein, declined to confirm or deny whether General Cartwright was being investigated. "We don't have any comment at all," Ms. Murphy said.Since his retirement in 2011, General Cartwright has joined the Center for Strategic and International Studies and has spoken in favor of major cuts in nuclear weapons and warned of possible "blowback" from the use of drone aircraft by the United States in Pakistan and Yemen.Asked about the NBC News report, Jill Abramson, executive editor of The New York Times, said, "We don't comment on our confidential sources."Since President Obama took office in 2009, seven current or former government officials or contractors have been charged under the Espionage Act with leaking classified information, compared with three under all previous presidents. The seventh person charged was Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor who has acknowledged giving classified documents to The Guardian and The Washington Post.Press advocates have criticized the unprecedented crackdown on leaks, in which F.B.I. investigators have used e-mail and telephone records to track exchanges between reporters and sources, saying it endangers reporting on national security. But Mr. Obama and Mr. Holder have said that leaks can put American security at risk.
ALBUQUERQUE — During his eight years in the Air Force, Staff Sgt. Justin Lahl grew adept at keeping his sexual orientation a secret — wincing inwardly when fellow airmen made homophobic wisecracks, nodding with a smile when others would caricature gay people for laughs.He was painstakingly careful about whom he trusted, telling only his roommate and a few friends that he was gay.These days, though, Sergeant Lahl, a 26-year-old aircraft mechanic, is not only open about his identity, but he has also become a leader of the Gay-Straight Alliance here at Kirtland Air Force Base, a support group for gay and lesbian service members that is the first of its kind in the Air Force.The new organization at Kirtland, founded with the approval of the base's commander, is one of a handful of similar groups that have been forming at bases around the country since President Obama repealed in 2011 the military's "don't ask, don't tell" policy, which barred openly gay and bisexual people from serving in the military.Soldiers like Sergeant Lahl represent a new day for the military, in which gay and lesbian soldiers in increasing numbers are seeking to form official support organizations to help negotiate the unique challenges they face."It's been liberating, being able to be myself and not two separate people — one person at work and one at home," said Sergeant Lahl, who serves as vice president of the group at Kirtland. "We're not just this nameless, faceless person anymore. We're a presence on the base."The group here has about 12 active-duty gay and lesbian members, along with dozens of veterans and civilians, and three straight airmen. In its first year, membership has increased more than fivefold. The base employs about 20,000 people, including more than 3,200 active-duty service members.Each month the support group meets to socialize and discuss a variety of issues, counseling airmen who have not yet come out and helping gay service members who want to advance in their military careers."As our group gets bigger, the hope is that it normalizes the LGBT folks in the military," said Capt. Greg Moran, the group's president, recalling how in years past, gay service members like him had to seek support surreptitiously.While the Kirtland group is thought to be the only one in the Air Force, according to an Air Force spokeswoman, Lt. Col. Laurel Tingley, similar organizations have formed in the Navy.Last year, Petty Officer Second Class Ann Foster started the first chapter of the Gay, Lesbian and Supporting Sailors, or Glass, at Naval Station Great Lakes in Illinois, the Navy's largest training facility. She said she was moved to form the organization after watching a fellow lesbian sailor struggle to support her spouse and children without the same military benefits given to straight families. The base's commanders threw their support behind the idea, she said, swiftly approving bylaws and a charter.Within the last few months, chapters have formed on three Navy ships and one additional base, Petty Officer Foster said, and 15 more are in the process of seeking charters.Petty Officer Foster, 27, attributed the spread of the groups to a new generation of junior enlisted sailors, who grew up accustomed to having openly gay friends and family and for whom the "don't ask, don't tell" policy seemed obsolete. A similar gay-straight support club for midshipmen and military cadets, called Spectrum, has been started at the Naval and Air Force Academies and at West Point."They don't have that innate fear that people who had been in the Navy for longer periods of time and who served under 'don't ask, don't tell' have," she said. "By the time I started Glass, there were people coming out of boot camp who had never actually served under it."Nonetheless, Petty Officer Foster noted that there were still Navy commanders who were uneasy about the groups forming under their watch. And at least for now, the organizations appear to be limited, in terms of active-duty service members, to the Navy and the Air Force.
WASHINGTON — A test launching of an advanced missile-defense interceptor failed to hit its target high over the Pacific Ocean, the Pentagon said on Friday, four months after the Obama administration announced that it would spend $1 billion to increase the number of interceptors along the West Coast in response to verbal threats from North Korea .A brief Defense Department statement issued Friday said a long-range ballistic missile target had been launched from an Army test range in the Marshall Islands, and that an interceptor had been launched from Vandenberg Air Force Base in California to destroy it."An intercept was not achieved," the statement said. "Program officials will conduct an extensive review to determine the cause or causes of any anomalies which may have prevented a successful intercept."Some skeptics of the missile-defense program saw the failure as additional evidence that the technology was unreliable and might not be worth the expense.Philip E. Coyle III, who once ran the Pentagon's weapons-testing program and is with the Center for Arms Control, said in a statement that the system "is something the U.S. military, and the American people, cannot depend upon."Mr. Coyle said there had been no successful tests of the ground-based, midcourse missile-defense system, like the one launched Friday, in five years. Pentagon officials acknowledge that the interceptors had a mixed record, hitting dummy targets just 50 percent of the time.In March, as tensions mounted on the Korean Peninsula, the administration announced that it would increase ground-based interceptors in California and Alaska to 44 from 30 by 2017.All 14 of the new interceptors are to be placed in silos at Fort Greely, Alaska, where there are already 26 interceptors. Four others are at Vandenberg.The increase in interceptors was intended not merely to present a credible deterrent to North Korea's limited intercontinental ballistic missile arsenal, but also to show South Korea and Japan that the United States was willing to commit resources to deterring the North. At the same time, American officials warned China that it must restrain its ally or face an expanding American military focus on Asia.
The Sikhs of northwestern India have for centuries cherished their rich military history. Wearing long beards and turbans into combat, they have battled Mughals in Punjab, Afghans near the Khyber Pass and Germans in the bloody trenches of the Somme.But when Maj. Kamaljeet Singh Kalsi, an American Sikh raised in New Jersey, signed up for the United States Army, that tradition counted for nothing. Before sending him to officer basic training, the Army told him that he would have to give up the basic symbols of his religion: his beard, knee-length hair and turban.In good Sikh tradition, he resisted. Armed with petitions and Congressional letters, he waged a two-year campaign that in 2009 resulted in the Army granting him a special exception for his unshorn hair, the first such accommodation to a policy established in the 1980s.Since then, two other Sikhs have won accommodations from the Army. But many others have failed. And so now, as he prepares to leave active duty, Major Kalsi, who earned a Bronze Star in Afghanistan, is waging a new campaign: to rescind those strict rules that he believes have blocked hundreds of Sikhs from joining the military."Folks say, 'If you really want to serve, why don't you cut your beard?' " said Major Kalsi, a doctor who is the medical director of emergency medical services at Fort Bragg in North Carolina. "But asking a person to choose between religion and country, that's not who we are as a nation. We're better than that. We can be Sikhs and soldiers at the same time."At stake for the military is the uniformity in appearance that it deems necessary for good order and discipline. "A neat and well-groomed appearance is fundamental to Army service," said Troy A. Rolan, an Army spokesman. "It is an outward symbol of a disciplined military."But to Sikh advocates and their supporters in Congress, the policies governing appearance are as fundamentally discriminatory to them as racially segregated units were to blacks, combat prohibitions were to women and the "don't ask, don't tell" policy was to gay men and lesbians."They love this country," said Representative Joseph Crowley, Democrat of New York, who has been urging the Pentagon to change its rules regarding Sikhs. "If they want to serve, we should let them do it."Sikh leaders cite an additional reason for their push. In the days after the Sept. 11 attacks, Sikhs were attacked, and at least one was killed, by assailants who confused them with fundamentalist Muslims. Last year, a white supremacist shot to death six Sikhs in their gurudwara, or place of worship, near Milwaukee.The more Sikhs wear military, police or firefighter uniforms, Major Kalsi reasoned, the less often Americans will see them as threatening outsiders. "When you see a Sikh firefighter save your daughter, you'll think, 'That's a member of my community,' " said Major Kalsi, a 36-year-old father of two.Although there were Sikhs in the United States in the 19th century, their population grew rapidly in the 1980s after a crackdown against an independence movement in Punjab caused thousands of Sikhs to emigrate. Today the Sikh Coalition, an advocacy group, estimates that about half a million Sikhs live in America, concentrated in California and New York. There are about 30 million Sikhs worldwide.The first Sikh guru was born a Hindu in the 15th century, but the monotheistic religion he founded was more democratic than Hinduism, rejecting caste and embracing worshipers of both genders and all races.As the religion took root in what is today northwestern India, Sikhs formed their own militias to defend against marauding armies. When the British colonized the region, they recognized that fighting spirit and created Sikh battalions to carry the empire's banner across the globe. Today, Sikhs continue to serve in the Indian military in numbers far exceeding their small portion of the population.Nikky-Guninder Kaur Singh, the chairwoman of the department of religious studies at Colby College in Maine, said the five articles of Sikh faith were established by the 10th Sikh guru to give his people a sense of identity when they were chafing under the Islamic Mughal court of Delhi.The five articles are unshorn hair, a comb, a wristband made of iron or steel, underwear (a symbol of sexual modesty and personal hygiene) and a sword. The turban is worn as a sign of religious respect but also as a matter of practicality, to bind up long hair."To challenge that oppression, guru said, 'Be who you are: hold your sword, wear your hair long,' " Dr. Singh said. "It was partly to instill courage."
GETTYSBURG, Pa. — Like thousands of other re-enactors, Eric Mueller honors the sacrifices of soldiers in the Civil War by going to great lengths to live as they did — sleeping beneath a canvas sheet suspended on wooden posts, eating hardtack and salt pork, carrying 60 rounds of ammunition in a cartridge box and a backpack, and marching long distances in heavy woolen tunics.But in the interests of safety and perhaps a little comfort, Mr. Mueller, 40, allows modest divergences from the 19th-century soldier's life.Last week, for example, Mr. Mueller packed in his knapsack two sweet potatoes and two small onions, foods that he conceded may not have been in season in southern Pennsylvania in the summer of 1863, and so would not have been available to Civil War troops even if they had tried to forage them from nearby farms.Still, he subjected himself to discomforts like not washing for a week and squeezing his six-foot frame into a 5-foot-8-inch-long tent that he shared with another re-enactor. Mr. Mueller, a civil servant from Hawaii, said he stayed "reasonably dry" during four nights of camping out on Cemetery Ridge in the heart of the Gettysburg battlefield.Minute attention to detail is a source of pride, and sometimes controversy, among Civil War re-enactors, at least 10,000 of whom gathered in Gettysburg from the Fourth of July through Sunday to mark 150 years since Union troops won the decisive battle that turned the war in the North's favor.Some re-enactors — known as "hardcores" or "campaigners" — eschew any trace of modernity in their quest for authenticity. Others — often known as "mainstreamers" — participate in re-enactments as a hobby and sometimes feel shunned for a lack of commitment to historical precision."There are some hardcores that really look down on mainstream re-enactors," said Jennifer Haines, 65, a retired nurse who played the role of major in the Confederate Army of Northern Virginia. "They don't feel that we are presenting history as it should be."Some hardcores believe it is not appropriate for women and children to participate in recreations of 19th-century Army life because they were not part of the real thing. "Having women and children in the Army would not be accurate," said Doug Dobbs, a high school history teacher from Hagerstown, Md.Ms. Haines had come to Gettysburg with her daughter and son-in-law and three granddaughters, all of whom have their historical functions, she said from outside her tent.For Mr. Dobbs, 59, being faithful to the cause meant spending a week marching 120 miles from Chantilly, Va., to Gettysburg, arriving at the battlefield at 4 p.m. on July 2, as the 15th New Jersey Company E did exactly 150 years earlier.He and three companions, all dressed in the heavy wool coats and breeches of the Union army, marched 37 miles on the final day of their trip, emulating their forebears, including Mr. Dobbs's great-great-grandfather James Dow, a private in the company.Despite his loyalty to the past, even Mr. Dobbs made concessions to modernity during the grueling march by accepting offers of pizza and by walking on roads that did not exist in 1863. And he said that period clothing did not help in the summer heat. "It would have been easier in shorts and a T-shirt," he said.Mr. Dobbs said that his zeal has led other re-enactors to brand him a "hardcore" but that he dislikes the term because it suggests he looks down on those who take a less rigorous approach.Adam Lipke, 37, a re-enactor who shared a tent with Mr. Mueller, wore a blue shirt that he had made himself in the style of the 1860s, but he said that he had chosen to save time by using a sewing machine to stitch, a technique that he said would be rejected by more zealous re-enactors.Still, Mr. Lipke, a city worker in Honolulu, said he had spent about $120 on a replica soldier's hat, complete with hand stitching and a re-creation of the original label. "This is the most authentic piece I have," he said.Walter Hilderman III, 64, a retired police officer from Eutawville, S.C., acknowledged some tension between re-enactment groups, but said there was room in the movement for all persuasions.Mr. Hilderman, who has been attending re-enactment events for 50 years, including the 100th anniversary of the Battle of Gettysburg, said he has no plans to stop."We are all historians," he said. "We love this and we are going to keep doing it as long as we can walk in a straight line."
NAVAL STATION GREAT LAKES, Ill. — On Day 3 of Navy boot camp here, recruits sat through a two-hour session on sexual harassment and sexual assault — including a warning that alcohol often plays a significant role, but is never a defense."Do you think 'Ms. Sloppy Drunk' can give consent for sexual intercourse?" Petty Officer First Class Vince Turner, just back from an 11-month deployment in the Mediterranean, asked 100 recruits in a recent class.He answered his own question: "Of course not. If this happens, it's like an insider attack."It was the third time in the opening days of an eight-week boot camp that recruits were confronted with the problem of sexual assault in the military. On the bus ride from O'Hare International Airport to start basic training, they watched a videotape of Capt. John T. Dye, who commands the Navy's only boot camp, speaking directly about sexual assault as a crime. The video message was repeated the next day as recruits waited for medical screening and their first Navy haircuts."It is our job to inculcate them into our culture, which is one that does not tolerate sexual assault," Captain Dye said.Statistics so far show success for the new effort, which combines counseling, training, intervention and prevention — a surprise even to Navy officials who designed the pilot program. Since the initiative began in early 2011, reports here of serious sexual assaults, defined as nonconsensual penetration, or the attempt at it, have dropped more than 60 percent.In Washington, it has taken the misbehavior of generals, admirals, colonels and captains to prompt Congress to demand legislative antidotes for sexual assault in the military.But the vast majority of the crimes occur among the more anonymous ranks of junior enlisted personnel — the exact cohort here at Great Lakes.Service members ages 18 to 24 are most likely to be sexually assaulted, according to Navy statistics. The perpetrators are the same age or slightly older, and are most often well-known to the victims and usually just one rank higher — petty officers attacking seamen, or seamen assaulting the apprentices they supervise.At Naval Station Great Lakes, sexual assault became so pervasive in recent years that officials viewed the installation as a "petri dish" where they could study the problem and try out remedies on both recruits and recent graduates of boot camp.After officially joining the Navy's ranks, about 40 percent of the 40,000 sailors minted here each year remain at Great Lakes for specialized training, a period in which the young sailors have their first free time and get their first real salaries — and reports of sexual assault rise sharply.Alcohol fuels assault, so young sailors are taught the warning signs for when a shipmate is drinking too much, and how to judge whether another sailor's advances might be all about taking advantage. Hours of training focus on how to intervene gently but firmly to separate someone from a possible predator."Bystander intervention isn't some grandiose thing, a knight in shining armor to keep someone from being raped," said Petty Officer Corryn Fraser, a member of the base's new peer-to-peer mentoring program. "It's more: 'Hey, you shouldn't talk to her that way. That's inappropriate.' Or, 'Don't you think you've had enough to drink?' "Although alcohol is served to those 21 and older at pubs on the grounds of naval stations in the United States and around the world, bartenders at Great Lakes are now prohibited from selling more than one drink at a time to any one sailor, and buying a round for several friends is also no longer allowed. Each sailor must line up, and show ID, to pick up a drink.Some of the assault-prevention initiatives are conducted by specially trained Navy personnel, and some by academic experts or social workers who charge only for travel expenses. Other advanced sessions — one is called "Sex Signals" and another "Afterburner" — are taught on contract and cost the Navy about $500,000 a year. The sessions include a video depicting a fictionalized rape, supplemented by lengthy discussion, which can get explicit.The Navy acknowledges that it cannot use training to change the behavior of sexual predators, but it is trying to train the rest of the sailors to watch out for one another.
FORT MEADE, Md. — The defense in the court-martial of Pfc. Bradley Manning rested its case Wednesday with a Harvard law professor testifying that WikiLeaks performed a legitimate journalistic function when Private Manning gave it vast archives of secret government files.The professor, Yochai Benkler, who wrote a widely cited academic article about WikiLeaks and the evolution of watchdog journalism in the Internet era, testified that at the time of Private Manning's leaks the group had established itself as playing a reputable and valuable journalistic role by publishing documents about corporate misconduct and government corruption around the world."It's a clear, distinct component of what in the history of journalism we see as high points," he said, "where journalists are able to come in and say, here's a system operating in a way that is obscure to the public, and now we're able to shine the light. That's what WikiLeaks showed how to do for the network public sphere."A defense lawyer, David Coombs, called Mr. Benkler as an expert witness in an effort to undercut charges that Private Manning's confessed leaking was not merely illegal but called for more severe charges like "wanton" misconduct and "aiding the enemy," the latter of which could result in a life sentence.After Mr. Benkler completed his testimony, Mr. Coombs told the judge, Col. Denise Lind, that the defense was resting after three days. The prosecution, by contrast, took five weeks to present its case.Colonel Lind asked Private Manning — who during the pretrial phase had read a lengthy statement confessing to most of the leaking with which he had been charged and explaining his motivations — to verify that he had chosen not to testify in his defense.It is not clear whether the defense will seek to put on a rebuttal case before closing arguments. The trial will resume next week.Mr. Benkler's testimony briefly shifted the focus back to WikiLeaks, which in 2010 enjoyed fame and endured criticism over the leaks of hundreds of thousands of secret United States military and diplomatic files. The trial has served to emphasize that Private Manning was the real catalyst for the leaks.A prosecutor, Capt. Joe Morrow, asked Mr. Benkler whether he agreed that the release of documents in bulk was not journalism. Mr. Benkler disagreed, however. Sometimes, he said, a database holds important information even though no single document is newsworthy by itself.As an example, he cited an analysis by the group Iraq Body Count of the logs of Iraq war incidents, which Private Manning leaked, that suggested there had been far higher civilian casualties than officials had estimated.Mr. Benkler has written opinion articles criticizing the severe charges leveled against Private Manning as a threat to investigative journalism.Tracing the history of WikiLeaks' activities, Mr. Benkler said it had initially encountered skepticism over the authenticity of the documents it published. Then, he said, after it had published dozens of documents without having to retract any, it was increasingly accepted as a legitimate journalistic player. The third phase, he said, came after it began publishing the files Private Manning provided.American government officials and lawmakers began denouncing the organization. Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr., for example, called its leader, Julian Assange, a "high-tech terrorist," and the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Adm. Mike Mullen, said it might have "blood on its hands," although Defense Secretary Robert M. Gates later conceded that some of the reaction had been "overwrought."But such claims were amplified, Mr. Benkler noted, by commentators on Fox News and in the Weekly Standard, among other outlets, who sharply criticized WikiLeaks. Its journalistic reputation was also undercut by two prominent articles published by The New York Times — an opinion column by Thomas L. Friedman and a lengthy first-person magazine article by Bill Keller, the paper's executive editor at the time — portraying the group as anarchists and "a secretive cadre of antisecrecy vigilantes."At the same time, Mr. Benkler said, many other news organizations were inaccurately reporting that WikiLeaks had put online 250,000 cables, even though at that point it had published only 272 cables that were chosen and simultaneously published by the traditional news organizations that had obtained advance access to them. WikiLeaks did ultimately release all the cables, though it blamed an editor at The Guardian for inadvertently revealing a password that made their release inevitable.But despite the criticism WikiLeaks has endured, Mr. Benkler said the model it had developed was likely to endure."WikiLeaks may fail in the future because of all these events, but the model of some form of decentralized leaking, that is secure technologically and allows for collaboration among different media in different countries, that's going to survive, and somebody else will build it," he said. "But WikiLeaks played that critical role of that particular critical component of what muckraking and investigative journalism has always done."
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel offered Congress his first formal description of the impact on the Pentagon if across-the-board budget cuts are not lifted by October, writing in a letter on Wednesday that the effectiveness of jet fighter wings, ground combat units and even Special Operations forces would plummet.If the spending cuts, called the sequester, are not lifted with a deal on taxes and spending, the Pentagon will have to find an additional $52 billion in reductions for its 2014 fiscal year beginning Oct. 1."I strongly oppose cuts of that magnitude," Mr. Hagel wrote. "The size, readiness and technological superiority of our military will be reduced, placing at much greater risk the country's ability to meet our current national security commitments."Faced with such cuts, Mr. Hagel wrote that "two Navy air wings might not be able to achieve full flight hours, and Special Operations units, which are key to counterterrorism activities, would experience declining readiness."The Army, he said, would have to cancel training drills, and the Air Force — which Mr. Hagel said had already grounded about one-third of its active-duty combat squadrons — would have to significantly reduce training for more than half of all air combat units.Mr. Hagel's eight-page letter was in response to a request on May 2 from Senator Carl Levin, the Michigan Democrat who is chairman of the Armed Services Committee, and Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, the panel's ranking Republican.That request made clear that Senators Levin and Inhofe were concerned that a large segment of the public, and some members of Congress, did not fear the effect of the cuts on military spending — and might even see the reductions as a tool to trim what many of them perceived to be waste in the Pentagon.But the two senators also wrote that "the identification of these specific reductions will serve both to help Congress and the department prepare for the possibility that we will be unable to avoid another round of sequestration and to show Congress and the public how unpalatable that outcome would be."After reviewing Mr. Hagel's response, Mr. Inhofe said Wednesday that while he would have liked more details, the defense secretary's letter "makes clear that the devastation of sequester budget cuts will only be amplified beyond what we have experienced thus far."Mr. Inhofe warned that "sequestration is leading to the hollowing-out of our military."Mr. Hagel said in the letter that while reductions in troop strength would save money in the long run, there would be few immediate savings if a large number of men and women in uniform were fired. That would make them eligible, he said, for separation payments and reimbursements for unpaid leave.If the sequester cuts remain in effect, Mr. Hagel wrote, a second year of unpaid furloughs will also be required for civilian Defense Department employees.Money for operations and maintenance would have to be cut by at least 10 percent, Mr. Hagel wrote, and he warned that "would reduce deployable U.S. combat power."He said the Pentagon also would be forced to sharply reduce money for new weapons and for the research and tests of the next generation of armaments."We would be forced to buy fewer ships, planes, ground vehicles, satellites and other weapons," Mr. Hagel wrote.The Pentagon is already seeking ways to reduce its current budget, for the 2013 fiscal year, by about $40 billion to fit the demands of sequester.
WASHINGTON — A federal judge on Thursday ordered the military to stop touching the groins of detainees at the prison at Guantánamo Bay , Cuba, when they are moved from their cells to speak with lawyers. The procedure had led some prisoners to stop meeting with or calling their lawyers.In a 35-page opinion, Judge Royce C. Lamberth, the chief judge of the Federal District Court for the District of Columbia, called the searches — which included guards wedging their hands between the genitals and thighs of the detainees as many as four times when moving them to a meeting and back to their cells — "religiously and culturally abhorrent" to Muslims. He portrayed the procedure as unnecessary and intended to "actively discourage" meetings with lawyers.He said the warden, Col. John Bogdan, must return to a longtime procedure in which guards shake the underwear of detainees by the band to dislodge any contraband, but do not to touch their buttocks or genitals.He also directed the military to allow detainees who are weak from hunger strikes to meet with their lawyers in the same buildings in which they are housed, and to stop using new transport vans that have low roofs that detainees had said required them to be painfully crouched while shackled.Colonel Bogdan introduced the new procedures in May, after a raid in which guards forced protesting detainees into lockdown in their individual cells. After the raid, officials said they found improvised weapons. In putting the policy into place, the colonel cited the risk of such weapons as well as the case of a detainee who committed suicide in September by swallowing an overdose of medication, raising speculation that he had hoarded the pills in his underwear.But the judge, appointed by President Ronald Reagan, rejected those explanations as "yet another exaggerated response" by the military that was "inhibiting petitioners' access to counsel."In September, Judge Lamberth issued a similarly scathing opinion rejecting new restrictions on lawyers' access to clients who did not have an actively pending habeas corpus lawsuit. That challenge was brought in part by David Remes, a lawyer who also helped challenge the groin searches.Mr. Remes portrayed the latest ruling as "a slap in the face to the government," asking, "Will the government ever give up trying to thwart the men's right to counsel in habeas cases?"
WASHINGTON — As an Air Force wing commander, Maj. Gen. Margaret H. Woodward handled two sexual assault complaints in four years. Both times, she recalls, the accusers recanted, ending the investigations. Both times, General Woodward assumed the assaults never took place.She sees things differently today. While overseeing the Air Force's investigation of sexual abuses at Lackland Air Force Base last year, she learned that victims often withdrew complaints because they blamed themselves, were ashamed or feared no one would believe them."I didn't know enough to try and at least look into it and help," she said. "You sit there and go, 'Could I have made a difference?' "The general is getting her chance to make a difference now. Last month, the Air Force named her to run a significantly expanded office in charge of its sexual assault prevention and response policies.Among her main goals, the general said in an interview, will be to encourage more airmen and women to not only report sexual assault but also pursue prosecution. Providing good care for victims will help in that pursuit, she said, but so will improving the way cases are handled, from initial reports through investigations and prosecutions."How a person is treated in that first report can determine how she is going to handle it up the chain," the general said. "And even how her recovery goes."General Woodward's hiring represents not just an expansion of the sexual assault office, but also a significant elevation of its importance, as her predecessor was a lieutenant colonel. The move comes as the entire military is under fierce Congressional pressure to reduce sexual assault, fueled partly by a recent report estimating that 26,000 assaults took place in the military last year, up from 19,000 two years before.Though its rate of sexual assault is not significantly different from the rest of the military, the Air Force has had a run of particularly bad publicity. Last year, a series of courts-martial at Lackland revealed widespread sexual misbehavior involving instructors and recruits in training programs. This year, two Air Force generals have come under fire for their handling of sexual assault cases: one for reversing a conviction, the other for granting clemency to a convicted officer.But perhaps most embarrassing, General Woodward's predecessor as director of the sexual assault response unit, Lt. Col. Jeffrey Krusinski, was arrested in May on a sexual battery charge. The police said he groped a woman he did not know in a parking lot near the Pentagon.Just a few weeks after that arrest, General Woodward, then chief of safety for the Air Force, received a call from Gen. Larry O. Spencer, the vice chief of staff, asking her to lead an expanded sexual assault office. After she demurred, he called back the next day, a Friday, to ask again. When she finally agreed to take the job, General Spencer told her she would start on Monday.In an interview, General Spencer denied that the Air Force had rushed to expand the office because of Colonel Krusinski's arrest. But he acknowledged shortcomings in the Air Force's efforts to fight sexual assault. "Whatever we were doing obviously did not solve the problem," he said.Putting the office under a two-star general who reports directly to him is just part of a broader campaign, General Spencer said. "I am on a rampage to stamp out sexual assault," he said. "We're pursuing this with as much vigor as anything I've ever seen."This year, the Air Force created the new position of special victims counsel to help sexual assault victims navigate the legal process. It has also begun requiring that all sex crime cases be reported up the chain of command to general officers to increase oversight. It will soon begin an online campaign to educate airmen on sexual assault, and this fall it will require wing commanders and general officers to attend a sexual assault conference.
WASHINGTON — When President Obama proclaimed that those who commit sexual assault in the military should be "prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged," it had an effect he did not intend: muddying legal cases across the country.In at least a dozen sexual assault cases since the president's remarks at the White House in May, judges and defense lawyers have said that Mr. Obama's words as commander in chief amounted to "unlawful command influence," tainting trials as a result. Military law experts said that those cases were only the beginning and that the president's remarks were certain to complicate almost all prosecutions for sexual assault."Unlawful command influence" refers to actions of commanders that could be interpreted by jurors as an attempt to influence a court-martial, in effect ordering a specific outcome. Mr. Obama, as commander in chief of the armed forces, is considered the most powerful person to wield such influence.The president's remarks might have seemed innocuous to civilians, but military law experts say defense lawyers will seize on the president's call for an automatic dishonorable discharge, the most severe discharge available in a court-martial, arguing that his words will affect their cases."His remarks were more specific than I've ever heard a commander in chief get," said Thomas J. Romig, a former judge advocate general of the Army and the dean of the Washburn University School of Law in Topeka, Kan. "When the commander in chief says they will be dishonorably discharged, that's a pretty specific message. Every military defense counsel will make a motion about this."At Shaw Air Force Base in South Carolina last month, a judge dismissed charges of sexual assault against an Army officer, noting the command influence issue. At Fort Bragg in North Carolina last month, lawyers cited the president's words in a motion to dismiss the court-martial against Brig. Gen. Jeffrey Sinclair, who is accused of forcing a lower-ranking officer to perform oral sex on him, among other charges.In Hawaii, a Navy judge ruled last month that two defendants in sexual assault cases, if found guilty, could not be punitively discharged because of Mr. Obama's remarks. In Texas, a juror was dismissed from a military panel on a sexual assault case after admitting knowledge of the president's words. In Alexandria, Va., Eric S. Montalvo, a former defense counsel in the Marine Corps who is now in private practice, has cited the president's words in motions to dismiss two sexual assault cases, one against an Army sergeant and the other against a Navy seaman."Because the president is the commander in chief, it's going to come up in basically every imaginable context in sexual assault cases," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale Law School.Mr. Obama's comments come at a time of intense scrutiny of sexual assault in the military. A recent Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 men and women in the military were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010. At the end of the last fiscal year, Sept. 30, there were roughly 1,600 sexual assault cases in the military either awaiting action from commanders or the completion of a criminal investigation.White House officials said Mr. Obama's remarks, made in response to a reporter's question, were meant to demonstrate his concern about the issue and were not intended to recommend penalties for offenders."The president was absolutely not trying to be prescriptive," said Kathryn Ruemmler, the White House counsel. "He was listing a range of examples of how offenders could be held accountable. The president expects all military personnel who are involved in any way in the military justice process to exercise their independent professional judgment."Some military law experts said that while defense lawyers would naturally use the president's words to try to have cases dismissed, they would be pushing legal boundaries. Mr. Obama, they said, used the phrase "dishonorable discharge" as a catchall for getting assailants out of the military and not in its strict, technical meaning.
FORT BRAGG, N.C. — Two dozen United States Army generals converged here this week from their posts around the world, not for high-level discussions on the future of warfare, but to be considered as jurors in the court-martial of one of their peers.The defendant, whose trial is scheduled for September, is Brig. Gen. Jeffrey A. Sinclair, who was a deputy commander of the 82nd Airborne Division when the Army began investigating him amid allegations of sexual misconduct in 2012.The charges stem from General Sinclair's once-secret romance with a captain that prosecutors say became criminally violent. General Sinclair, who served in Iraq and Afghanistan, is now facing eight charges, including sodomy and adultery.General Sinclair's decision to go before a jury will culminate in a rare proceeding for the Army: a court-martial for a general, who, like any other soldier, will be judged by peers who are more senior. That means every court member — the Army's term for jurors — should be at least a one-star general appointed before December 2010, when General Sinclair's promotion was confirmed, though there are rare exceptions to the mandate."Years and years go by without ever seeing a general officer being court-martialed," said Thomas J. Romig, a former Army judge advocate general and dean of Washburn University School of Law. "It could even be decades."One general's court-martial, which included Maj. Gen. Douglas MacArthur as a juror, became the subject of a movie — "The Court-Martial of Billy Mitchell," about an early advocate of air power who was convicted of insubordination in 1925 for public remarks critical of the United States' military preparedness.The process of picking a panel began long before the officers arrived, when Gen. Daniel B. Allyn, who is head of the Army's Forces Command and who convened the proceedings, selected 26 generals to serve as potential jurors, including a group of alternates. Lt. Col. William Helixon, who is leading the prosecution, said that there are only 230 generals throughout the Army who are eligible for the assignment.This week, 24 of those officers crowded into a courtroom for questioning about their fitness for jury service, answering pointed queries about their willingness to judge General Sinclair as they would a corporal and whether family members had been victims of sexual assault.Despite General Allyn's efforts to pick a suitable pool, the challenge of empaneling a jury from the tight-knit community of leaders quickly became apparent.On the first day of the selection proceedings, Col. James L. Pohl, the judge in the case, asked how many of the officers were acquainted with General Sinclair. Five raised their hands."We moved in the same circles when we were younger officers," Maj. Gen. Michael X. Garrett said later. "Professionally, I've known him for my whole career."More pervasive conflicts emerged when every prospective juror acknowledged ties to at least one potential witness.Many also said they held generals to greater standards than lower-ranking soldiers."We're expected to properly represent our service," said Lt. Gen. Mark S. Bowman, a member of the Joint Staff who has been in the Army for 35 years. "Whenever we do something, it is pretty public."Richard D. Rosen, a former Army lawyer who now directs the Center for Military Law and Policy at the Texas Tech School of Law, predicted that the generals would be able to set aside their personal opinions. "They really will deliberate," said Mr. Rosen, who added that he never encountered a general as a juror when he was a military lawyer. "You're going to get a very mature panel in terms of experience, age and everything else, and they're going to be quite independent in their deliberations."With the military under pressure from Capitol Hill to reduce the number of sexual assaults in its ranks, Congressional debates — and their possible consequences for the generals — also seeped into the courtroom.Because the Senate must approve high-level military promotions, lawyers repeatedly asked the officers whether they feared that serving on the jury could adversely affect their opportunities for advancement, especially if the panel acquits General Sinclair.Although all the generals pledged to return an appropriate verdict without regard for their career prospects, one who has clashed with senators, Maj. Gen. Anthony A. Cucolo III, worried openly that his participation could further strain the Army's image with policy makers."I worry about the baggage I bring," said General Cucolo, who was sharply criticized for personnel policies he implemented while leading troops in Iraq. "Since my judgment is being questioned by those outside the Army in influential locations, perhaps my name should not be associated with this case."Colonel Pohl ultimately dismissed the first batch of 12 prospective jurors, and on Thursday, lawyers began working through the alternates. The jury, which must have at least five members, could eventually include senior officers from other branches of the armed services.
JOINT BASE CHARLESTON, S.C. — Sandra Walker used respectful tones as she spoke, but there was iron in her voice when she confronted Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel about sacrificing 11 days of pay because Congress and President Obama could not agree on taxes and spending.A mother of six — three are still at home — Ms. Walker is a civilian Defense Department employee who trains personnel at the 628th Medical Group at this base, home to Air Force cargo planes and the Navy's nuclear propulsion school. Like hundreds of thousands of Pentagon civilian employees, she began a furlough this month that will keep her home without pay one day a week until Oct. 1."I've taken a second job to compensate," she said. As if that were not challenge enough, her growing worry is that the partisan stalemate in Washington will linger, the Pentagon budget will be slashed further and extensive layoffs will result."Will we be protected in the security of our jobs, in our retirement?" she asked the defense secretary.The news from Mr. Hagel was grim."I've got to be honest with you," he said, explaining that if the forced spending reductions, called sequestration, are not lifted, the Pentagon will confront $52 billion in more cuts for 2014. "If we have to do that, we'll probably be beyond furloughs. We're going to have to eliminate some jobs."Over three days visiting military bases of all four armed services across the southeastern United States this week, Mr. Hagel, a former Nebraska senator, told everyone that compromise in Washington was unlikely."There's no good news," he said in Charleston to military personnel and civilian Defense Department employees."Sequestration is a mindless, irresponsible process," he said. "You know it, I know it. And I'm hoping that our leaders in Washington will eventually get that and come to some policy resolution. I used to be in that business. I'm not in that business anymore."The audiences in Charleston, Fort Bragg, N.C., and Naval Air Station Jacksonville, in Florida, were courteous, and some expressed gratitude that the defense secretary had traveled outside Washington to deliver the dark financial forecast. But they did not hide their frustrations.Their recurring lament was that lost in the loud debate over the budget in Washington were the countless ways that sequestration harms rank-and-file soldiers, civilians and families.Claire Riggle is a civilian employee at Womack Army Medical Center at Fort Bragg. (Her husband is a soldier at the post, and like all active-duty personnel, he was exempt from the salary cuts.) "I have been hit by the furloughs, and they're inconvenient and difficult," she said. "But what bothers me more is the effect it has on our children."Teachers across the Defense Department school system are civilians and fall under the furlough order. In their absence, classes would be canceled."So within the first month of school, the children will have missed a whole week of school," Ms. Riggle told the defense secretary. "So I'm just wondering what's going to be done about the education requirements, the standard of education? What's going to be done for our children?"Mr. Hagel said that 800,000 Defense Department civilians could have been put on furlough, but that 150,000 received exemptions, mostly for reasons of safety of the force, equipment and installations. He noted he had already moved to address the concerns of parents. Teachers received a partial exemption and are furloughed for less than a week, with instructions to take those days off in bulk before the school year begins. Some programs, like Advanced Placement preparation classes, were exempted altogether, Mr. Hagel said.Some on Mr. Hagel's route expressed frustration at how furloughs may, in the end, cost the government more.
WASHINGTON — Senator John McCain said Thursday that he intended to block President Obama's nomination of Gen. Martin E. Dempsey to another two-year term as chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. Mr. McCain made his announcement after he and the general had a testy exchange over whether the Obama administration was doing enough to assist the Syrian rebels."I'm actually going to put a hold on General Dempsey until General Dempsey responds to legitimate questions," Mr. McCain said just two days after he helped negotiate a deal to ease the Senate confirmation process for Mr. Obama's nominees.Asked whether he would place the hold only after the Armed Services Committee forwarded the nomination to a vote by the full Senate, Mr. McCain responded tersely, "Before, after and during.""I want to see him answer the question," he added. A vote by 60 senators can overcome a hold.The confirmation battle grew out of a debate over whether the United States military should be ordered to more aggressively support Syrian rebels to oust the government of President Bashar al-Assad, including combat action like establishing a no-fly zone. Mr. McCain, who has called for American military intervention in the Syrian civil war, traveled to Syria in late May to meet with the rebel forces. It was the first time that a United States senator had traveled to Syria to meet with the rebels since the conflict erupted two years ago.But the tension between Mr. McCain, one of the Senate's most respected military veterans, and General Dempsey, whose career includes multiple wartime commands, is over the proper role of the chairman of the Joint Chiefs in offering military advice to a president on national security issues with a clear political component — liked going to war.Mr. McCain opened his talk with General Dempsey with a pointed question: "Do you believe the continued costs and risks of our inaction in Syria are now worse for our national security interests than the costs and risks associated with limited military action?"General Dempsey said the administration had been active in supporting Syrian rebel forces, and described his role as advising the president on the risks and benefits of military options. But he emphasized that only the civilian leadership could order military action."I am in favor of building a moderate opposition and supporting it," General Dempsey said. "The question whether to support it with direct kinetic strikes is a decision for our elected officials, not for the senior military leader of the nation."His response frustrated Mr. McCain, who said that the chairman of the Joint Chiefs is "the sole military adviser" to the president and is obliged to advocate for or against combat.Mr. McCain challenged General Dempsey to share his opinions with the Armed Services Committee — as the chairman had pledged to do during the opening minutes of the session. General Dempsey said his private counsel to the president would remain private."We've given him options," General Dempsey said. "The members of this committee have been briefed on them in a classified setting. We've articulated the risk. The decision to use force is the decision of our elected officials."The committee chairman, Senator Carl Levin, Democrat of Michigan, closed the hearing by reaching agreement with General Dempsey to return to discuss possible options for military action, including the pros, cons and costs."If you'll do that, it may be a step that would be a constructive, positive step," Mr. Levin said.
ASPEN, Colo. — The National Security Agency has imposed new rules designed to sharply restrict the sharing and downloading of top-secret material from its computer networks after a review of how Edward J. Snowden, a former agency contractor, managed to expose several of the country's most sensitive surveillance programs, two of the Pentagon's most senior officials said Thursday.First among the new procedures is a "two-man rule" — based on the model of how nuclear weapons are handled — that requires two computer systems administrators to work simultaneously when they are inside systems that contain highly classified material."This makes our job more difficult," Gen. Keith B. Alexander, the head of the N.S.A. and the commander of the military's Cyber Command, told the Aspen Security Forum, an annual meeting on security issues. He described future plans to keep the most sensitive data in a highly encrypted form, sharply limiting the number of system administrators — like Mr. Snowden — who can move data throughout the nation's intelligence agencies and the Defense Department.Hours before General Alexander described the new defenses, Ashton B. Carter, the deputy secretary of defense, said the conditions that allowed Mr. Snowden to download and remove data without detection amounted to "a failure to defend our own networks.""It was not an outsider hacking in, but an insider," he said.General Alexander spoke in defense of the N.S.A.'s surveillance programs, including its collection of a vast database of information about all phone calls made and received in the United States. "You need a haystack to find a needle," he said, even while acknowledging that he was open to the idea that the nation's telecommunications companies, rather than the government, should retain control of the data.But at the security forum, of which The New York Times is a media sponsor, General Alexander also revealed for the first time that President Obama, shortly after taking office, had been surprised by the number of errors the agency made, which resulted in what General Alexander called the inadvertent collection of information about American citizens."When the president first came on board, we had a huge set of mistakes that we were working through in 2009," he told the audience. "He said essentially, 'I can see the value of these, but how do we ensure that we get these within compliance and that everything is exactly right?' " That suggested that Mr. Obama had questioned the execution of a program he had inherited from President George W. Bush, but satisfied himself by having the N.S.A. set up what the general called a "directorate of compliance," an internal watchdog group.Both Mr. Carter and General Alexander said that the military has begun to deploy roughly 4,000 people in the Pentagon's first units devoted to conducting cyberoffense and -defense operations, a new mission that formalizes America's use of a class of weapons that the Obama administration has rarely discussed in public."I wanted to start this fast," Mr. Carter said. "Fundamentally, we're spending everything we can think about spending intelligently for, notwithstanding our budget hassles, because this is an area that we are protecting even as other military capabilities will be cut."The description of the Pentagon's new cyberteams, which will be under General Alexander's command, was the most detailed yet of one of the military's most closely held projects.The administration recently conceded that it was developing cyberweapons. The best-known example is the covert effort called "Olympic Games," which the Bush administration used against Iran's nuclear program. The Obama administration accelerated the program, but suffered a major setback when a computer worm, later named Stuxnet, escaped from the Natanz nuclear enrichment plant in Iran and replicated itself on the Web, where the Iranians and others could download the code that was developed by the N.S.A. and its Israeli counterpart, Unit 8200.Future operations run by Cyber Command, Mr. Carter suggested, would be focused on the teams. "The teams are new, and they are in addition to the N.S.A. work force," he said. While they may ultimately be modeled on Special Operations, which provide fighting expertise to supplement traditional forces, for now the cyberforce will be drawn from members of the armed services.The cyberforces are inexpensive, Mr. Carter argued. But their very existence, which General Alexander alluded to in Congressional testimony this year, is bound to be cited by other nations that are justifying the creation of their own cyberunits. The People's Liberation Army in China has a major effort under way; its Unit 61398 has been accused of stealing corporate secrets and intellectual property from American companies, as well as planning for potential attacks on American infrastructure. Iran has created its own cybercorps, which has been blamed for attacks on Saudi Aramco, a major oil producer, and American banks.Mr. Carter, a physicist and former Harvard professor who has worked at the Pentagon since the beginning of the Obama administration, blamed the leak of highly classified data partly on decisions made after the investigations into the intelligence failures surrounding the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks."There was an enormous amount of information concentrated in one place," Mr. Carter said. But General Alexander defended the information-sharing as necessary.But as the differences between the two men's description suggest, the pressure to recompartmentalize information is bound to raise questions about whether the government is restoring a system that, ultimately, was blamed for many of the failures to "connect the dots" before the 2001 attacks.
FORT MEADE, Md. — The military judge in the trial of Pfc. Bradley Manning decided on Thursday not to drop a charge accusing Private Manning of "aiding the enemy." If found guilty on all counts, Private Manning could face life in prison without parole plus an additional 154 years.The judge, Col. Denise Lind, said the government had provided sufficient evidence to justify keeping the "aiding the enemy" charge alive. But the ruling does not necessarily mean she will ultimately find Private Manning guilty on the charge that he knowingly gave information to the enemy when he passed hundreds of thousands of documents to WikiLeaks in 2010.Colonel Lind also refused to drop a lesser charge under the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act. She did not address defense requests to drop five other charges that deal with stealing government property.Private Manning's defense team did not address the judge after she read her decision and had no immediate reaction.Later in the day, the prosecution began its rebuttal of the case presented by the defense, which rested last week. Defense lawyers have said that Private Manning did not intend for the documents to end up with Al Qaeda. David E. Coombs, the lead defense lawyer, has said that Private Manning divulged the information simply to "spark reform and debate."Prosecutors on Thursday presented evidence to show how thorough Private Manning was in collecting the documents that he handed over to WikiLeaks. One of their witnesses, Special Agent David Shaver of the Army Computer Crimes Investigative Unit, searched Private Manning's personal computer and work desktop and collected his Twitter messages, his e-mails and how he used certain software programs to copy and collect information.One e-mail he specifically mentioned was sent to The New York Times in April 2010, and prosecutors said that indicated that Private Manning recognized that WikiLeaks was not a legitimate news organization. Colonel Lind said she would not consider that argument in her decision.Arguments from both sides are scheduled to continue on Friday, followed by closing arguments, and there is a possibility that Colonel Lind will pronounce a verdict. Private Manning has already pleaded guilty to 10 lesser offenses that could put him in prison for 20 years.Private Manning, 25, is accused of the largest leak of classified information in United States history, and there is no public record that a military court has ever heard a case involving the aiding-the-enemy charge. His trial has illustrated the extent to which the Obama administration has cracked down on people accused of leaking documents or other information to news organizations, in both military and civilian courts.Private Manning is one of a record seven current or former government employees charged with violating the Espionage Act by leaking classified information since President Obama took office. In a report last month, the Congressional Research Service said the cases "demonstrate the Obama administration's relatively hard-line policy" on unauthorized disclosures.At least two people have been charged in civilian courts with violating another secrecy law, the Intelligence Identities Protection Act, which is intended to prevent federal agents' names from being released.During a court hearing in February, Private Manning conceded that he possessed and handed over, among other things, diplomatic cables, parts of the Iraq and Afghanistan war logs, files on detainees at Guantánamo Bay, two intelligence memos and a video of an Apache helicopter attack in Iraq that killed two Reuters journalists."I found the video troubling at the time, your honor, and I still do, but it's just my opinion, though," he said at the time. "As I hoped, others were just as troubled — if not more troubled."Steven Aftergood, the director of the Project on Government Secrecy at the Federation of American Scientists, said in an interview on Tuesday that "the video arguably was a matter of overriding public interest.""But many other records released by Manning and WikiLeaks had no obvious news value or larger public interest," he added. "Manning had privileged access to restricted information. Not only did those records expose individuals to potential retaliation, but their publication signaled that the U.S. could not guarantee confidentially to others."Ben Wizner, of the American Civil Liberties Union, said that was beside the point."It doesn't matter if it's a classified document or a Kleenex," Mr. Wizner said. "The aiding-the-enemy statute does not require the information divulged be classified."
FORT MEADE, Md. — A former Army specialist who supervised Pfc. Bradley Manning in Iraq testified in his trial on Friday that Private Manning had told her the American flag "meant nothing to him."The former specialist, Jihrleah Showman, said Private Manning, who is accused of providing hundreds of thousands of confidential documents to WikiLeaks, told her in a counseling meeting in August 2009 that he had joined the Army for training and "educational opportunities."Ms. Showman also testified that Private Manning said he did not have allegiance to the United States or its people. "I was distraught by the statements he made," she said.The lead defense lawyer, David E. Coombs, made several attempts to undermine Ms. Showman's testimony, asking her why she had not documented the comments."As a leader, I felt I had reached my limitations," she said, before adding, "I was instructed not to write the counseling statement." Ms. Showman said that Master Sgt. Paul Adkins, her superior, had told her he would "take care of it."She said she told Mr. Adkins, who is now retired from the military, about the meeting and noted at the time that she believed Private Manning was a possible spy.Mr. Adkins later testified that he did not remember hearing about the Manning meeting from Ms. Showman, but said that might be because he had been diagnosed with "memory loss."The defense also noted that, before the counseling session, Private Manning had filed a equal opportunity complaint against Ms. Showman stating that she had called him "faggoty.""I did not know that he was the one that filed against me," Ms. Showman said.The court is in recess until July 25, when the judge, Col. Denise Lind, said she would rule on whether to dismiss charges relating to stealing government property. Closing arguments will follow before Colonel Lind begins deliberating. She said sentencing was tentatively scheduled for July 31.
OCEANSIDE, Calif. — Among the scores of memories that Tiffany Lucas collected during her years as a Marine gunnery sergeant, she wears most of them with pride.When a superior ordered male Marines not to curse in front of female Marines — as if the women were too delicate to take it — she spit an expletive his way. When other women selected the skinniest male Marines to carry on their shoulders during training, as if from the battlefield, she instead picked the heavy ones.But the memory that has haunted her was her failure to push back against a commander who told her not to report a young female recruit who said she was raped by a male Marine, who, Ms. Lucas said, went on to assault two more women."I was too weak to stand up to my commanding officer," said Ms. Lucas, who served in the Marines for 11 years, including in Falluja, Iraq, in 2006 and 2007. "I really wish I had done something. If I could go back in time, I would stand up for her."In Oceanside, a scrappy beach town 10 miles south of Camp Pendleton, the Marine base that sprawls for 125,000 acres along the Southern California coastline, almost everyone who has served has a story to tell about sexual misconduct in the military. Some were harassed or assaulted themselves, while others worked among men and women who were victims of abuse.But in more than a dozen long interviews, veterans and active-duty military personnel here sounded a consistent theme: they believe commanders in charge of deciding which cases to prosecute conceal far too much out of fear that the cases will taint their careers."It's a huge problem, mainly because of the fact it goes unreported," said Jimmy Coats, who served in the Navy for eight years and was raped, he said, by a man he had been dating."My supervisor told me not to tell my commanding officer," Mr. Coats added. "I worked in a clinic, and in quite a few instances there were people who didn't want to talk about it. When a report was made, they tried to keep it as quiet as possible."San Diego County has the highest concentration of active-duty military personnel in the country, where veterans from every service branch can be found on Oceanside's pier and in its plywood-floor bars, surplus stores and tattoo parlors. It remains a military-proud town, where people say there is disappointment that the Pentagon has not been better at tackling the problem of sexual assault. A recent Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 people in the armed forces were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010."A lot of people around here worry about this," said Dennis Martinez, who served in the Marines in Vietnam. "They worry that when these things happen, it doesn't always get handled the right way. This is something that has been happening for many years."Congress, led in part by women on the Senate Armed Services Committee, is trying to grapple with the issue in a series of legislative proposals that are intended to crack down on offenders and keep commanders from reversing guilty verdicts in sexual assault convictions, which happens very rarely. Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, proposed a measure that would give military prosecutors, rather than commanders, the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try, with the goal of increasing the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation.The idea of removing these powers from commanders has been met with stiff resistance both throughout the Pentagon and among some fellow lawmakers. The measure was rejected by the committee, but Ms. Gillibrand has said she will try to revive it later this year on the Senate floor.Ms. Lucas, 34, who was the only woman in her unit, oversaw a large group of trainees, including a 22-year-old woman who liked to go out drinking, Ms. Lucas said. After an overnight trip outside Reno, Nev., the trainee told Ms. Lucas she had been raped by a male Marine with a stellar training record. Ms. Lucas, appalled, went to her commanding officer to get an investigation started."I was told not to file a complaint," Ms. Lucas said, adding that she suspected it was because her commanding officer did not want such an event recorded on his own performance evaluation. "He felt the girl was promiscuous," Ms. Lucas said of her commanding officer. "She drank."Her commanding officer told her, she said, that the male Marine was great in every other aspect. "I said, 'That's not the point.' I really wish I had done more. She was depressed, and he went on to assault two women in Japan. Nothing good came of it."While there are disagreements among veterans and active-duty military personnel about whether commanders should have power over prosecutions, there is broad agreement that the system does not always function in a way that best serves victims or the accused."We heard about it all the time," said Jeff Edgington, 23, who just finished five years in the Marines. "You heard about older guys getting with the new girls. There are such huge biases that these cases don't get investigated as well as they could."Victims have long said that they fear retaliation if they report sex crimes to commanders, and that their careers could suffer. President Obama himself joined the debate in May when he  proclaimed at the White House that those who commit sexual assault in the military should be "prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged — period." The president said he had ordered Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel "to step up our game exponentially" to prevent sex crimes."The system is not built to effectively resolve allegations or help actual victims," said Eric S. Montalvo, a lawyer who has represented defendants in such cases and a former judge advocate general. "I have been in the middle of proceedings where victims did not get justice because the system did not work properly."The focus will remain on the issue in places like Oceanside, particularly at a time when the Pentagon is moving more women into combat positions previously closed to them."This has always been part of the culture," said Howard Buford, 88, who served in the Air Force for 20 years. "The women always kept their mouths shut because people didn't pay attention to them. But I think there is enough pressure now that the generals and colonels will start acting like they know what's going on."
WASHINGTON — The Senate's leading Democrat on military issues released two letters from the Pentagon on Wednesday to argue that allowing military commanders to retain their authority over sexual assault cases will protect victims and battle what has been described as a "scourge" of sexual assault across the armed forces.The senator, Carl Levin of Michigan, chairman of the Armed Services Committee, said Pentagon statistics show that military commanders have pursued 93 sexual assault cases over the past two years after the civilian authorities did not investigate or did not prosecute, but not all have yet reached court martial.And he said foreign militaries that have removed commanders from authority over sexual assault cases made the decisions to protect the rights of the accused, not the victims.The release of the letters was Mr. Levin's counterargument to Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, who has proposed a measure that would give independent military prosecutors, not commanders, the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try, with the goal of increasing the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation. Ms. Gillibrand's measure would also limit the ability of commanders to reverse guilty verdicts in sexual assaults.Congress, led in great part by women, is debating a variety of legislation aimed at reducing sexual assault in the military.The Armed Services Committee rejected Ms. Gillibrand's proposal last month, but it has significant support in the full Senate — even as it remains unclear whether it would receive 51 votes to become law. Mr. Levin's decision to release the letters seemed aimed at strengthening opposition to the Gillibrand measure by pointing out what he and senior Pentagon officials view as flaws in her proposal.The first letter, to Mr. Levin from Adm. James A. Winnefeld Jr., the vice chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, provided statistics showing that, over the past two years, Army commanders pursued 49 sexual assault cases that local civilian authorities declined to pursue, resulting in 26 convictions so far.In the Marine Corps, Admiral Winnefeld's letter said, 28 cases were pursued after civilian authorities declined prosecution and resulted in 16 convictions. In the Navy, six have been pursued with one conviction so far. In the Air Force, 10 cases were prosecuted with 9 convictions.In a conference call with reporters, Mr. Levin said the Armed Services Committee, in rejecting the Gillibrand proposal, "got this thing right" in not removing prosecution authority from commanders. "Fifty defendants were convicted of sometimes horrific crimes who would not have faced justice had commanders not had authority to seek justice," he said.A second letter to Mr. Levin from Brig. Gen. Richard C. Gross of the Army, the legal counsel to the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, assessed reasons that foreign militaries had removed officers from authority over sexual assault cases."No allied country changed its system in response to sexual assault crimes specifically or the rights of victims generally," General Gross wrote. In most cases, the letter said, commanders were removed "to better protect the rights of the accused." They were removed, he said, to create "independent and impartial" tribunals — implying that a superior officer could render harsh judgment on a subordinate in a case that might taint both their records.A spokesman for Ms. Gillibrand, Glen Caplin, said Mr. Levin's comments and the letters showed "the military leadership is shifting the goal posts and fighting hard to protect the status quo." Mr. Caplin said, "The letter also fails to acknowledge that 37 other serious crimes unique to the military remain within the chain of command," adding, "To suggest that commanders do not have a role under the Gillibrand proposal is wholly inaccurate."He also cited statistics indicating that about half of all female victims of sexual assault told the Defense Department they did not report the crimes — either because they felt nothing would come of it or they feared the chain of command was biased.Mr. Levin said for the first time Wednesday that it may be worth creating a special set of rules for the small number of cases in which generals or admirals are accused of sexual assault. In a few high-profile cases, convictions of senior officers were reversed by commanders. The vast majority of cases occur in the lower ranks of enlisted personnel., among those in their late teens or 20s.
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration announced Friday that it was reviving the repatriation of low-level detainees from the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, which had dried up after Congress imposed strict limits on transfers.The announcement comes as William K. Lietzau, the top Pentagon official dealing with detainees, is stepping down to take a private sector job, according to people familiar with the matter. Officials said the timing was a coincidence.The White House said it had informed Congress that it intended to return two detainees to Algeria under the terms of a statute that requires Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel to certify that various security conditions have been met."We are taking this step in consultation with the Congress, and in a responsible manner that protects our national security," the administration said in a statement. "We continue to call on Congress to join us in supporting these efforts by lifting the current restrictions that significantly limit our ability to transfer detainees out of Guantánamo, even those who have been approved for transfer."The statement did not identify the two detainees. There are as many as five Algerians at the prison who were recommended for transfer by a task force in early 2010. In all, 86 of the 166 detainees remaining at the prison have been recommended for transfer if security conditions can be met. President Obama has recently sought to revitalize his administration's effort to close the Guantánamo prison amid a widespread hunger strike.Mr. Obama had pledged to close Guantánamo within a year of taking office and criticized the prison as overly expensive and a symbol used in terrorists' propaganda. But his efforts have been strongly opposed in Congress, which in January 2011 imposed requirements that countries be capable of taking steps to control any former detainees and prevent them from terrorist activities.Republicans have sought to portray Mr. Obama's efforts to wind down operations at the detention center as soft on terrorism, and on Friday, Senator Saxby Chambliss of Georgia, the ranking Republican on the Senate Intelligence Committee, accused Mr. Obama of taking the risk of releasing detainees who might engage in terrorism, as some released detainees have done, "just to satisfy a political promise."But Senator Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, the chairwoman of the Intelligence Committee, praised Mr. Obama's move, noting that the two had been "cleared for transfer years ago" and arguing that at an annual cost of $2.7 million to house each detainee, "it is in the national security interests of the United States to transfer these detainees to their home countries."Mr. Lietzau, who will leave his position next month, was traveling to Guantánamo on Friday and could not be reached for comment. In an e-mail he sent to his staff at the Pentagon on Thursday, he said he had accepted a job as vice president and deputy general counsel for PAE, a government services company."I believe we have made enormous strides on behalf of the country," he wrote. "Steadily and without fanfare, we have made principled decisions that support our forces and put in place credible policies that enhance our national security."Mr. Lietzau has played a major role in shaping detention policies across two administrations. After the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, when he was a uniformed lawyer for the Marine Corps, he served as an adviser in the creation of the first version of President George W. Bush's system of military commissions trials.In the Obama administration, he has been the primary official shaping policies for "law of war" detention at the prison at Guantánamo Bay and Bagram Air Base in Afghanistan.In that role, he has frequently defended prisoner-of-war-style indefinite detention without trial, saying it is a moral, lawful and humane part of warfare. His leading role within the administration in defending its continued use in the open-ended war against Al Qaeda has drawn fire from many of the same critics angry at President Obama for failing to close the prison at Guantánamo.In May, Mr. Obama announced that he would appoint an "envoy" at the Pentagon to handle issues about transfers from Guantánamo — which has been part of Mr. Lietzau's portfolio. Mr. Obama also announced a new envoy at the State Department for such issues, a position that had been vacant since January. The State Department has since appointed Cliff Sloan, a Washington lawyer, to the post; the Defense Department position remains unfilled.Mr. Lietzau had been offered a more senior policy role in the Pentagon that would have allowed him to retain authority over detention issues generally, officials said. But in his e-mail he told colleagues he turned it down to take the PAE job because he could not commit to staying in the proposed new role long enough for his eventual departure not to be disruptive.
WASHINGTON — A military judge has reached a verdict and will announce it Tuesday afternoon in the high-profile court-martial of Pfc. Bradley Manning , the former Army intelligence analyst whose release of some 700,000 secret documents to WikiLeaks opened a window into American military and diplomatic activities.The judge, Col. Denise Lind, will read the verdict from the bench at 1 p.m. at Fort Meade, Md., the army said in a statement.Private Manning has already confessed to being WikiLeaks' source for the files, which included videos of airstrikes in which civilians were killed, hundreds of thousands of front-line incident reports from the Afghanistan and Iraq wars, dossiers on men being held without trial at the Guantánamo Bay prison, and about 250,000 diplomatic cables.But while Private Manning has pleaded guilty to a lesser version of the charges he is facing, which could expose him to up to 20 years in prison, the government decided to press forward with a trial on a more serious version of the charges, including "aiding the enemy" and violations of the Espionage Act, which could result in a life sentence.His court-martial began in early June, and the merits portion wrapped up last week with closing arguments in which a prosecutor portrayed Private Manning as an anarchist and a traitor who was merely out to make a splash, while his defense lawyer portrayed him as a young, naïve, but well-intentioned humanist who wanted to spark debate and bring about change.Beyond the fate of Private Manning as an individual, the "aiding the enemy" charge — unprecedented in a leak case — could have significant long-term ramifications for investigative journalism in the Internet era.The government's theory is that providing defense-related information to an entity that published it for the world to see constituted aiding the enemy because the world includes adversaries, like Al Qaeda, who could read the documents online.
WASHINGTON — Feeling outcast and alone in Iraq, Bradley Manning , then a 22-year-old Army private, turned to the Internet for solace in early 2010, wanting to share with the world what he saw as the unconscionable horrors of war, an act that resulted in what military prosecutors called one of the greatest betrayals in the nation's history.Within months, he was arrested for making public, through the WikiLeaks organization, the greatest cache of secret government information since the Pentagon Papers. He was called a traitor by his government; confined to a tiny cell 23 hours a day at the Marine base at Quantico, Va., and the Army brig at Fort Leavenworth, Kan.; and finally court-martialed in Maryland.As prosecutors accused Private Manning of being a self-promoting "anarchist" who was nothing like the tortured man of principle portrayed by his lawyers, supporters around the world celebrated him as a martyr for free speech. But the heated language on both sides tended to overshadow the human story at the center of the case.That story involved the child of a severed home, a teenager bullied for his conflicted sexuality whose father, a conservative retired soldier, and mother, a Welsh woman who never adjusted to life in Oklahoma, bounced their child back and forth between places where he never fit in.Private Manning was a misfit as well in the Army, which he joined in the hope of gaining technical skills and an education, and which eventually sent him to Contingency Operating Station Hammer, a remote post east of Baghdad, where he had access to some of the nation's deepest military and diplomatic secrets. In early 2010, he covertly downloaded gun-camera videos, battle logs and tens of thousands of State Department cables onto flash drives while lip-syncing the words to Lady Gaga songs.He anonymously made contact with WikiLeaks to spill his secrets, hoping, as he told the military court that convicted him on Tuesday, to "spark a domestic debate on the role of the military and our foreign policy in general." Whatever his motives or inner conflicts, Private Manning knew he was violating the law and military regulations.According to a new documentary about WikiLeaks and the Manning case, "We Steal Secrets," by the filmmaker Alex Gibney, Private Manning thought that in Julian Assange, the founder of WikiLeaks, he had an ally."Manning invested more in that relationship," Mr. Gibney said in a telephone interview on Tuesday. Seeking a more sympathetic ear, Mr. Gibney said, Private Manning confessed his deed, and his multiple personal torments, to Adrian Lamo, an accomplished computer hacker he had met in a chat room online. Mr. Lamo drew him out, and then turned him in to the authorities."He was a naïve idealist. He was not a spy," said Mr. Gibney, whose film portrays Private Manning sympathetically. "He didn't get any money for this. He didn't go to a foreign government. Remember, he did plead guilty to actually leaking to WikiLeaks, but he wouldn't plead guilty to being a spy, because he didn't think he was one, and I don't, either."In his conversations with Mr. Lamo, who shared his computer chats with Wired.com, Private Manning said he had been ignored and isolated at work. "I just wanted to be nice, and live a normal life," Private Manning wrote. But he said he had seen things that troubled him that he felt helpless to do anything about.According to the chat logs, he was first dismayed by the detention of 15 people in Iraq for printing criticism of Prime Minister Nuri Kamal al-Maliki. "After that," he wrote, "I saw things differently."In a long statement to the military court this year, he said he was also disturbed by footage shot by an Apache helicopter of an attack on a street in Baghdad in July 2007 that killed two Reuters journalists and several other men. He called the footage one in a series of "war porn-type videos" he had seen that sickened him. The video was among the material he provided to WikiLeaks, which distributed it widely without identifying its source.While larger questions about government secrecy and the role of the news media in the Internet age swirl around the case, the roots of Private Manning's behavior may spring as much from his troubled youth as from his political views.He spent much of his childhood alone, playing video games or huddled in front of a computer when he was living with his mother in Haverfordwest, Wales. He was teased relentlessly there for his foreign ways and began to act out in school.
FORT MEADE, Md. — A military judge on Tuesday found Pfc. Bradley Manning not guilty of "aiding the enemy" for his release of hundreds of thousands of military and diplomatic documents to WikiLeaks for publication on the Internet, rejecting the government's unprecedented effort to bring such a charge in a leak case.But the judge in the court-martial, Col. Denise R. Lind, convicted Private Manning of six counts of violating the Espionage Act of 1917 and most of the other crimes he was charged with. He faces a theoretical maximum sentence of 136 years in prison, although legal experts said the actual term was likely to be much shorter.While advocates of open government celebrated his acquittal on the most serious charge, the case still appears destined to stand as a fierce warning to any government employee who is tempted to make public vast numbers of secret documents. Private Manning's actions lifted a veil on American military and diplomatic activities around the world, and engendered a broad debate over what information should become public, how the government treats leakers, and what happens to those who see themselves as whistle-blowers."We always hate to see a government employee who was trying to publicize wrongdoing convicted of a crime, but this case was unusual from the start because of the scope of his release," said Gregg Leslie of the Reporters Committee for Freedom of the Press, adding, "Whistle-blowers always know they are taking risks, and the more they reveal the bigger the threat is against them."Colonel Lind said she would issue findings later that would explain her ruling on each of the charges. But she appeared to reject the government's theory that an employee who gives information about national security matters to an organization that publishes it online for the world to see is guilty of aiding the enemy.The premise of that theory is that the world includes not just ordinary people who might engage in socially valuable debate, but also enemies like Al Qaeda. Critics have said that it is not clear how giving information to WikiLeaks is different for legal purposes from giving it to traditional news organizations that publish online.Yochai Benkler, a Harvard law professor who testified in Private Manning's defense, praised the judge for making an "extremely important decision" that he portrayed as denying "the prosecution's effort to launch the most dangerous assault on investigative journalism and the free press in the area of national security that we have seen in decades."But, he said, the decades of imprisonment that Private Manning could face "is still too high a price for any democracy to demand of its whistle-blowers."The sentencing phase will begin on Wednesday, with more than 20 witnesses scheduled to appear for both the prosecution and the defense. It could last for weeks; there are no sentencing guidelines or minimum sentences in the military justice system. Private Manning's appeals could go on for years, legal experts said.Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military law at Yale Law School, said Private Manning would not be sentenced to anywhere near the 136-year maximum because Colonel Lind was likely to collapse some charges so he did not "get punished twice for the same underlying conduct."The case has arisen amid a crackdown by the Obama administration on leaks and a debate about government secrecy. Private Manning is one of seven people to be charged in connection with leaking to the news media during the Obama administration; during all previous administrations, there were three.The Justice Department recently won an appeals court ruling forcing James Risen, a reporter for The New York Times and an author, to testify in the criminal trial of a former intelligence official accused of being his source. And it has used aggressive tactics in secretly subpoenaing communications records of reporters for Fox News and The Associated Press.
FORT MEADE, Md. — As the sentencing phase began Wednesday in the court-martial of Pfc. Bradley Manning , the government tried to demonstrate how his disclosure of hundreds of thousands of military and diplomatic documents to WikiLeaks had sown mistrust and damaged the United States.Prosecutors suggested a maximum punishment of 136 years in prison, but legal experts say it is unlikely that he will receive a sentence that long. Prosecutors also recommended a reduction of rank, forfeiture of pay, dishonorable discharge and a fine.During more than three hours of testimony, Robert A. Carr, a retired brigadier general who led a Defense Intelligence Agency task force investigating the leak, described the Pentagon's fears that the revelations would erode trust between nations, between citizens and leaders, and between American soldiers and civilians in places like Afghanistan, among others."We were very concerned that folks might choose not to talk to us anymore because the information that came out could be detrimental to their livelihood," General Carr said.Pressed by one of Private Manning's lawyers, Mr. Carr could not cite specific data showing the effect of the leak on the number of foreign civilians and emissaries talking to the United States, though he said he knew of examples.Asked whether he was aware of anyone who had been harmed by the disclosures, General Carr said he knew of an Afghan national who had been killed by the Taliban. But a defense lawyer jumped in, objecting that the individual's name had not been found in leaked documents, a point that General Carr acknowledged. But he added that the Taliban had tried to tie the death to the WikiLeaks disclosures. The judge, Col. Denise R. Lind, said she would disregard that part of his testimony.John Kirchhofer, a former deputy chief of counterintelligence at the Defense Intelligence Agency, discussed his background before the court closed for classified testimony.Colonel Lind acquitted Private Manning on Tuesday of the most serious charge, "aiding the enemy," but found him guilty of most of the other charges against him, including six counts of violating the Espionage Act of 1917. The judge has yet to release the findings behind her verdict, leaving those who are following the trial to speculate about her reasoning. On Wednesday, she offered no guidance on when they would be made public.The judge said Wednesday that Private Manning had served about three and a half years of pretrial confinement to date, including a credit of 112 days for "unlawful" confinement. The Army private was held in solitary confinement and even stripped of his clothing before his trial began.The sentencing phase resembles the trial, with both the government and the defense calling more than 20 witnesses to try to influence the severity of the punishment. It is expected to take weeks. Private Manning has the option to testify, but it is unclear whether he will.The court-martial is continuing on Thursday.
In the largest study of its kind, military medical researchers have concluded that deployments to war zones and exposure to combat were not major factors behind a significant increase in suicides among military personnel from 2001 to 2008, according to a paper published on Tuesday.The study, published online by The Journal of the American Medical Association, corroborates what many military medical experts have been saying for years: that the forces underlying the spike in military suicides are similar to those in the civilian world. They include mental illness, substance abuse, and financial and relationship problems."The findings from this study are not consistent with the assumption that specific deployment-related characteristics, such as length of deployment, number of deployments, or combat experiences, are directly associated with increased suicide risk," the authors, based at the Naval Health Research Center in San Diego, wrote. "Instead, the risk factors associated with suicide in this military population are consistent with civilian populations, including male sex and mental disorders."But even as it points to nondeployment factors as paramount, the study underscores the complex interplay of war and the mental health of troops, even those who never left the United States. It suggests that the stresses of 12 years of war may have worn on all service members, creating work and travel demands far outstripping those borne by peacetime troops."Perhaps it's not being deployed so much as being in a war during a high-stress time period," Dr. Nancy Crum-Cianflone, the principal investigator for the Millennium Cohort Study, which provided much of the raw data for the study, said in an interview.Critics of the study said that because its analysis ended with data from 2008, it might underestimate the impact of multiple deployments and traumatic brain injuries caused by roadside bombs."Why would the authors repeatedly insist that there is no association between combat and suicide?" asked Dr. Stephen N. Xenakis, a psychiatrist and a retired Army brigadier general. "The careful analysis of bad data generates poor evidence."Cynthia LeardMann, the lead author on the study, said the research team planned to update the study to include data through 2012. But she expressed confidence that its bottom line conclusions would remain the same."The current study includes information from when we saw a sharp increase in suicides, between 2005 and 2008," Ms. LeardMann said. "So it's demonstrating that even in that period, we don't see association with deployment."Yet even providers of mental health care and advocates for veterans who praised the quality of the study cautioned that its findings should not be oversimplified to suggest that deployment has nothing to do with suicide.Those providers and advocates say that deployment can prompt or intensify problems that are direct causes of suicidal behavior, including post-traumatic stress disorder, depression and substance abuse."I'm concerned that some might take this and say: It's not deployments. We don't need to worry about this," said Barbara Van Dahlen, a psychologist who is the founder of Give an Hour, a group that provides mental health counseling to service members and veterans. "This is telling us one important bit of the story. But there are many other factors involved."Before the recent wars, the military suicide rate was well below the civilian rate. But the gap began narrowing shortly after 2001, a time when the civilian rate was also climbing. The sharpest increases were in the Army and the Marine Corps, the services most involved in combat operations in Iraq and Afghanistan.In 2012, suicides among active-duty troops hit a record 350, twice as many as a decade before and more than the number of American troops killed in either combat operations or transportation accidents that year. Today, the military suicide rate is almost the same as the one for civilians, when the civilian rate is adjusted to match the high percentage of young white men in the military.The study, which was financed by the Defense Department, used surveys conducted for the Millennium Cohort Study, which is tracking the health of thousands of service members over six decades. The researchers studied data for more than 150,000 current and former service members from all the armed services.Using data from the National Death Index and Defense Department personnel records, the researchers found among the group 83 service members who committed suicide, of whom 58 percent had never deployed.After correlating those suicides with data from the surveys, the researchers found that suicide rates were highest among men and among people with manic-depressive disorder, depression and alcohol problems.The authors said their findings could point to more effective approaches to reducing suicide, citing in particular programs that focus on depression and alcohol abuse.Craig J. Bryan, the associate director of the National Center for Veterans Studies at the University of Utah, said the study's large sample gave it added significance. "It lines up with what many of us have been finding and talking about for the last several years," he said. "But they have been able to address the limitations of previous research."Several advocacy groups, including Iraq and Afghanistan Veterans of America and Tragedy Assistance Program for Survivors, or TAPS, also said the findings confirmed what they had been seeing on the ground."We so often just link military suicide to combat trauma," said Kim Ruocco, the director of postvention for TAPS. "But there are many others: long hours, separation from supports systems, sleeplessness. All are stressors. All add to increases in mental health issues."
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel is completing new rules to fight what he has called a "scourge" of sexual assault in the military, taking steps meant to guarantee high-level attention to accusations of wrongdoing and to offer greater protections to victims, according to Pentagon, administration and Congressional officials.The initiatives come amid a growing national awareness of sexual assault in the military. Critics, especially in Congress, have questioned how the armed services handle these cases. Under one legislative proposal, sexual assault cases would be handled by an independent military legal authority, removing commanders from overseeing sexual assault cases within their units.One new rule under consideration by Mr. Hagel would expand the role that victims have throughout the court-martial process, including the sentencing phase. In a handful of cases that have been the focus of sharp Congressional rebuke, senior commanders have overturned convictions of their subordinates in sexual assault cases.Another rule would require that all reports of sexual assault filed by service personnel who choose to seek legal remedies be immediately brought to the attention of the first general or admiral in the chain of command of that organization. This, officials said, would guarantee accelerated senior-level supervision and rapid corrective action.President Obama addressed the issue of sexual assault on Wednesday in a speech to Marines at Camp Pendleton in California, saying it "undermines what this military stands for." In May, Mr. Obama directed Mr. Hagel and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, to develop a process that would improve enforcement of the law, hold violators accountable and protect victims.Senior Pentagon officials agree that the Uniform Code of Military Justice should be reviewed with an eye to limiting the ability of commanders to overturn the convictions of a court-martial, and they are seeking the authority from Congress to accomplish that.In the near term, officials said, Mr. Hagel is likely to seek amendments to the separate official manual used to guide the operations of military courts. That step would require an executive order from Mr. Obama, and Mr. Hagel has discussed the issue with the president."Solving the problem of sexual assault in the military is one of Secretary Hagel's top priorities," said George Little, the Pentagon press secretary. "He's working closely with senior military leaders, the White House and Congress to develop specific actions that will help address this pressing issue. He understands the urgency of the problem and that concrete actions, not just words, are required."The specifics of Mr. Hagel's proposals were described over recent days by more than a dozen Pentagon, administration and Congressional officials on the condition that they not be named ahead of the release of the final version of the rules.Under another proposed rule, commanders would be given the authority to transfer those accused of sexual assault to another base during the pretrial phase of an investigation, to remove any chance of continued contact with the accuser. Today, accusers may request a transfer, but that has been viewed as placing too much of the burden on them.New rules would also set parameters for interactions between recruiters and recruits. Those proposals come after reports that some recruiters preyed on teenagers they had met in the recruiting process, with the unwanted advances coming in the form of vulgar text messages, coarse e-mails and physical assault.Among the new measures, officials said, is one requiring all of the armed services to create victims' advocacy programs.Accusers would be provided legal representation throughout the process. That might require an expansion or reorganization of the legal departments in the armed services, one official involved in the effort said.Some of the victims' advocacy programs are already in place, but military leaders want to apply such programs consistently throughout the armed services.The new rules are all but final, officials said. Mr. Hagel, in his most recent weekly meeting to discuss the Pentagon's responses to sexual assault, asked for more information before announcing the orders, officials said.The deputy defense secretary, Ashton B. Carter, said Tuesday in an interview on the "PBS NewsHour" that the armed services would move ahead to address the problem of sexual assault and not wait for Congressional action."Our attitude and culture in the Department of Defense is to look a problem in the face, understand it and be forthright about taking it on," Mr. Carter said.
FORT MEADE, Md. — A prosecution witness in the sentencing phase of the court-martial of Pfc. Bradley Manning told a military judge on Thursday that Al Qaeda could have used WikiLeaks disclosures, including classified United States government materials provided by Private Manning, to encourage attacks in the West, in testimony meant to show the harm done by his actions.The witness, Cmdr. Youssef Aboul-Enein, an adviser to the Pentagon's Joint Intelligence Task Force for Combating Terrorism, said that WikiLeaks materials showing that the United States had killed civilians, for instance, could help Al Qaeda."Perception is important because it provides a good environment for recruitment, for fund-raising and for support for Al Qaeda's wider audience and objectives," he said.Commander Aboul-Enein, an expert on terrorism and the ideology of Al Qaeda, took the stand during the seventh day of the sentencing hearing. He said he knew of just two instances when Al Qaeda had used information from WikiLeaks: in a 2010 edition of its English-language magazine, Inspire, and in a 2011 video by an American-born Qaeda spokesman, Adam Gadahn, urging attacks by Muslims in the West. Though he could not name any examples since then, Commander Aboul-Enein said it was known that Osama bin Laden showed an interest in WikiLeaks, a point prosecutors made during the trial.Maj. Thomas Hurley, one of Private Manning's lawyers, asked whether Al Qaeda or its affiliate in the Arabian Peninsula had claimed any tactical victories — which Commander Aboul-Enein defined as "any kind of demonstration that the United States is withdrawing from a country or is leaving a country without its full mission being met" — as a result of a WikiLeaks disclosure. The witness said no.The judge, Col. Denise R. Lind, convicted Private Manning, 25, of most of the charges against him last week, including six counts of violating the Espionage Act of 1917. But she acquitted him of the most serious charge, "aiding the enemy," which could have carried a life sentence.Colonel Lind reduced the maximum sentence facing Private Manning to 90 years from 136 years on Tuesday, granting part of a request from the defense team and acknowledging the similarities between some of Private Manning's charges.The government called its first witness in the sentencing phase the day after Colonel Lind announced her verdict, to present examples of quantifiable harm caused by Private Manning's disclosure of thousands of military and diplomatic documents to WikiLeaks.Prosecutors have sought to show in particular how Private Manning's disclosures harmed diplomatic relations. Patrick F. Kennedy, under secretary for management at the State Department, testified Monday that the disclosures of diplomatic cables had had a "chilling effect" on the willingness of other countries to cooperate with the United States."These disclosures had a chilling effect on foreign officials, governmental and nongovernmental willingness to engage in full and frank discussions with us, which is detrimental to us assisting in our responsibilities to protect the national security" he said, according to transcripts provided by the Freedom of the Press Foundation.But much of the second week of sentencing has happened behind closed doors, with four witnesses offering classified testimony.Among those witnesses were Maj. Gen. Michael Nagata of the Army, who was deputy commander of the office of the defense representative to Pakistan, and Col. Julian M. Chesnutt of the Air Force, who served as a military adviser at the embassy in Pakistan. They testified in closed court on Tuesday on the effects of the WikiLeaks disclosures on relations with Pakistan.The United States has had a troubled relationship with the country in recent years, strained by drone strikes, a 2011 airstrike that killed more than two dozen Pakistani soldiers and the killing of Bin Laden, who had long been in hiding near a large Pakistani military base.The government will continue calling witnesses on Friday.
KILLEEN, Tex. — One year after he waged a deadly shooting rampage at the Fort Hood Army base here in November 2009, Major Nidal Malik Hasan told a panel of military mental health experts that he wished he had been killed during the attack because it would have meant God had chosen him for martyrdom.His statements to the panel, detailed in documents released by Major Hasan to The New York Times through his civilian lawyer, provided the first account of the shooting in Major Hasan's own words and suggested that he believed the Army's pursuit of the death penalty offered him salvation. Paralyzed by police officers who ended the attack when they shot him four times, he viewed the possibility of death as a badge of honor, according to the documents."I'm paraplegic and could be in jail for the rest of my life," Major Hasan told the panel. "However, if I died by lethal injection I would still be a martyr."Major Hasan, 42, an American-born Muslim of Palestinian descent whose long-delayed court-martial began last week in a Fort Hood courtroom,  said in the documents and in previous statements in and out of court that he carried out the attack to wage jihad for what he has called the illegal and immoral wars in Afghanistan and Iraq. In the documents, he described in blunt and unapologetic terms how he killed soldiers as he stepped into a medical processing building on Nov. 5, 2009. He said he wore earplugs to muffle the sound of his semiautomatic weapon, and shot into areas that had the "greatest density of soldiers." In the end, 13 people were dead."I don't think what I did was wrong because it was for the greater cause of helping my Muslim brothers," he told the military panel.The three pages of documents were from a 49-page report of a military panel known as a sanity board, which concluded that Major Hasan was fit to stand trial.The civilian lawyer who released the pages, John P. Galligan, used to represent Major Hasan in the case but was released by him in 2011. Mr. Galligan continues to provide legal assistance to Major Hasan and meets with him regularly. He has provided other documents at Major Hasan's request, including other pages of the sanity board report, to Fox News. Army prosecutors were given a summary of the report, but Mr. Galligan said that they had not seen these newly released pages.The documents shed light on the dispute that has developed between Major Hasan and his team of Army defense lawyers. Major Hasan has split from the lawyers and is representing himself, though the judge overseeing his military trial ordered them to remain as standby counsel. Last week, Major Hasan's former lead Army defense lawyer, Lt. Col. Kris R. Poppe, asked the judge to limit their role because Major Hasan's goal was a death sentence and helping him reach that goal violated their moral and professional responsibilities. The judge ordered the lawyers to continue in their current role. The lawyers are appealing.In court, Major Hasan denied that he had a death wish. He wanted to elaborate, but the judge closed the session. The documents suggested that Colonel Poppe had accurately depicted Major Hasan's desire to be put to death.In the report, Major Hasan told the panel that he went to morning prayers at a Killeen mosque that day and then returned to his apartment, where he shredded his birth certificate and other documents. He said he would not need the documents because he would either be killed or in jail.Major Hasan said he wanted to get to the medical processing building before 3 p.m. when a large number of people would be there, according to the report. He drove to the base, wearing fatigues with his rank and name tag. Major Hasan, an Army psychiatrist, said he had no doubts about his plan, but expressed reservations about some of the consequences, like the end of his medical career.He said he walked into the building around 1 p.m. with a cellphone to his ear, pretending to talk to someone. Members of the sanity board panel asked him what he would have done had he seen someone he knew."I don't know," Major Hasan said. "I may not have aimed at them."He said he did not want to kill civilians and so told a civilian working at a front desk that the officer in charge needed her. Once she left, he shouted "Allahu akbar," Arabic for "God is great," and started firing his FN Five-Seven handgun.He then went outside to a nearby auditorium to "shoot more targets," but when he realized there was a graduation ceremony taking place he decided not to go inside because in the gowns, civilians were indistinguishable from soldiers, he said.He told the panel he did not hear the officers coming toward him because of his ear plugs. He denied having remorse and justified his actions by saying that the soldiers he killed were "going against the Islamic Empire."
FORT MEADE, Md. — A former leader of Pfc. Bradley Manning 's Army intelligence unit in Iraq allowed him to keep working with classified information despite recurring concerns about his mental health because the unit was understaffed and Private Manning was playing an irreplaceable role in analyzing insurgent threats, according to testimony at his court-martial trial on Tuesday.While in Iraq, where he downloaded 700,000 secret government files that he sent to WikiLeaks, Private Manning responded with angry outbursts when he was chastised over minor misconduct, went "catatonic" at times while talking, e-mailed a photograph of himself dressed as a woman to a supervisor, and was found in the fetal position with a knife, witnesses said.Yet through it all, the supervisor, Paul Adkins, then a master sergeant, did not pull Private Manning from the secure facility where he had access to classified information, nor did he recommend that commanders file a report that could have revoked Private Manning's security clearance. The reason, he said, was that Private Manning's work was helping save soldiers' lives."We still had people doing missions," Mr. Adkins said. "The biggest threat to our soldiers and to our operational environment emerged from the Shia insurgent groups, which Pfc. Manning helped analyze."The testimony by Mr. Adkins — who was demoted for failing to alert commanders about Private Manning's warning signs, and is now retired — was the highlight of the second day of the defense case in the trial's sentencing phase. Private Manning was convicted last month of violating the Espionage Act and several other charges, although he was acquitted of "aiding the enemy"; he faces up to 90 years in prison.Private Manning is expected to speak on Wednesday as the defense wraps up.During the earlier phase of the trial, Private Manning's defense lawyer, David E. Coombs, largely portrayed him as a whistle-blower. But this week, Mr. Coombs has been painting a parallel portrait of his client as someone in turmoil who would have had no access to classified information had military supervisors responded more competently to his recurring signs of mental and emotional problems.Prosecutors pushed back, suggesting that the understaffed intelligence unit was doing the best it could with what it had. And Mr. Adkins, noting that psychologists never pronounced Private Manning unfit for duty, said he had hoped to help the young soldier get through the deployment so that he could be honorably discharged.Even before the unit deployed to Iraq, Mr. Adkins had referred Private Manning for a mental health screening because he had angrily responded after being criticized for missing a formation.And in December 2009 — a month before he started sending files to WikiLeaks — Private Manning shoved a chair and shouted when he was chided for losing a key. Soon after, as he was being counseled for being tardy, he flipped over a table, dumping two computers to the floor, and was put in a headlock by another soldier until he calmed down, several witnesses testified.Mr. Adkins responded by removing the bolt from Private Manning's gun and telling behavioral health counselors that Private Manning had exhibited new signs of mental instability that had seemed to grow worse over the previous month. But, Mr. Adkins wrote in a memo, Private Manning would be "salvageable if he receives and actively participates" in therapy.In April 2010, Mr. Adkins wrote another memo to behavioral psychologists about Private Manning, noting his "instability was a constant source of concern" and that it included "frequent catatonic periods," like when he stopped talking and went blank in the midst of a briefing. He also mentioned that Private Manning had sent an odd e-mail to him, but did not fully explain it or, apparently, forward it.That e-mail was titled "My Problem." In it, Private Manning said that he had been struggling with something that was "haunting me more and more" and "makes my entire life feel like a bad dream that won't end." Attached to the e-mail was a picture of him wearing a blond wig and makeup.Then, in early May, Mr. Adkins was called to the classified information facility because Private Manning was in the "fetal position" in a storage room, "clutching his head as if he was in pain." At his feet was a knife, and he had carved the words "I WANT" in a chair. Mr. Adkins said he and Private Manning spoke for about an hour before he sent the private to his workstation to finish his shift.Mr. Coombs asked Mr. Adkins why, even then, he had kept Private Manning at work. Mr. Adkins explained that "there were tasks to do in regards to analyzing the threat."But later that same shift, Private Manning punched another soldier in the face. When a higher-ranking officer, Capt. Tanya Gaab, who also testified on Tuesday, found out about the incident, she banned him from coming into the information facility again. Weeks later, he would be arrested.
WASHINGTON — In an effort to stop military lawyers from using comments by President Obama to prevent sexual assault prosecutions, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel has sent out a directive ordering the military to exercise independent judgment in the cases and effectively ignore the president's remarks."There are no expected or required dispositions, outcomes or sentences in any military justice case, other than what result from the individual facts and merits of a case and the application to the case of the fundamentals of due process of law," Mr. Hagel wrote in a memorandum dated Aug. 6 that is to be disseminated throughout the military.Since May, when Mr. Obama said at the White House that sexual offenders in the military ought to be "prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged," lawyers in dozens of assault cases have argued that Mr. Obama's words as commander in chief amounted to "unlawful command influence," tainting trials and creating unfair circumstances for clients as a result.Their motions have had some success. At Shaw Air Force Base in South Carolina in June, a judge dismissed charges of sexual assault against an Army officer, noting the command influence issue. In Hawaii, a Navy judge ruled last month that two defendants in sexual assault cases, if found guilty, could not be punitively discharged because of Mr. Obama's remarks."Unlawful command influence" refers to actions of commanders that could be interpreted by jurors as an attempt to influence a court-martial and in effect ordering a specific outcome. Mr. Obama, as commander in chief of the armed forces, is considered the most powerful person to wield such influence.Mr. Obama's legal team, as well as Mr. Hagel, are trying to undo the potential damage to sexual assault cases in the future. Mr. Hagel's memorandum quoted Kathryn Ruemmler, the White House counsel, as saying that the president "expects all military personnel who are involved in any way in the military justice process to exercise their independent and professional judgment."The White House declined to comment, but Lt. Col. Todd Breasseale, a Pentagon spokesman, said, "The secretary has been consistently clear here, and his commanders understand his intent," noting that the memo "speaks for itself."Mr. Hagel's letter produced some skepticism. "They are trying to unring the bell," said Richard Scheff, a lawyer who cited unlawful command influence on behalf of his client, Brig. Gen. Jeffrey Sinclair, accused of sexually assaulting an Army captain with whom he had an adulterous affair. "I don't know how President Obama can direct that certain types of punishment be administered and now you are supposed to ignore it. How does that work?"In General Sinclair's case, a military judge decided that the president's comments did constitute unlawful command influence and that he would determine during jury selection whether the comments had tainted the case. Many other lawyers are awaiting rulings on similar motions that cite Mr. Obama's remarks, as well as those of Gen. James F. Amos, the commandant of the Marine Corps, who in a speech last year asserted that 80 percent of sexual assault cases were legitimate and not the result of second thoughts from people who initially consented.Experts in military law said it was unusual for a memorandum like Mr. Hagel's to come from the secretary of defense, who directed recipients to "ensure this message is widely and immediately disseminated throughout your organizations.""It is a remarkable document," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale Law School. "I can't remember a document quite like this coming from an official at this senior a level. It has been said that 'unlawful command influence' is the mortal enemy of military justice."But this directive, Mr. Fidell said, "is a kind of anti-venom to try to counteract the unfortunate statements that have given rise to the current wave of unlawful command influence motions."A recent Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 men and women in the military were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010. At the end of the last fiscal year, Sept. 30, there were roughly 1,600 sexual assault cases within the military either awaiting action from commanders or the completion of a criminal investigation.The issue has become front and center on Capitol Hill, where Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, has sponsored a bill that would give independent military prosecutors, rather than commanders, the power to decide which sexual assault crimes to try.John D. Altenburg Jr., a former deputy judge advocate general for the Army who now practices law in Washington, said the letter could be useful for the administration."It can only be positive," he said. "I am not sure it was absolutely necessary, but this certainly clears the air. Most people in the military understand that comments are made by people for political purposes and they are not to take that under consideration, but this makes it clear to everybody."
WASHINGTON — The Defense Department announced Wednesday that it would begin offering benefits to the same-sex spouses of military personnel and other employees by early September, in response to the Supreme Court decision that struck down the Defense of Marriage Act.Under the plan, spousal and family benefits — including health care coverage, housing allowances and survivor benefits — will be available to all legally married military spouses. The same-sex spouses of service members and civilian Defense Department employees can claim the entitlements retroactively, starting with the date of the decision."The Department of Defense remains committed to ensuring that all men and women who serve in the U.S. military, and their families, are treated fairly and equally," Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel wrote in a memo released by the Pentagon.To be eligible, couples must provide a marriage certificate "that is valid in the place of celebration." The Pentagon said it would grant leave to those who need to travel to a jurisdiction where same-sex marriage is recognized by law in order to get married. Thirteen states and the District of Columbia have legalized same-sex marriage."This will provide accelerated access to the full range of benefits offered to married military couples throughout the department, and help level the playing field between opposite-sex and same-sex couples seeking to be married," Mr. Hagel said.Under the policy, personnel stationed within the continental United States will be granted up to seven days of leave to travel to a state where marriage is legal, while those outside the United States may receive up to 10 days of leave.When a draft of the policy including this provision was released recently, Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, who is the ranking Republican on the Senate Armed Services Committee, took issue with what he called the "preferential treatment" shown by the policy toward same-sex couples."Military leave is granted by statute, and while there are special provisions in law for adoptions, childbirth and emergency situations, to my knowledge there are no special provisions for marriage, same-sex or otherwise," he said in a statement last week.The Pentagon announced in February that it would grant some benefits to the committed same-sex partners of service members, less than two years after President Obama ended the military's "don't ask, don't tell" policy and one year after the administration said it would not defend the constitutionality of laws blocking same-sex spouses of military personnel from receiving benefits.Under the Defense of Marriage Act, the 1996 law that defined marriage as the union of a man and a woman, the Pentagon could not offer full benefits to same-sex partners of its personnel, who are federal employees. It withheld health care coverage and some other entitlements, saying it would re-evaluate the situation should the law change."In the event that the Defense of Marriage Act is no longer applicable to the Department of Defense, it will be the policy of the department to construe the words 'spouse' and 'marriage' without regard to sexual orientation, and married couples, irrespective of sexual orientation, and their dependents will be granted full military benefits," Defense Secretary Leon E. Panetta said at the time.A spokesman for the Defense Department said Wednesday that it did not have an estimate of how many people are expected to gain benefits under the new plan.In February, officials estimated that about 17,000 military personnel and veterans would apply for partial benefits for their domestic partners, 5,600 of whom were active-duty service members.
FORT MEADE, Md. — Pfc. Bradley Manning, who is facing up to 90 years in prison for leaking 700,000 government files to WikiLeaks, apologized on Wednesday for the "unintended consequences of my actions." He told the judge at his court-martial trial that while he "believed it was going to help people, not hurt people," he now realized that what he did was wrong."I'm sorry that my actions hurt people," he said. "I'm sorry that they hurt the United States. At the time of my decision, as you know, I was dealing with a lot of issues, issues that are ongoing and continue to affect me" — a reference to matters like his crisis over his gender identity, which he was confronting while on a military deployment in a combat zone.Throughout the case, open-government activists have celebrated Private Manning's leaks as a heroic act to be admired and emulated even as his critics have denounced him as a traitor. And earlier in his court-martial, Private Manning's defense lawyer, David E. Coombs, portrayed his client as a whistle-blower, even if a naïve one. But in the sentencing phase this week, Mr. Coombs has elicited testimony that depicted his client as a smaller, sadder figure — a damaged and confused young man whose decision-making capacity when he decided to leak the files was impaired by extraordinary stress.In his statement, Private Manning said these personal issues did not justify the things he did."Although a considerable difficulty in my life," he said, " these issues are not an excuse for my actions. I understood what I was doing and the decisions I made. However, I did not fully appreciate the broader effects of my actions. Those factors are clear to me now."Private Manning's three-minute statement to the judge, Col. Denise R. Lind, was not sworn, so prosecutors could not cross-examine him.For much of the day, the defense sought to portray Private Manning in human terms, from a difficult childhood — starting with his mother's heavy drinking while she was pregnant with him — to his mental and emotional deterioration while in Iraq.Under questioning from Mr. Coombs, Capt. David Moulton, a clinical psychiatrist who extensively examined his client after his arrest, described the stress and isolation that Private Manning was under, and framed his release of the documents to WikiLeaks as the immature, even neurotic act of an idealist who thought he could end all wars.Under such stress, Captain Moulton said, "his abnormal personality traits became more prominent — he was acting out his grandiose ideation, his difficulties during that post-adolescent period. And ultimately, when he came into contact or had contact with the information which he ended up releasing, his decision-making capacity at that point was influenced by the stress of his situation, for sure."He also said Private Manning exhibited traits of fetal alcohol syndrome and some of the social difficulties associated with Asperger's syndrome, along with narcissistic tendencies like grandiosity and haughtiness which became heightened under duress.Along with Captain Moulton, Private Manning's older sister, Casey Major, and aunt, Debra Van Alstyne, testified that he had been underweight since birth because his mother drank and smoked during her pregnancy.His sister, who is 11 years older, described a difficult childhood in which their alcoholic mother was largely dysfunctional and so Ms. Major largely cared for Private Manning from his birth until he was around 7, when she had a bitter dispute with their father and left home. Later their father left and their mother became suicidal. At one point Ms. Major teared up slightly while discussing photographs of their childhood.Capt. Michael Worsley, a clinical psychologist who treated Private Manning in Iraq, testified that he was guarded at first in their therapy sessions, and that he thought Private Manning had some kind of personality disorder before he revealed he was struggling with his gender identity — at the time it was a still against military law to be openly gay."You put him in this hypermasculine environment, if you will, with little support and few coping skills — the pressure would have been difficult to say the least," he said. "It would have been incredible."Ms. Van Alstyne said her nephew had joined the military over her objections because he wanted financial assistance to earn a college degree, and Captain Moulton said Private Manning was determined to try to stay through his term of enlistment lest he lose the financing.Asked by Mr. Coombs if she wanted to tell the judge anything that she might take into account before passing sentence, Ms. Van Alstyne said: "I just hope that she takes into account that he had a very hard start to his life. He worked really hard. He's a good person, he cares about people. He just thought he was doing the right thing at a time when he was really I think not thinking clearly at all."Nathan Fuller, a representative of the Bradley Manning Support Network attending the trial, said that the defense had already tried the "whistle-blower" defense and Private Manning was still convicted of six violations of the Espionage Act, so it was appropriate to try another tactic.Mr. Fuller added that Mr. Coombs had also already argued that little harm resulted from the leaks when cross-examining witnesses called by the prosecution, so "what's left is to see what will gain sympathy and hopefully some leniency" when the judge decides what sentence to impose.After the session adjourned, Mr. Coombs went to a nearby courtyard and addressed a few dozen supporters of Private Manning. Several applauded and thanked him for his work."Bradley is certainly a person who had his heart in the right place and he was thinking about you," the American public, Mr. Coombs said. "His one goal was to make this world a better place."The court-martial will reconvene on Friday afternoon; prosecutors may make a rebuttal case. Colonel Lind could announce a sentence sometime next week.
WASHINGTON — Members of Congress cautiously applauded new policies announced at the Pentagon on Thursday that are intended to improve the legal system for victims of sexual assault in the military, but the changes do little to alter the way those crimes are adjudicated.Under pressure from Capitol Hill and from victims' groups, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said his department would extend a pilot program giving victims of sexual assault their own legal representation and would consider allowing them more influence in the sentencing phase of trials.Some of the plans reflect legislation already before Congress, including a bill to provide victims with legal counsel co-sponsored by Senator Patty Murray, Democrat of Washington, and Senator Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire."I was pleased to see Secretary Hagel has put priority on its implementation," Ms. Murray said in a statement. "Providing legal advocates for victims is a major step forward in reversing this awful trend and establishing the necessary means for these men and women to take action against their attackers through what is a deeply personal and painful process."Other new provisions that mirror proposed Congressional measures include those that would help victims of sexual assault transfer to a new unit, away from assailants. The provision also standardizes new rules that would set parameters for interactions between recruiters and recruits.But the provisions do not change the power commanders have to decide which cases to try, to select juries and to unilaterally overturn convictions. Some military justice experts and lawmakers say that some or all of those powers should be transferred to military prosecutors.After praising Mr. Hagel's efforts, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, the New York Democrat who is seeking to remove the authority of commanders over sexual assault cases, said the Pentagon's steps were "not the leap forward required to solve the problem."Under the provisions, a panel will review whether commanders should continue to overturn convictions, a rare occurrence that enrages victims and their advocates.Representative Jackie Speier, Democrat of California, was unimpressed with the Pentagon's actions. "I continue to be underwhelmed by the military's baby steps on this issue," she said in a statement. "The Pentagon has missed yet another opportunity to fulfill its promises of zero tolerance and improved justice."A Pentagon survey this year found that an estimated 26,000 men and women in the military were sexually assaulted last year, up from 19,000 in 2010. At the end of the last fiscal year, Sept. 30, there were roughly 1,600 sexual assault cases in the military either awaiting action from commanders or the completion of a criminal investigation.The department has been under fire for months to address the problem, and it has run into further trouble with prosecutions in recent weeks over so-called unlawful command influence.Since May, when Mr. Obama said at the White House that sexual offenders in the military ought to be "prosecuted, stripped of their positions, court-martialed, fired, dishonorably discharged," lawyers in dozens of cases have argued that his words as commander in chief amounted to "unlawful command influence," tainting trials and creating unfair circumstances for clients as a result. This month, Mr. Hagel attempted to beat back that problem with a memorandum asking military commanders to use their own judgment in cases and to not be influenced by Mr. Obama's remarks.When Congress resumes next month, the issue is almost certain to return to the fore. The full Senate will debate Mr. Hagel's plans and various sexual assault measures this year as part of a broad defense bill.
JOINT BASE LEWIS-McCHORD, Wash. — One by one, the Afghan men and boys took the witness stand inside a military courtroom on Tuesday to tell of a night of gunfire, bloodshed and horror a world away.They had been flown here on tourist visas by the American military, the first witnesses to testify at a sentencing hearing for Staff Sgt. Robert Bales, who has pleaded guilty to killing 16 Afghan civilians — most of them women and children — as he stalked through their mud-walled compounds in Kandahar Province in March 2012.It was a striking sight: for the first time, seven men and boys from homes with no electricity or running water, wearing traditional, flowing shalwar kameez, turbans and skullcaps and speaking through interpreters, came face to face with the crew-cut sergeant in dress blues who has admitted to storming his victims' homes and opening fire as they screamed for mercy."That bastard stood right in front of me," said Haji Mohammed Naim, 60, his voice rising as he gestured toward Sergeant Bales. "I wanted to ask him: 'What did I do? What have I done to you?' "Pressed by military prosecutors to delve further into that night, Mr. Naim, who was shot in the attack and lost several family members, began to weep and stood up."I'm leaving," he said. "For God's sake, do not ask me any more questions."Over the next several days, a six-person military jury will decide whether Sergeant Bales, 39, deserves to spend the rest of his life behind bars for carrying out one of the worst American atrocities in years, or whether he could one day be eligible for parole. By pleading guilty in June, he avoided any possibility of the death penalty.The hearings are expected to offer sharply contrasting portraits of Sergeant Bales, a man who still remains mysterious despite months of hearings and testimony that have illuminated each gunshot, blood spatter and tearful plea in wrenching detail.Prosecutors have painted Sergeant Bales as someone who felt "inadequate as a soldier and a man": drowning in debt, behind on his home payments, bitterly unhappy with his family and frustrated with a stalled military career. He had been taking steroids in the weeks before the rampage, and the night of the shooting he drank whiskey with other soldiers and snorted Valium before slipping away from his combat post.His lawyers have said he suffered from post-traumatic stress and a brain injury, and had been strained by four deployments in a decade — three to Iraq, and the last to Afghanistan. But even now, there is little to fully explain his mind-set on the night of the killings.When Sergeant Bales pleaded guilty in June, he took responsibility for his crimes. But when questioned about those bloody hours, he said he had no memory of lighting fire to a pile of his victims' bodies, and struggled to explain why he had done what he did."I've asked that question a million times since then," he said. "There's not a good reason in this world for why I did the horrible things I did."On Tuesday, Lt. Col. Jay Morse, a member of the prosecution team, read jurors a narrative of Sergeant Bales's life and his crimes. In grisly detail, accompanied by photographs of dead and wounded women and children, it described how Sergeant Bales armed himself and walked out of Camp Belambay after midnight on March 11, 2012.The account — which the defense does not dispute — said the sergeant walked to one village, gunned down several families and returned to the American base when he ran low on ammunition. He woke a fellow soldier, admitted what he had done, and then gathered more ammunition and headed off toward a second village.Sergeant Bales sat impassively through the hearing, sometimes looking away when images of dead children were projected onto the wall. He listened quietly as his victims described houses "full of blood and bodies" and how they had to load their trucks with their wounded brothers, sons, daughters and wives.One of the youngest to testify was Khan Hekmatullah, a skinny 12-year-old who concluded his testimony with an unanswered question: "What did I do wrong against Sergeant Bales that he shot my father?"
KILLEEN, Tex. — Days before he opened fire inside a medical processing building at Fort Hood here in 2009, Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan sent two e-mails to his Army superiors expressing concern about the actions of some of the soldiers he was evaluating as a military psychiatrist.In the e-mails, one sent 13 days before the attack and the second three days prior, Major Hasan asked his supervisors and Army legal advisers how to handle three cases that disturbed him. In one case, a soldier reported to him that American troops had poured 50 gallons of fuel into the Iraqi water supply as revenge; the second case involved another soldier who told him about a mercy killing of a severely injured insurgent by medics; and in the third, a soldier spoke of killing an Iraqi woman because he was following orders to shoot anything that approached a specific site.The Army never fully investigated his concerns. On Nov. 5, 2009, Major Hasan walked into a medical deployment center to kill as many soldiers as he could as part of a jihad to protect Muslims and Taliban leaders from troops heading to Afghanistan, he has said."I think I need a lot of reassurance for the first few times I come across these," Major Hasan wrote on the morning of Nov. 2 about the three cases that had troubled him. Below his e-mail signature, he included a quote from the Koran — "All praises and thanks go to Allah, the Cherisher and Sustainer of all the worlds."The e-mails were released to The New York Times at Major Hasan's request through his civilian lawyer, John P. Galligan. They were among several opportunities for the Army to investigate Major Hasan's troubled state of mind.In 2007, when Major Hasan was a resident in the psychiatric program at Walter Reed Army Medical Center in Washington, the academic presentation he made that was required for graduation — known as his grand rounds presentation — stated that a risk of having American Muslims in the military was the possibility that they would murder their fellow troops.He had also asked a supervisor at Walter Reed whether he qualified for conscientious objector status, told classmates during a fellowship that his religion took precedence over the Constitution, and in an academic paper defended Osama bin Laden.Major Hasan's radical beliefs and his correspondence with his Army superiors have played a limited role in his military trial, now in its third week at Fort Hood.Prosecutors did want to use evidence that showed his ideology, including his grand rounds presentation and the e-mails he exchanged with Anwar al-Awlaki, a militant American-born cleric in Yemen who encouraged a number of terrorist plots. But on Monday the judge prohibited them from presenting that evidence to the jury, which is made up of 13 senior Army officers.Prosecutors were allowed to call an expert from the Federal Bureau of Investigation who testified that Internet searches related to jihad and the Taliban were conducted on Major Hasan's laptop in the days and hours before the attack.On Tuesday afternoon, after calling nearly 90 witnesses in 11 days, the prosecution rested. The judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, told Major Hasan, who is representing himself, that he could present his defense on Wednesday, though it remained unclear if he would make any case or take the stand in his own defense.The prosecution's last witness was a doctor who worked with Major Hasan at Fort Hood's medical center in the weeks before the attack. Major Hasan and the doctor, Tonya Kozminski, had dealt with an unruly patient in the intensive care unit, and Major Hasan had told her he was not happy with how the situation had been handled. The subject of deployment came up, and she testified that he told her that if the Army was going to deploy him, "they will pay." The unit he was to deploy with had been ordered to report for processing on Nov. 5, the date of the shooting.Major Hasan made another presentation in 2007 in which he argued that the United States' war on terrorism was a war on Islam, and the class was so offended that the instructor stopped him before he finished.He was promoted from captain to major in May 2009 and assigned to Fort Hood that July, and his officer evaluation reports referred to him as a star officer.But the officer who assigned Major Hasan to Fort Hood told an Army official there that "you're getting our worst," according to a 2011 report prepared by the offices of Senator Joseph I. Lieberman, independent of Connecticut, and Senator Susan Collins, Republican of Maine. The report found that Army officers who knew of Major Hasan's problematic behavior gave him evaluations that misstated his performance and ignored complaints about his radical Islamic views.One of the allegations in a lawsuit filed against federal and Pentagon officials by victims and survivors of the attack has been that the shooting, which left 13 people dead and more than 30 wounded, was preventable.A Pentagon review of the shooting released in 2010 recommended several Army officers be referred for possible punishment for not properly supervising Major Hasan and found that the Defense Department was focused on fighting external threats rather than radicalization within its ranks.
FORT MEADE, Md. — A military judge sentenced Pfc. Bradley Manning on Wednesday to 35 years in prison for providing more than 700,000 government files to WikiLeaks, a gigantic leak that lifted the veil on American military and diplomatic activities around the world.The sentence is the longest ever handed down in a case involving a leak of United States government information for the purpose of having the information reported to the public. Private Manning, 25, will be eligible for parole in about seven years, his lawyer said.In a two-minute hearing on Wednesday morning, the judge, Col. Denise R. Lind of the Army, also said that Private Manning would be dishonorably discharged and reduced in rank from private first class to private, the lowest rank in the military. She said he would forfeit his pay, but she did not impose a fine.Before the sentencing, Private Manning sat leaning forward with his hands folded, whispering to his lawyer, David Coombs. His aunt and two cousins sat quietly behind him. As Colonel Lind read the sentence, Private Manning stood, showing no expression. He did not make a statement.The materials that Private Manning gave to WikiLeaks included a video taken during an American helicopter attack in Baghdad in 2007 in which civilians were killed, including two journalists. He also gave WikiLeaks some 250,000 diplomatic cables, dossiers of detainees being imprisoned without trial at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, and hundreds of thousands of incident reports from the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.Immediately after the judge left, military guards flanked Private Manning and hustled him out the front of the courtroom as a half-dozen supporters in the back of the courtroom called out words of encouragement."We'll keep fighting for you, Bradley," one shouted. Another said, "You are a hero."Mr. Coombs later told reporters that he would apply for a presidential pardon next week and read a statement from Private Manning that he said would be included in his request."I only wanted to help people," Private Manning's statement said, adding, "If you deny my request for a pardon, I will serve my time knowing that sometimes you have to pay a heavy price to live in a free society."A White House spokesman said a request would be considered "like any other application."Mr. Coombs also said that he had wept after they left the courtroom and that Private Manning told him, "It's O.K."Private Manning downloaded the materials from a classified computer network to which he had access as a low-level Army intelligence analyst while deployed in Iraq in 2010. The documents he gave to WikiLeaks set off a scramble inside the government as officials sought to minimize any harm, including protecting foreigners identified in some documents as having helped American diplomats or the military. No evidence emerged that anyone was killed because of the leaks.Among other things, the files also exposed the abuse of detainees by Iraqi officers under the watch of American forces and showed that civilian deaths during the Iraq war were most likely significantly higher than official estimates."It's outrageous," one supporter who had been in the courtroom, Laura Watkins, 63, of Alexandria, Va., said of the sentence. "What I've seen is a travesty of justice."The judge's decision to impose a 35-year sentence roughly split the difference between what the prosecution had requested — 60 years — and the 20 years that Private Manning had exposed himself to before the trial began when he pleaded guilty to a lesser version of the charges he was facing.Under the military system, convicts sentenced to more than three decades in prison are eligible for parole after 10 years, and Private Manning is receiving 1,294 days credit — a little more than three years — for time in custody and for a 112-day period in which the judge ruled he was mistreated during pretrial confinement. He is expected to serve his time at the Army prison at Fort Leavenworth, Kan.There have been only a handful of previous convictions in cases involving leak accusations, none resulting in a comparably severe sentence.
RACHEL, Nev. — The Little A'Le'Inn has been an unlikely tourist destination in the Mojave Desert for nearly 25 years, selling souvenirs — from green alien coffee cups to E.T. Highway T-shirts — dedicated to the notion that we are not alone. Understandably.Nine miles up a nearby dirt road is the top-secret military installation known as Area 51, whose murky provenance fueled decades of speculation about extraterrestrial aliens and kept the U.F.O.-hunting tourists coming.Or rather, the top-secret military installation not known as Area 51 — at least until last week, when the C.I.A. released a classified report on the history of the U-2 spy plane, which officially acknowledged what everyone here has long known: There is a secret military testing base at Groom Lake called Area 51. It is 150 miles north by car from Las Vegas, in a vast expanse of utterly empty scabland, desert and mountain, and signs reading "No gas station next 150 miles."The report, released after eight years of prodding by a George Washington University archivist researching the history of the U-2, made no mention of colonies of alien life, suggesting that the secret base was dedicated to the relatively more mundane task of testing spy planes.But no matter. Even this little bit of validation was welcome in Rachel, which claimed a population of 57 as of last Tuesday afternoon, and where the tourists have not been coming at quite the pace they once did. The movies and television shows that once fed an international fixation with aliens secreted at Area 51 — from "The X Files" to movies like "Independence Day" and "Paul" — are, with the passage of time and the inevitable rise of new subjects of national interest, not quite as gripping as they once were."We have a guest book, but it's gone by the wayside. Shelby, do you know where our guest book has disappeared to?" Pat Travis, 70, the owner of the Little A'Le'Inn, asked a waitress behind the bar."It's really strange to not have it out for all of our customers to sign," Ms. Travis said with a sigh. "Would you bring it to me?"Ms. Travis — who recounted being awakened one night by a bright light shot from a U.F.O. that came through the center of the back door — said she expected the C.I.A. acknowledgment to bring a rush of customers through her doors.They will want to know how to find Area 51 and how to spot a U.F.O. in the pitch-black night skies here, and they will shop from the shelves lined with green alien shot glasses, coffee cups and guitar picks and even Area 51 Wine (produced for the inn by a winery in Northern California)."Every time there is another story out, people come out," she said. "They want to know how to get to that area. Where it is. The more there is, the more you talk about it, the more it goes on and on."Rachel was fairly deserted the other day, save for a family from Seattle on a drive from Las Vegas to Yosemite that made a U.F.O. detour at the urging of their 16-year-old, Hank Reavis. His arms full of Area 51 T-shirts as his father reached for his wallet, Hank said he wanted to see for himself the place featured in movies like "Paul."Asked if they would visit Area 51 itself, Hank's father, Gil, a retired logger, answered "Yes." Hank corrected him."We won't get in there, Dad," he said.That observation was confirmed after a nine-mile drive up Back Gate Road to a back entrance of the base. Or at least, one assumes it was the back entrance to the base, given the six separate WARNING! signs prohibiting picture-taking or going beyond the two guard gates with flashing red lights."If you pass the gate, they can shoot you, I think," said Niklas Gartler, 17, of Vienna, who came here with his uncle from Los Angeles.Well maybe not shoot; the signs promise six months in prison for trespassers. The greater threat, in truth, might be the rattlesnakes that infest the roads and trails here during the hot summer months.The report, "The Central Intelligence Agency and Overhead Reconnaissance: The U-2 and Oxcart Programs, 1954-1974," was released, albeit in a redacted form, at the request of Jeffrey T. Richelson, a senior fellow with the National Security Archive at George Washington University. "There certainly was — as you would expect — no discussion of little green men here," Mr. Richelson said. "This is a history of the U-2. The only overlap is the discussion of the U-2 flights and U.F.O. sightings, the fact that you had these high-flying aircraft in the air being the cause of some of the sightings."Mr. Richelson said he was not looking for information on Area 51. "That was sort of a bonus," he said.No one here seems to take themselves too seriously. The prevailing attitude is reflected in the name of the restaurant, The Little A'Le'Inn (say it aloud). It sits right off Extraterrestrial Highway, as they call State Route 375. There is an "Earthlings welcome" sign above the parking lot.But everyone seems assured that aliens are here, that U.F.O.s are dancing through the desert skies, and that the government has never been straight about what it was up to."I never had any doubt," said Pam Kinsey, a housekeeper here. "I watch the lights every morning. I get up at 4:30 to send my kid to school. I know they are there."Hank's mother, Sally, said she was keeping an open mind."But how can we be the only ones?" she asked. "I'll tell you this, they certainly picked a beautiful state to come to. They couldn't have done much better than Nevada."Howard Baral, a Los Angeles entertainment accountant and Niklas's uncle, said that he made the trip out here — it is a three-hour drive from Las Vegas — to make his nephew happy."Since he was a little kid, he has always been enthralled with alien lore and Area 51," Mr. Baral said. "His dream was to visit it. It wasn't my first choice."That said, Mr. Baral said he was inclined to believe that there were aliens out there. "It's the middle of nowhere," he said. "What's the Air Force doing in the middle of nowhere?"Annie Jacobson, the author of a book on the history of the area, said she doubted the acknowledgment would dampen interest in what lies behind the fences."It will only make people more curious, ask more questions," she said.All of which is why Ms. Travis thinks it is time to get that guest book on display at the entrance of her little box of a restaurant."You are going to find people coming in here from different country, different places," she said, thumbing through pages of signatures from the past. "This needs to get back out. We need to get our little table out."
JOINT BASE LEWIS-McCHORD, Wash. — Staff Sgt. Robert Bales offered a tearful apology on Thursday for gunning down 16 unarmed Afghan civilians inside their homes, but said he still could not explain why he had carried out one of the worst American war crimes in years."What I did is an act of cowardice," he said, choking up as he sat on the witness stand in a military courtroom here. "I'm truly, truly sorry for those people whose family members I've taken away."The unsworn statement from Sergeant Bales, 40, came on the third day of a hearing to determine whether he should ever be eligible for parole in the March 2012 massacre. In June, he pleaded guilty to slipping away from his combat base in southern Afghanistan and invading the mud-walled compounds where dozens of Afghan civilians slept. He beat and kicked them, chased them from room to room, opened fire on them, and set several of their bodies ablaze.Two days of wrenching testimony from survivors and witnesses painted indelible images of the brutality of Sergeant Bales' crimes, and their toll on the victims. Bearded Afghan men, who traveled some 7,000 miles to testify in the hearing, spoke of how nearly every member of their families had been taken. A skinny boy told how he cried after seeing his sister shot. A doctor described how a young girl named Zardana could no longer dress herself or go to the bathroom without help.Sergeant Bales sat quietly, his hands often clasped in front of him, during that testimony, sometimes watching as prosecutors displayed video images of the carnage. On Thursday, he said he understood the terrible cost of what he had done."If I could bring their family members back I would in a heartbeat," he said. "I can't comprehend their loss. I think about it every time I look at my kids. I know I murdered their family. I took that away from them."He spoke tearfully about how he had disgraced his family. And with particular emotion, he apologized for shaming the Army and staining the reputation of the "really good guys, some heroes" who had served alongside him during three deployments to Iraq and one to Afghanistan.But his apology — the first time he has publicly expressed sorrow — came without an explanation."I don't know why," he said.Lawyers for Sergeant Bales offered no clues, either. The defense has suggested that he was a broken man who suffered from post-traumatic stress and a traumatic brain injury, a good soldier who had snapped under the strain of four wartime deployments. But they presented no such evidence to the six-person jury weighing whether Sergeant Bales deserves a life sentence with no possibility of parole, or whether he should have a chance at freedom after serving about 20 years in prison. The closing arguments are set for Friday, and then the jury will deliberate.The few witnesses to speak on his behalf recalled him as a loving son and neighbor, a devoted father, a generous high-school buddy and a brave soldier who endured explosions and bore witnesses to the bloody horrors of Iraq's insurgency.On Thursday, Sergeant Bales said that after returning from his tours in Iraq, he slid deeper into a pit of anger, weakness and fear. He said he had attended counseling but quit after about a month and a half after failing to see any improvements. He said he had not been eager to return to combat for a fourth deployment.In a long narrative of the massacre and the events leading to it, prosecutors painted Sergeant Bales as a frustrated soldier prone to drinking and violent outbursts. They said that he had been in deep financial trouble, that he wanted to divorce his wife, and that he was upset about being passed over for a promotion to sergeant first class.In Afghanistan, he began taking steroids and at times lost his temper, once screaming at another soldier and once punching and kneeing an Afghan driver who accidentally struck Sergeant Bales with a box of supplies.On Thursday, Sergeant Bales said he had seen threats everywhere, spotting phantom bombs and Taliban where other soldiers saw nothing. The day before the shooting, Sergeant Bales spent eight hours hacking away at a fallen tree that Taliban fighters had used as a landmark for placing roadside bombs."I couldn't let it go," he said.Throughout his statement, he acknowledged that his apologies would not bring back anyone's wife, children or parents."Sorry just isn't good enough," he said.
KILLEEN, Tex. — The Army defense lawyers who used to represent Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan , the military psychiatrist found guilty last week of a shooting rampage at Fort Hood in November 2009, have asked the judge overseeing his military trial here to allow them to do what he refused to do while acting as his own lawyer — persuade a jury to spare his life.The request was denied and the judge told the jurors to prepare for their deliberations on Wednesday. But the lawyers' request touched on some of the legal questions raised by Major Hasan's inaction in the courtroom. One of them is the conflict between his right to self-representation and the requirement that death penalty cases be given extra procedural protections.The court-martial of Major Hasan has entered its most critical phase, when the jury of 13 Army officers determines whether to sentence him to life in prison or death by lethal injection. He was found guilty Friday of killing 13 people and wounding or shooting at 32 others, nearly all of them unarmed soldiers, in the worst mass murder at a military installation in American history.One argument the military lawyers were expected to make, had they been permitted to proceed, was that a death sentence for Major Hasan would put soldiers' lives at risk by giving Islamic extremists a new symbol to avenge and exploit.Major Hasan, 42, has been representing himself for months, and has made few attempts since the trial started Aug. 6 to present a defense. His former Army lawyers — and his own statements and behavior in and out of court — have suggested he wants a death sentence. He has said he believes he will become a martyr if he dies by lethal injection, because he viewed the deploying troops he killed as enemies of Islam.On Tuesday, after Major Hasan failed to present any evidence, call any witnesses or make a statement as part of his sentencing defense, his former lead Army lawyer, Lt. Col. Kris R. Poppe, asked the judge to effectively allow his former defense team or another group of lawyers to make his case on his behalf. They submitted their motion over Major Hasan's objections.Typically in the sentencing phase of capital punishment trials, prosecutors make a case for death and the defense makes a case for life. In Major Hasan's sentencing, the jury essentially heard no argument for life, but heard — in powerful, heartbreaking detail — the prosecutors' case for death. The Army, for two days of emotional testimony on Monday and Tuesday, called 20 victims and relatives of those he killed. One widow said she kept her husband's cellphone activated for years after his death so she could call his number to hear his voice, and another said she had twice attempted suicide."If no one is making a case for life, there is only death," Colonel Poppe told the judge on Tuesday in a Fort Hood courtroom.The judge, Col. Tara A. Osborn, said that she could not compel Major Hasan to make a sentencing case, citing other state and federal court cases and his Sixth Amendment right to self-representation. "Major Hasan," she told Colonel Poppe, "is the captain of his own ship."If the judge had granted Colonel Poppe's request, he would have put on the sentencing case that the former defense team had been unable to present after Major Hasan released them and began representing himself. Their goal would have been to persuade just one of the 13 Army jurors to spare Major Hasan's life since the jury must vote unanimously for a death sentence. Barring unanimity, Major Hasan will receive a sentence of life in prison.Major Hasan has been an unusual defendant throughout his trial. He admitted to the jury in his opening statement that he was the gunman. During jury selection and throughout the testimony of nearly 90 witnesses called by Army prosecutors during the first phase of the trial, he asked few questions. He presented no witnesses, admitted one exhibit as evidence and made no closing argument.On Tuesday, after the government rested its sentencing case, Major Hasan told the judge, "The defense rests."Two defense consultants — a defense mitigation specialist and a religious conversion expert — sat in the courtroom, as required by the judge, in case Major Hasan changed his mind about calling them to testify. He never did.After the judge allowed Major Hasan to represent himself, she told his former Army lawyers to remain his standby counsel. They offer him procedural guidance in navigating the military court system, but cannot supply him with legal advice. They remain by his side in case Major Hasan or the judge seeks their return.The odd role — to sit by his former client while prohibited from actually representing him, and to watch him purposefully inch closer to a death sentence — has posed an ethical dilemma for Colonel Poppe, 50, a lawyer from small-town Ohio with more than 30 years of military service who has been working on Major Hasan's case since May 2010. He has argued in court that assisting Major Hasan in any capacity was helping him reach his goal of a death sentence, and that such an arrangement violated his and the two other former lawyers' professional and ethical obligations. He asked the judge to limit their role, but the judge ordered them to remain as standby counsel.
WASHINGTON — In President Obama's telling, Congress plays host to an "endless parade of distractions and political posturing." It is the "challenging" place where his second-term agenda meets Washington gridlock, forcing him to issue executive orders and make appeals to the public to get anything done.Yet now the president has chosen to hand over one of his most pressing foreign policy decisions to the very crowd that has vowed to block him at every turn.By asking Congress for authorization to retaliate against Syria for using chemical weapons, Mr. Obama has put himself at the mercy of an institution that has bedeviled his presidency for years. He has risked his credibility — at home and abroad — on a bet that Washington's partisan divisions will take a back seat during this debate. And he has bowed to the reality that some of the loudest demands for a Syria vote have come from his allies on Capitol Hill."You go to war with the Congress you have, not the Congress you wish you had," said Matt Bennett, a former senior aide to President Bill Clinton. "He doesn't have a Congress he can trust, but he feels that this is weighty enough that the Congress should be involved."The week ahead will feature a high-stakes lobbying effort by the administration for military action, some of it classified and behind closed doors, even as lawmakers trickle back to Washington from their summer break.Despite assurances on the talk shows by Secretary of State John Kerry that Congress will approve action, early indications suggest that the Syria debate may face a version of the paralyzing politics that have repeatedly blocked Mr. Obama's legislative proposals on gun control, immigration, climate change, expanded preschool, infrastructure spending, taxes, housing and the federal budget.That could be especially true in the House, where a coalition of Tea Party conservatives, liberal Democrats and libertarians already appears to be preparing to oppose the use of military force in Syria. And even some senators began lining up to announce their opposition well ahead of the start of a debate in that chamber.Senator James M. Inhofe, Republican of Oklahoma, said he would vote "no" and predicted that lawmakers would not give the president the authorization that he seeks. "I don't think they will," Mr. Inhofe said in an appearance on "Fox News Sunday."Mr. Obama's willingness to place his faith in lawmakers is particularly unexpected for a president who has spent much of his second term trying to find creative ways to work around their judgment.When Congress refused to approve new spending on infrastructure projects, he announced a faster process for getting federal permits. When it balked at new gun laws, he signed more than 20 executive actions to keep guns from criminals and people with mental illnesses. In his State of the Union, he pledged to enact new rules to combat climate change."If Congress won't act soon to protect future generations, I will," Mr. Obama said, promising executive actions to reduce pollution.In speeches across the country on housing and education, every mention of the need for Congressional approval for his proposals has become a reliable punch line. In Scranton, Penn., last month, the audience laughed when Mr. Obama said that some of his proposals for college tuition would require action from Congress.Earlier, in Galesburg, Ill., he laid out an economic vision for his last three years and said, "We're going to do everything we can, wherever we can, with or without Congress, to make things happen."White House officials are betting that a debate about attacking Syria will be different, and that Congress will not shrink from what Mr. Obama says is the need to hold the Syrian president, Bashar al-Assad, accountable for gassing his own citizens. By demanding a vote, the president is essentially asking Congress to own the decision to go to war.David Axelrod, a former senior adviser to the president, said he hoped members of Congress would treat the issue of a military attack differently than they had many domestic issues.
WASHINGTON — The Congressional vote on whether to strike Syria will offer the best insight yet on which wing of the Republican Party — the traditional hawks, or a growing bloc of noninterventionists — has the advantage in the fierce internal debates over foreign policy that have been taking place all year.Republican divisions on national security have flared over the use of drones, aid to Egypt and the surveillance practices of the National Security Agency, and the tensions have played out publicly in battles between Senator John McCain of Arizona, a former Navy pilot and Vietnam prisoner of war, and Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, a libertarian-leaning freshman. Mr. McCain memorably called Mr. Paul and his compatriots "wacko birds," and Mr. Paul suggested that hawks like Mr. McCain were "moss covered."But those intermittent spats could pale in comparison with the fight over whether to attack Syria, an issue on which Mr. McCain, a former Republican presidential candidate, and Mr. Paul, a possible contender in 2016, will almost certainly be the leading spokesmen for their party's two wings.Mr. McCain has long advocated intervention in Syria's civil war. After meeting with President Obama at the White House on Monday, he said that it would be "catastrophic" if Congress did not approve the president's proposal and that such a rejection would result in the United States's credibility being "shredded."Mr. Paul on Sunday made clear his opposition to Mr. Obama's proposal, taking to Twitter and the talk shows to taunt Secretary of State John Kerry."John Kerry is, you know, he's famous for saying, you know, how can you ask a man to be the last one to die for a mistake?" Mr. Paul said. "I would ask John Kerry, how can you ask a man to be the first one to die for a mistake?"A top aide to Mr. Paul said Sunday that the senator would mount a lobbying campaign in the House, where senior leaders like Mike Rogers, Republican of Michigan, who is the chairman of the Intelligence Committee, will face off against a new vanguard of members like Justin Amash, Republican of Michigan, who are opposed to what they see as risky foreign entanglements.But even Republicans who are not active supporters of Mr. Paul recognize that the country and their party are susceptible to a come-home-America message at a moment of war weariness and, among conservatives, profound distrust toward Mr. Obama."Americans have become increasingly inured to events thousands of miles away, within a distant and disconnected culture," said a longtime Republican strategist, Alex Castellanos, citing a nation "exhausted by crises." "They know our country is already overextended and doubt leaders who tell them there are 'no good options' but demand we choose one anyway."As a result, Mr. Castellanos said, "Rand Paul is actually in sync with a crisis-weary America and a fatigued G.O.P."Mr. Paul is very much aware that the vote offers just that chance to reorient, at least for now, the Republican center on foreign affairs. And the debate gives him the chance to re-establish himself as the leading voice of the libertarian-leaning Tea Party movement after months in which Senator Ted Cruz of Texas has won significant attention.To Republicans concerned about next year's midterm elections, such a divisive public battle amounts to a distraction. They would prefer to focus on issues that voters say they are most interested in: taxes, spending, Mr. Obama's health care law.But the Syria measure also has important implications for the 2016 Republican presidential contest. White House hopefuls in Congress will be forced to choose between the wishes of Tea Party activists opposed to a strike and the wishes of more traditional Republicans, whose ranks include some major donors and Israel supporters with whom presidential candidates typically align themselves.And as the hawks are aware, a "yea" vote on taking action in Syria would put potential opponents of Mr. Paul, like Senator Marco Rubio of Florida and Mr. Cruz, on the same side as Mr. Obama.Dan Senor, a Republican strategist and foreign policy hand in President George W. Bush's administration, lamented the trend of what he called "neo-isolationism" in either the Democratic or Republican Party when it does not hold the White House. But he acknowledged that the current mood of Republicans left Mr. Paul in a better position."He is a skilled enough politician to tap into these sentiments and take advantage of them," Mr. Senor said.
WASHINGTON — The intensifying debate over military action in Syria is threatening to consume the limited amount of time that Congress had allocated this month for dealing with a budget clash and the rest of President Obama's domestic agenda.Lawmakers are scheduled to return to reconvene Congress on Monday after their annual summer break. With a budget and debt limit clash looming in October, the legislative window had already narrowed for any action on immigration, energy efficiency, a new Federal Reserve chairman and an examination of surveillance laws.Now, with Mr. Obama's surprise decision to request Congressional authorization for a Syria strike, the political casualties are mounting quickly."This is drawing the national attention to a foreign policy issue and taking it off of domestic issues like immigration reform and health care implementation," said Neera Tanden, the president of the Center for American Progress, a liberal research group.She said some lawmakers might use the debate as an excuse to avoid action, adding, "I do think people come up with reasons not to do their job."Congressional leaders in both parties have said they are eager to move quickly on a Syria vote, and the House and Senate began hearings this week. But it remains unclear how long the Syria debate will take. White House officials said they expected the debate to drag out at least into the third week of September.That would scramble the calendar that House and Senate leaders had anticipated when they left the Capitol for vacations earlier this summer. The problem is especially striking in the House, which will barely be in session this month. The Senate is scheduled to work for five straight weeks after a vote Monday night to force senators to return to Washington. The House will be taking nine workdays off during that stretch.More than anything, the war question is likely to siphon attention away from efforts to resolve a simmering fiscal dispute between the parties. Without a Congressional agreement by Sept. 30, the government will run out of money on Oct. 1. Two weeks later, the government's statutory borrowing limit must be raised to avoid a potentially catastrophic debt default.Washington has been bracing for a fiscal clash for months. Some Republicans in the House have said they are prepared to shut the government down if Congress will not agree to remove money for the carrying out of Mr. Obama's health care law. Other Republicans have said they do not intend to raise the nation's debt limit unless the president agrees to more spending cuts.Mr. Obama has said he will not negotiate over the nation's ability to pay its bills, and has warned Republicans that shutting down the government would be a reckless move. The Syria debate means both sides have less free time to work toward a negotiated settlement on the issues.Kevin Smith, a spokesman for the House speaker, John A. Boehner of Ohio, played down any impact on the fall's most important matters."We are confident we can address a resolution on use of force in Syria and still meet our obligations in a fiscally responsible manner," he said.But Congressional aides in both parties said the Syria debate was already causing disruptions.Mr. Boehner had promised he would bring a bill to finance transportation and housing programs to the floor in September after an ugly defeat in July. That will not happen.The House Judiciary Committee had hoped to begin moving piecemeal immigration legislation, but the bills' prospects for House action this fall were already slim before the Syria crisis. Now they will probably slip beyond Thanksgiving.Republican and Democratic leaders of the House and Senate Intelligence and Judiciary Committees had also intended to move significant changes to laws governing the National Security Agency's phone and Internet surveillance programs — either through stand-alone legislation or a reauthorization of existing intelligence law. That, too, is likely to slip.A Senate Democratic leadership aide said the debate and vote on the war resolution would consume the first week back, putting off a fight over judicial nominations for the foreseeable future. But leaders still expect to turn to a bipartisan energy efficiency bill the week of Sept. 16, as scheduled.White House officials said Congress shouldered the responsibility to get its work done despite the new burden of a vote on military action in Syria."An American president has to be able to walk, chew gum and juggle at the same time," said Dan Pfeiffer, a senior adviser to Mr. Obama. "The president and his team will do everything they can to implement his overall agenda while this debate happens."Mr. Pfeiffer added, "This is an important debate, and it's one the president, the country and the Congress are rightly focused on."Mr. Pfeiffer said the White House would continue to press ahead with Mr. Obama's agenda. Former President Bill Clinton delivered a speech on Wednesday as part of the administration's effort to get people to sign up for health care beginning on Oct. 1. That effort will continue, Mr. Pfeiffer said.But other issues may languish, at least for a while.Aides say some will now slip beyond Thanksgiving, including the annual defense policy bill and a possible fix to the Voting Rights Act in response to a Supreme Court ruling that struck down a key provision of the historic law.Advocates of a comprehensive immigration overhaul had hoped to build some momentum in the House this month toward passage of legislation similar to a bill that passed the Senate this year with Mr. Obama's backing.That already faced long odds in the House, where many Republicans oppose any effort to offer citizenship to most of the nation's 11 million illegal immigrants. Now, with the Syria debate in Washington, aides said any serious effort on immigration in the House was likely to be pushed back to November or even later."There's no question that the debate on Syria is going to take precedence now," said Frank Sharry, executive director of America's Voice, a group lobbying for an immigration overhaul. But he said that he was less concerned about the timeline for action than he was the need to build consensus around a solution."This is less about whether there's time," he said. "It's more about whether there's a will."
WASHINGTON — The Obama administration on Wednesday escalated its effort to dismantle federal barriers to same-sex marriages, announcing that the Department of Veterans Affairs would immediately begin providing spousal benefits to gay men and lesbians despite a federal statute that limits such benefits to veterans' spouses who are "of the opposite sex."In letters to Congressional leaders, Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr. said that President Obama had directed the executive branch to stop obeying the statute because it had decided that it was unconstitutional in light of a Supreme Court ruling in June that struck down a similar law, a part of the Defense of Marriage Act."Decisions by the Executive not to enforce federal laws are appropriately rare," Mr. Holder wrote. "Nevertheless, for the reasons described below, the unique circumstances presented here warrant nonenforcement."The move will allow the same-sex spouses of service members to receive health care benefits, and widows and widowers from same-sex marriages to receive survivor benefits, among other matters.After the Supreme Court ruling, many agencies — the Pentagon and the Internal Revenue Service among them — have been rewriting their regulations to define marriage in gender-neutral terms. Last month the military announced that the same-sex spouses of active-duty personnel would receive similar family and spousal benefits, including housing allowances.But the V.A. is in a different situation because Congress codified its definition of who was eligible for spousal benefits as a statute, and lawmakers have not changed it.Eric K. Shinseki, the secretary of veterans affairs, said last month in a letter released by Senator Jeanne Shaheen, Democrat of New Hampshire, that his agency was struggling with the question of providing benefits to surviving spouses because the statutory language defining "spouse" was slightly different from the law that the court had struck down.In the letter, Mr. Shinseki said that although the Department of Veterans Affairs could recognize a same-sex marriage that is valid under state law, "nonetheless, a same-sex spouse whose marriage to a veteran was valid in the state where the parties resided at the time they entered the marriage would not meet the definition of 'spouse' " under the federal statute for the purpose of veterans benefits.Should Congress approve legislation revising the spousal definitions statute or should a court strike the law down, Mr. Shinseki added, the V.A. would swiftly adjust its policy.Last week, a Federal District Court judge ruled that the veterans spouse statute was unconstitutional, but that ruling applied only to the specific plaintiffs and the legal issue has not been reviewed by an appellate court. But in his letter on Wednesday, Mr. Holder said there was no point in waiting for a more definitive result."In the meantime, continued enforcement would likely have a tangible adverse effect on the families of veterans and, in some circumstances, active-duty service members and reservists, with respect to survival, health care, home loan and other benefits," he wrote.The decision does not mean that every same-sex couple is eligible for spousal benefits. Another part of the statute defines spouses as those whose marriages are recognized by the state where they live or where the veteran was discharged — not the state where the marriage occurred. The Supreme Court's ruling said that the federal government could not discriminate against same-sex couples whose marriages were recognized under state law, but it did not create a right to have one's marriage recognized in federal law when the state does not sanction it.The Obama administration's decision to stop obeying the law without a definitive court ruling is a new step in its increasingly aggressive approach to providing same-sex marriage rights.Early in his presidency, when Democrats controlled both chambers of Congress, Mr. Obama said that laws discriminating against same-sex couples should be scrapped. But he urged lawmakers to amend them, even as his Justice Department defended Congress's constitutional right to enact such laws in court.In December 2010, the administration pushed Congress to eliminate the law barring gay and lesbian troops from serving openly in the military. But in early 2011, after Republicans took control of the House of Representatives, Mr. Holder informed Congress that the Justice Department had decided that the Defense of Marriage Act was unconstitutional and that it would no longer defend the law in court.Soon after, Mr. Holder sent another letter to Congress saying the administration had come to the same conclusion on the veterans law. But he also said in both letters that the administration would continue to enforce the disputed laws until a court definitively ruled them to be unconstitutional.On Wednesday, Mr. Holder acknowledged that there has not been a definitive court ruling against the surviving-spouse veterans benefits law. Still, he argued, there were several reasons it was no longer appropriate for the government to refuse such benefits.He cited the spirit of the Supreme Court's ruling, the Federal District Court judge's ruling last week and the fact that the House of Representatives withdrew its legal defense of the veterans statute after the June ruling."In these unique circumstances, continued enforcement" of the veterans marriage law, he wrote, "is no longer appropriate, and the Executive Branch will no longer enforce them."
WAYNESBURG, Pa. — From his bar-side perch at Hot Rod's House of Barbeque here, 57-year-old Wolf Tripp argued that President George W. Bush had ample cause a decade ago to dispatch troops and armor into Iraq to topple Saddam Hussein. "Look at the mass graves," he declared. "Hussein gassed his own people."The gassing last month of hundreds of Syrian civilians is entirely another matter. And sending cruise missiles there to punish the Syrian president, Bashar al-Assad, is out of the question, Mr. Tripp said this week."What are we going to do, borrow more money from China to fight?" he said. "It's their civil war. Why are we going in there?"As President Obama tries to rally domestic support for military action against Syria, the skepticism in Waynesburg only underscores the political hurdles he faces. This bucolic, if fading, corner of southwest Pennsylvania wears its patriotism on its sleeve, shirttail and pockets. At the time of Mr. Bush's decision to invade Iraq, a Quinnipiac University poll in Pennsylvania found that 86 percent of the voters in and around Waynesburg were solidly behind him.But in myriad ways, the calculus has changed. Some say they now believe that domestic needs neglected during a decade of war override foreign imperatives. Some, reviewing years of pitched struggle in Afghanistan and Iraq, see the Middle East as quicksand that must be avoided at all costs. Some say that Syria's civil war is Syria's problem, and that the United States is not the Mr. Fix-it for all of the world's crises.And here, at least, more than a few see military action against Syria as unacceptable simply because it is Mr. Obama's idea.In town to speak to students at Waynesburg University about Syria, the area's congressman, Tim Murphy, a Republican who called himself undecided, said his office had received a few hundred calls and messages from constituents about Syria. "Generally, the calls are like this: 'I can't stand President Obama; don't you dare go along with him,' " he said.In the university library, Mr. Murphy spent an hour tutoring some 20 undergraduates on the complexities of Congress's impending decision. When he finished, all but one of the students pronounced involvement in Syria a mistake. Mr. Obama's main argument that the world has a moral obligation to act against those who use chemical weapons went unmentioned."I wouldn't go in if I were you," said one of the undergraduates, Jon Waldon, 22. "Public opinion was against it. Second off, we're in a lot of debt. Third off, there haven't been United States citizens targeted in the attack."Off campus, the attitudes were similar. Jennifer Taylor said that she was managing the officers' club at the Marine Corps Air Station in Cherry Point, N.C., and cheering on Mr. Bush when American forces invaded Iraq. But this week, from her spot tending bar at Hot Rod's, she was decidedly against the use of force in Syria and questioned Mr. Obama's motivations in proposing it."Obama was against" the invasion of Iraq, Ms. Taylor noted, "and I don't understand why he's changed his stance." Seconds later, she offered an explanation: "He's having trouble keeping his popularity up; this war on guns has made him unpopular. And this is his way of getting back up."Indeed, her customer, Mr. Tripp, suggested that the use of chemical weapons was actually a plot by Al Qaeda to lure the United States into toppling the Syrian government, and that Mr. Obama was falling for it. Terrorists will rush into the vacuum once Mr. Assad is gone, he warned.To be sure, not everyone here believes a strike against Syria is a mistake. "We're the watchdog of the world, and something's got to be done," Blair Zimmerman, a Democrat and a Greene County commissioner — Waynesburg is the county seat — said during a chat in the county office building. "I'm all for missile and airstrikes — but ending it there."
MIDWEST CITY, Okla. — Representative Tom Cole started hearing it in the morning when he went to grab coffee."I was just at Starbucks, and a woman there recognized me," he told a Chamber of Commerce gathering here. "She said, 'Everybody here's a no on Syria.'  "Mr. Cole, a six-term Republican, would seem a potential candidate to support President Obama on Syria. A pragmatic Congressional veteran, he has been open to compromise with the White House in the past and is not afraid to break with House conservatives. But after portraying himself as leaning against a strike, Mr. Cole on Thursday afternoon came down firmly in the opposition when his office issued a statement announcing that he would vote no.Given the intensity of opposition in his district, he said it would take a "road to Damascus experience" to change his mind now. "I literally cannot walk across the parking lot without being stopped to talk about this issue," he said. "I haven't seen anything quite like this."He is hardly alone. Fewer than a dozen House Republicans, a total that includes the top two leaders, have publicly said they would back the president on a military strike, making the White House climb to a House majority exceedingly steep given significant Democratic resistance as well. Not only is the administration not winning over Republicans, it lost at least one it had. Representative Michael G. Grimm, Republican of New York, said Thursday that he was reversing his support. "The moment to show our strength has passed," he said.Mr. Cole's constituent experience is not isolated. Representative Mick Mulvaney, a Republican swept into power in 2010 in military-focused South Carolina on a platform of small government, said that in his three-plus years in Congress, no issue had elicited as passionate a response as Syria. And, he added, "to say it's 99 percent against would be overstating the support."Of the 1,000 or so calls and e-mails he has received, 3 supported some kind of response. And two-thirds of the correspondents had never reached out to him before.Representative Candice S. Miller, Republican of Michigan, said she was at a peach festival parade last weekend in her district, an event that does not typically draw the type of constituent who is overly political. But as she made her way down the parade route, one person after another urged her to vote no on any authorization of force in Syria."It was not a political event at all," Ms. Miller said. "But there were a lot of people, older veterans especially in their hats, all saying, 'No on Syria!'  "In the face of such overwhelming constituent opposition, Congressional Republican leaders are treading extremely lightly. Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the majority leader, has come out strongly for military intervention in Syria, but in a one-on-one conversation with Representative Jason Chaffetz, Republican of Utah, he did not press the point, Mr. Chaffetz said.In Mr. Cole's case, speaker after speaker at an evening town hall meeting questioned Mr. Obama's assertion that he has constitutional authority to strike on his own — and insisted that Congress not give him authority."Where does he get this — a Cracker Jack box?" asked Steve Byas, who teaches government at Hillsdale Free Will Baptist College in Moore, Okla. Criticizing Mr. Obama's "red line," Mr. Byas added, "Just because the president made a statement he should not have made should not bind the Congress to go ahead and approve this."The applause Mr. Byas received from the crowd of 150 people mirrored the flow of telephone calls Mr. Cole's office aides have fielded. "Not one" in favor of striking Syria, he said.The majority of people Mr. Cole represents in this southwest Oklahoma district rarely support Mr. Obama on much of anything; two-thirds of voters here backed the Republican presidential nominee, Mitt Romney, in November. At the town meeting, which stretched beyond three hours in a Rose State College lecture hall, constituents derided Mr. Obama as a socialist, demanded that Republicans shut down the government to block his health care plan, and called for his impeachment. Many House Republicans have echoed those sentiments, seemingly making it difficult for them to back the president on his Syria plan despite their embrace of American military power.
WASHINGTON — Congress is like a seamless web where every action has an effect on those that follow, the late Richard Bolling, a longtime member of the House of Representatives and a congressional scholar, used to remind young reporters.The Obama administration will have to confront that reality this autumn in the aftermath of its request for congressional approval for a military strike against Syria.The outcome remains in doubt, though there may be an even chance that after a near-death experience or two, Congress will authorize a strike in a close vote.There is little doubt, however, that this struggle, which will occupy most of September, will affect other big issues: the high-stakes deficit and debt-ceiling battle; the fate of a comprehensive immigration bill in the House, and perhaps in the Senate; and the nomination of the next chairman of the Federal Reserve.If President Barack Obama wins on Syria, most Republicans who supported him will want to keep their distance on other issues; the party's base is dominated by Obama haters. Getting the reluctant backing of some liberal Democrats for military action might add to the tension on the fiscal issues and the Fed pick.Some Obama loyalists make the case that the Syria resolution, if approved, could lead to other successes. Working across party lines might prove contagious, precipitating a search for more common ground."It's too early to tell what the fallout from this vote will be on other issues," said Representative Chris Van Hollen of Maryland, the leading House Democrat on fiscal issues, but "there will be ripple effects."Others believe a Kumbaya moment just is not possible in the Washington of today: "If a Republican gives the president a vote on this, they'll have to go back to the base on the fiscal stuff and maybe the Fed," said Tom Davis, a former Republican member of Congress and an astute analyst of U.S. politics.John A. Boehner, the House speaker, who will probably be part of a distinct minority of his caucus in voting for the Syria measure, will be under enormous pressure to move right. "Coming right on the heels of Syria, House Republicans have to get something in return on debt," Mr. Davis said.The Democrats, who are counting on winning at least the public opinion battle in the fiscal war, may find it harder to depict Republican leaders as partisan nihilists if those leaders have just bailed out the president on Syria.Democrats are worried that after using all his chits to get barely enough votes for the strike resolution, Mr. Obama — whose negotiating skills are suspect to many on Capitol Hill — might then be too eager to cut a fiscal deal.Especially worrisome would be if Republicans demanded, as the price for Syria, a rollback of the cuts to defense spending under sequestration, as the mandatory $1 trillion in budget cuts is known. There may be an appealing political case for this. Liberals are adamant that any changes to the automatic reductions must apply equally to domestic and military programs.Immigration reform, which cleared the Senate handily, already faces a tough slog in the Republican-controlled House. As with the deficit and the debt-ceiling increase, the Syria debate and vote won't make this any easier.Final passage of comprehensive legislation, with a pathway to citizenship for undocumented immigrants, can be achieved only with a minority of Republicans. That would force the speaker to waive the so-called Hastert rule, which asserts that a bill can be considered only if it commands the support of a majority of the Republican caucus. Mr. Boehner will already have had to waive the rule for the Syria vote and might not be able to return to the well.There is no rational reason the confirmation of the next Fed chairman should be affected by any of this. But Congress is not a rational institution these days, and the president's preferred choice for head of the central bank, the former Treasury secretary Lawrence H. Summers, is a contentious figure in a wide array of political constituencies.Many conservative Republicans oppose Mr. Summers's nomination because they hold him responsible for the economic stimulus and the rescue of the automobile industry, and because he served as president of Harvard University, a supposed hotbed of liberal orthodoxy.He has incurred the wrath of some Democratic liberals for spearheading financial deregulation in the late 1990s and working for Wall Street after leaving his position as director of the National Economic Council in 2010.A top Democratic Senate strategist worries that "if the White House nominates Summers, they're going to have to go right back to the same liberals — Tom Harkin, Sherrod Brown, Elizabeth Warren — that they're working on Syria."If Mr. Summers is tapped — and he is the clear front-runner — Mr. Obama would count on support from important Republicans like Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina. Mr. Graham is fighting a primary challenge from Tea Party conservatives, who criticize him for supporting the president on immigration and Syria and for his approach to the sequestration.The stakes for Mr. Obama on Syria are impossible to exaggerate. A loss would make his presidency appear impotent and devastate the United States' global standing. The president realizes this: He called skeptical senators from the Group of 20 meeting outside St. Petersburg; he talked to one Democrat for more than half an hour. The president is scheduled to deliver a national address from the Oval Office on Tuesday. Will he enlist former Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton to lobby wavering Democrats?A victory in Congress on Syria would be an important achievement; but politically, it might be short- lived.
WASHINGTON — The calls come at all hours from time zones across the country as anxious House Democrats reach out to Representative Nancy Pelosi, asking her to make her case for a strike in Syria."What I have said, including to some of my closest friends in Congress who are mostly in doubt: I want you to know that I don't like the use of force," said Ms. Pelosi, the California Democrat and House Democratic leader. "But I think it should happen" in Syria.Ms. Pelosi, who led Democratic opposition to the Iraq war resolution sought by President George W. Bush, is now charged with rounding up enough votes, in a chamber where her party is in the minority, to win approval of a use-of-force measure requested by President Obama. The effort comes as members of her leadership team and Senate Democrats are privately seething over the position their party's president has put them in: seeking votes for a measure that most of the country does not support.House Republicans, whose leaders support the effort but who themselves largely do not, have made it clear that the burden rests with Ms. Pelosi, a notion she rejects. "If we're going to have a product, it's going to have to be strongly bipartisan," she said.While Speaker John A. Boehner has shown little ability to sway the most conservative members of his party, who are disinclined to help Mr. Obama, Ms. Pelosi has maintained credibility across much of her caucus. It is a credibility hard-earned through years of legislative victories that have left many of her own members battle-scarred, on issues including health care, the bailouts of the auto industry and the financial sector, and climate change legislation. That loyalty faces a test as she tries to build a consensus without the power of the gavel.Unlike Mr. Boehner, Ms. Pelosi has written daily letters to colleagues encouraging them to come to an agreement on a measure, taken dozens of calls from lawmakers, and arranged briefings for scores of House Democrats with high-level administration officials, including meetings specifically for Hispanic, black and freshman members.Ms. Pelosi said that while she was sympathetic to her members' reluctance, the stakes with chemical weapons were simply too high. "I believe stopping weapons of mass destruction is a pillar of our national security," she said."We have to make sure tyrants do not think they can do that with impunity," she added. "I think war should be obsolete. I don't think it is a reasonable way to resolve conflict. I think we should eliminate it as a possibility. But we haven't yet."While Ms. Pelosi is doing Mr. Obama's bidding, the task at hand synthesizes years of her deep personal interests in human rights issues and national security, her complicated history with liberals on matters of war, and her legislative prowess, which hinges on a near obsession with counting and securing votes.Ms. Pelosi, who has spent decades pressing human rights issues in China, Kosovo, Darfur and beyond, spoke out in favor of action against the Syrian government before Mr. Obama made his case, saying, "Assad gassing his own people is an issue of our national security, regional stability and global security."As a senior member of the House Intelligence Committee, she was an early opponent of the Iraq war and voted against its authorization. She later faced antiwar protesters outside her home after vehemently defending bills that paid for that war."On national security issues there is no one-size-fits-all with Nancy Pelosi," said Representative Steve Israel, Democrat of New York. "She has been very muscular on protecting human rights abroad. She is hawkish on some issues, dovish on others. She has a very complex view on foreign policy, and by explaining them to members, she can bring them along."In her early years in the House in the 1980s, she pressed the Chinese government on human rights, and she lobbied for years on behalf of Liu Xiaobo, who spent a decade in prison for his critical articles on the government there. As speaker, she was the highest-ranking American official to attend Mr. Liu's Nobel Peace Prize ceremony.
At the regular Peace Vigil in Louisville, Ky., on Sunday, some unusual newcomers joined the bearded, longtime war protesters waving signs with doves and "War Is Not the Answer": a contingent from Indiana's Clark County Tea Party Patriots, who came to oppose military intervention in Syria."Our bombs aren't any better than the chemical weapons the Syrians are lobbing," said Kelly Khuri, a leader of the Tea Party group, who was nonplused at the first protest she attended a week earlier to be linking arms with the progressive left. "It kind of freaked me out," she said.In Florida, Tea Party supporters are organizing to pressure Congress not to support the airstrike that President Obama has called for, in the event of a breakdown in the diplomatic efforts involving Russia. "We are calling our representatives and demanding they vote no on this," said Billie Tucker, a founder of the First Coast Tea Party in Jacksonville, Fla.And a Washington-based Tea Party group, FreedomWorks, organized its first-ever lobbying campaign on a foreign policy issue last week when it urged members to call Congress to reject Mr. Obama's resolution to attack Syria.The conservative movement has always had factions opposing American intervention in foreign conflicts, most recently led by Ron Paul, the two-time Republican presidential candidate and a Tea Party favorite. But the rallying of conservatives on Syria suggests a new political development: the emergence of organizing by the Tea Party to oppose American military action.With prominent members of the Republican establishment favoring a military strike, in part to send a message about American resolve to potential aggressors like Iran, a grass-roots trend in the opposite direction poses a challenge to the party's leadership that could play out in future elections.Majorities of 59 percent to 63 percent of Americans in recent polls said they opposed airstrikes to punish the Syrian government over the use of chemical weapons, but Tea Party opposition is by all accounts far higher. The issue brings the movement into ideological alignment with progressive antiwar groups like MoveOn.org."There's across-the-board opposition by Virginia Tea Party members of any U.S. involvement in Syria," said Mark Daugherty, chairman of the Virginia Tea Party Patriots Federation. "We feel we have a basket of problems that need to be solved domestically in the U.S."Since its birth in 2009, the Tea Party movement has focused on economics, batting away other issues as distractions from its core mission to shrink government, lower taxes and, of course, defeat "Obamacare," the president's health overhaul.Syria opened the door for movement leaders to link a national debate on foreign policy to their economic ideas."There has to be money spent when you buy Tomahawk missiles to lob over Damascus," said David A. Dickerson, a leader of the Barren County Patriots in Kentucky. "My feeling is we don't need to involve ourselves in a civil war halfway around the world when we have the needs we have at home, like bringing spending under control."On Sunday, Mr. Dickerson circulated a letter for Tea Party activists around the state to forward to their members of Congress, stating, "I ask you once again to confirm to us that you are a NO vote on the president's proposal to intervene in a civil war where we have zero national interest."Tea Party supporters in Kentucky also aimed a broad campaign of e-mails and calls at Senator Mitch McConnell, the minority leader, who had hesitated to take a position. Mr. McConnell, who faces a strong Tea Party-supported challenger for his seat next year, announced Tuesday that he would not join other Republican leaders, including Speaker John A. Boehner, in backing a strike."Senator McConnell read the tea leaves," said a spokeswoman for his Kentucky primary challenger, Matt Bevin.Last Thursday, FreedomWorks urged members to call Congress to oppose intervention in Syria, which it says led to 5,000 calls the next day.
WASHINGTON — In the weeks of sometimes bewildering debate in Washington about what to do in Syria, one truth has emerged: President Obama has transformed his relationship with the Pentagon and the military.The civilian policy makers and generals who led Mr. Obama toward a troop escalation in Afghanistan during his first year in office, a decision that left him deeply distrustful of senior military leaders, have been replaced by a handpicked leadership that includes Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel and Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.Through battlefield experience — Mr. Hagel as an infantryman in 1967 and 1968 in Vietnam, and General Dempsey as a commander during some of the most violent years in Iraq — both men share Mr. Obama's reluctance to use American military might overseas. A dozen years after the Pentagon under Donald H. Rumsfeld began aggressively driving national security policy, the two have wholeheartedly endorsed a more restricted Pentagon role."Hagel was not hired to be a 'secretary of war,' " said one senior Defense Department official. "That is not a mantle the president wants him to wear."The crisis in Syria is the most recent and most powerful example of how Mr. Obama, elected twice on a promise to disengage the United States from overseas conflicts, has moved the Pentagon to a back seat. In this case, it is Secretary of State John Kerry who is leading the charge, not the far less vocal Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey."Whether you call it a reset of the Pentagon or a reflection of what our overall policy is," the Pentagon official said, "the military instrument is not going to be the dominant instrument of our policy, particularly in an instance like Syria, where we are not looking at military force to solve the underlying civil war."Senior aides to Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey say that the two have offered blunt advice on Syria, and that both support, as would be expected, the president's goal of having ready a limited military strike aimed at stopping the Syrian government from using chemical weapons.But neither is the chief advocate for military action. The drum major for intervention is instead Mr. Kerry, who also served in Vietnam, and who has eclipsed Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey in public passion and in minutes at the microphone during Congressional hearings. (If negotiations to neuter Syria's chemical weapons stockpile founder and the president orders military action, Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey will assume the role of administration spokesmen on the mission.)But their public postures ahead of any military action have been so restrained that they have drawn criticism from lawmakers who want a more activist defense secretary and Joint Chiefs chairman.Senator John McCain, the Arizona Republican, has been the most critical. Just before the current push for an attack, prompted by what American intelligence agencies say was the deaths of 1,400 people by poison gas, Mr. McCain said General Dempsey was campaigning to avoid action by describing the risks and costs of the most extreme options for intervention. The general's assessments "are beyond anything that any rational military thinker that I know would ever contemplate," Mr. McCain said.Even some senior administration officials, in private conversations and in e-mails, have sniped at Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey, saying that their reserved demeanor undercut the administration's arguments for action in Syria.In one exchange before Congress, General Dempsey said that an American strike on Syria would be "an act of war," prompting a rebuttal from Mr. Kerry, who said the options were nothing like the huge mobilizations and lengthy deployments of the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.Both statements were accurate, but the points of view reflected different assessments of the risks and benefits of intervention by the Pentagon and the State Department.
ALEXANDRIA, Va. — Gerald L. Read's neighbors here often spotted him walking the rescue dogs that he and his wife took in and treated like children. He loved those dogs, along with his perfectly tended garden and his three granddaughters, who had come for a backyard cookout on Labor Day.But on Tuesday, Mr. Read's neighbor Carole Willis shook with sobs as she remembered him as a quiet, kind man who helped her with household tasks and fed the neighborhood squirrels. Mr. Read, 58, died along with 11 others on Monday in the shootings at the Washington Navy Yard, killed just as they were beginning their workweek inside what had seemed a carefully guarded complex not far from the Capitol."He was just the most dependable, nonquestioning person," she said of Mr. Read, an information assurance specialist with the Navy Sea Systems Command. "Just, 'No problem.' "The nine men and three women who died in the shootings were civilians and contractors; at least some of them were eating breakfast in the cafeteria of Building 197 when the gunman, Aaron Alexis, perched above an atrium and fired down on them. Friends and relatives remembered them on Tuesday as loyal parents and children, hard workers, sports and nature lovers — people who found pleasure in simple things.Kenneth Proctor, 46, would fix a car for anyone, just for the fun of it. He adored his bright yellow Mustang, and his sons, Kenneth Jr., 17, and Kendull, 15. He remained "best friends" with Evelyn Charlene Newman after their divorce in January, Ms. Newman said.Mr. Proctor, who worked as a civilian utilities foreman at the navy yard, met Ms. Newman 25 years ago, when they were both young and flirtatious. Ms. Newman was won over by "his charm and persistence," she said. They married in 1994."His kids, they were everything to him. He was a very loving, caring father," Ms. Newman said. In his spare time, Mr. Proctor visited racetracks and hung out with his many friends and his sons at places like Buffalo Wild Wings and T.G.I. Fridays. But what stood out for his ex-wife was his compassion."He was always being there for me," she said, "even after the divorce."Kathleen Gaarde of Woodbridge, Va., was a "caring daughter, fantastic mother" and a wife of 38 years, her husband, Doug Gaarde, said in a statement.She worked as a financial analyst at the navy yard, according to The Associated Press, and the couple had an adult son and daughter."She loved her animals and was a bluebird counter for the local refuge," Mr. Gaarde said in his statement. "She also loved hockey and the Washington Capitals and was a season-ticket holder for over 25 years."Ms. Gaarde was a frequent presence at the Occoquan Bay National Wildlife Refuge in Woodbridge, said Amanda Daisey, the assistant refuge manager, coming weekly in the spring and summer to monitor nesting bluebirds.Frank Kohler, 50, of Tall Timbers, Md., was "a Steeler fan, a golfer, a great family man, a Christian and a great friend," according to a Facebook post by a friend and former colleague, Bob Allen. He left behind a wife and two daughters who recently graduated from King's Christian Academy in Callaway, Md., where school officials told students about his death on Tuesday.Richard Michael Ridgell of Westminster, Md., was a 17-year veteran of the Maryland State Police, working there until 2000 and leaving as a corporal, said Sgt. Marc Black, a spokesman for the state police.Mr. Ridgell, 52, was working as a security guard at the navy yard, his family told a local television station in Baltimore in an interview. He had three daughters, who told a local television station that he would want to be remembered as a great father, not as a victim.Martin Bodrog, 54, of Annandale, Va., taught preschool on Sundays at Immanuel Bible Church, according to a statement from his family. A graduate of the United States Naval Academy, he was a surface warfare officer in the Navy, with expertise in amphibious operations. But later in life, Christian outreach to local high school students and hockey games featuring his beloved Boston Bruins were among his passions. It was common to see him out with his dog, in his "trademark Boston Bruins jersey" and shorts — even in the worst winter weather. Also common was the sight of Mr. Bodrog "helping shovel all the driveways of his elderly neighbors," according to the statement.After he retired, Mr. Bodrog worked for the Navy as a senior analyst, overseeing the design and procurement of ships. He is survived by his wife of 25 years, Melanie, and three daughters.Arthur Daniels, 51, was a father of five and grandfather of nine. He was installing furniture at the navy yard on Monday as an employee of District Furniture Repair in Arlington County, Va.
WASHINGTON — For roughly 30 hours over several days, defense lawyers for three former United States Naval Academy football players grilled a female midshipman about her sexual habits. In a public hearing, they asked the woman, who has accused the three athletes of raping her, whether she wore a bra, how wide she opened her mouth during oral sex and whether she had apologized to another midshipman with whom she had intercourse "for being a ho."The aggressive tactics on display this month and last are part of a case that has generated intense public scrutiny and raised alarms about what are called Article 32 proceedings, which help determine whether cases are sent to courts-martial. Article 32 hearings permit questions not allowed in civilian courts and can include cross-examinations of witnesses so intense that legal experts say they frighten many victims from coming forward."These have become their own trials," said Jonathan Lurie, a professor emeritus of legal history at Rutgers University and the author of two books on military justice. "If this is what Article 32 has come to be, then it is time to either get rid of it or put real restrictions on the conduct during them."More broadly, the case at the Naval Academy illuminates what critics say is wrong with trying sexual assault cases in the current military justice system, which is under scrutiny in Congress. One bill to be debated this fall, sponsored by Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, would take the prosecution of sexual assault cases outside a victim's chain of command, with a goal of increasing the number of people who report crimes without fear of retaliation.In the coming weeks, the military judge who presided over the female midshipman's hearing will send a recommendation to the Naval Academy's superintendent on how the charges should be disposed of. The superintendent, Vice Adm. Michael H. Miller, will ultimately decide whether to move ahead with a court-martial or drop the case.Increased scrutiny of the problem of sexual assault in the military, combined with more reporting of attacks, has led to a large jump in the number of such cases that have gone to court-martial. The Defense Department says that 68 percent of sexual assault cases were sent to court-martial last year, compared with 30 percent in 2007.But those increases have been accompanied by a series of controversies that have roiled the system, including one at Lackland Air Force Base in Texas in which more than 40 female trainees were abused by their instructors, as well as the arrest in May of the director of the Air Force's sexual response unit, Lt. Col. Jeffrey Krusinski, for what the police said was his groping of a woman he did not know in a parking lot. A recent Pentagon survey found that an estimated 26,000 sexual assaults took place in the military last year, up from 19,000 two years before.The Naval Academy case stems from a 2012 "yoga and toga" off-campus party near the academy in Annapolis, Md., where the woman, then a 20-year-old sophomore, arrived intoxicated and continued to drink, she said. In testimony at the hearing, held at the Washington Navy Yard, she said she had no memory of parts of the evening and may have passed out.The next day, the woman testified, she heard from a friend of one of the three football players via social media that she had had sex with them at an Annapolis home known as "the football house." The football players — Tra'ves Bush, 22; Eric Graham, 21; and Joshua Tate, 21 — were charged with sexually assaulting her and making false statements. The investigation was stymied in part by the woman's initial refusal to cooperate, academy officials said.In the Article 32 cross-examination, defense lawyers repeatedly asked the midshipman about a consensual sexual encounter she said she had the next day. In some of the most widely disseminated testimony, Andrew Weinstein, a lawyer for Mr. Bush, asked the woman whether she wore a bra or other underwear to the party and whether she "felt like a ho" afterward. Lt. Cmdr. Angela Tang, a lawyer for Mr. Graham, also asked the woman repeatedly about her oral sex technique, arguing over objections from the prosecution that oral sex would indicate the "active participation" of the woman and therefore consent.Many military legal experts were appalled by what they heard. "What this case shows is that we think the military justice system can somehow solve the sexual assault problem, but it can't," said Diane H. Mazur, an emeritus law professor at the University of Florida. Several military justice experts said Article 32 proceedings should be eliminated.
WASHINGTON — President Obama on Sunday eulogized the 12 victims of the Navy Yard shooting and lamented what he called a "creeping resignation" in America about the inevitability of gun violence.In remarks to service members and their families who packed the bleachers in the barracks about two and a half blocks from where the killings took place last week, Mr. Obama vowed that he would not accept inaction after the latest in a string of mass shootings during his presidency.But the president appeared exasperated with the political system that he leads, admitting that changes in the nation's gun laws "will not come from Washington, even when tragedy strikes Washington." He acknowledged that his previous effort to pass new gun laws had failed, but he did not specifically call for a new political battle, saying change would come only when Americans decide they have had enough.The question is not, he said, "whether as Americans we care in moments of tragedy. Clearly we care. Our hearts are broken again. The question is do we care enough?""It ought to be a shock to all of us, as a nation and a people," he said. "It ought to obsess us. It ought to lead to some sort of transformation."In his remarks to about 4,000 people, Mr. Obama called the Navy Yard shooting "unique," and he remembered by name each of the victims, offering small memories from family members and friends of those who died: a volunteer, a Bible study leader, a Navy architect, a grandmother, a soccer coach, a car lover."These are not statistics," he said. "They are the lives that have been taken from us."But he said the Navy Yard shootings were part of a pattern of gun violence that set America apart among advanced nations. Together, he said, they represented a kind of tragedy that has become accepted as "somehow just the way it is."Before the ceremony, Mr. Obama and the first lady, Michelle Obama, met privately with family members of the victims.It has become an all-too-familiar role for Mr. Obama, who has presided over similarly grim services for the victims of shootings in Newtown, Conn.; Tucson; Aurora, Colo.; Oak Creek, Wis.; and Fort Hood, Tex. At each event, the president has sought to find the right balance between the sadness of a nation and the anger of its citizens.But past memorial services have also served to provide Mr. Obama with the emotional power to fuel his efforts to curb gun violence. During each event, the president has urged the nation to pass laws that would keep firearms out of the hands of criminals and mentally ill people.That message reached a fever pitch after the service for the 20 children who died at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, when Mr. Obama declared that it was time for Washington to take action."In the coming weeks," he said at the Newtown memorial, "I will use whatever power this office holds to engage my fellow citizens — from law enforcement to mental health professionals to parents and educators — in an effort aimed at preventing more tragedies like this."That promise led to an effort by the administration to push through aggressive gun restrictions, including an expanded background-check system that would have closed loopholes that allowed guns to be sold without a check. But months later, that effort failed when the Senate could not pass a compromise background-check bill amid fierce opposition from the National Rifle Association and lawmakers who favor gun rights.The president on Sunday did not specifically pledge to try again, noting that "the politics are difficult, as we saw this spring." But he sought to reassure supporters of gun control measures that they would be successful, eventually, because of the grief that tragedies like the Navy Yard shooting produce."It may not happen tomorrow and it may not happen next week and it may not happen next month," he said. "But it will happen, because it's the change we need."Our tears are not enough," he added. "Our words and our prayers are not enough." If Americans want to honor the 12 men and women who died at the Navy Yard, he said, "we're going to have to change. We're going to have to change."Mr. Obama quoted from Robert F. Kennedy's speech in the hours after Martin Luther King Jr. was assassinated in 1968. In that speech, the president said, Mr. Kennedy quoted a poet who wrote that "even in our sleep, pain which cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart" until later comes "wisdom through the awful grace of God."Mr. Obama ended his remarks by urging that "in our grief, let us seek that grace. Let us find that wisdom."The United States Navy Band played somber music as the guests quietly filed in ahead of the speakers, who included Vice Adm. William Hilarides, the commander of Naval Sea Systems Command, where the shootings took place.Also speaking were Vincent Gray, the mayor of Washington; Adm. Jonathan Greenert, the chief of naval operations; Ray Mabus, the secretary of the Navy; and Chuck Hagel, the secretary of defense.Mr. Gray echoed Mr. Obama's frustration with the refusal to pass new gun laws, saying that "this time it happened within the view of our Capitol dome and I, for one, will not be silent about the fact that the time has come for action."Mr. Hagel declared that "together, we will recover."The memorial wound down with a reading of the names of the 12 people who were killed at the Navy Yard, and then a long, sad rendition of taps.
A military judge on Tuesday pushed back until January the court-martial of a decorated one-star general accused of adultery and sexually assaulting a female captain under his command.The trial of Brig. Gen. Jeffrey A. Sinclair, whose case has become a closely scrutinized test of the military's ability to police itself in matters of sexual conduct, was scheduled to begin on Monday at Fort Bragg, N.C. But officials announced the delay — till Jan. 7 — in a statement, saying the judge had ordered it "based on a motion by the defense."General Sinclair's lawyers have argued that a recent wave of attention to sexual assault in the military — President Obama and members of Congress have issued fierce condemnations of military sexual perpetrators — has made it virtually impossible for him to receive a fair trial. The defense team has filed several motions appealing earlier rulings by the court and contending that General Sinclair's case has been unfairly tainted by remarks made by the president and by "unlawful command influence" from high-level military officials.But the postponement also allows more time for negotiations between the defense team and military prosecutors, who must convince a jury that General Sinclair bullied and threatened the captain and forced her into oral sex.The couple, whose affair began in Iraq in 2009, according to defense lawyers, carried out a passionate three-year relationship that crisscrossed continents and war zones. General Sinclair's lawyers maintain that the captain — whose name is being withheld by The New York Times — made the accusations against him only after she discovered e-mails suggesting that he not only would not leave his wife for her but was having an affair with another officer."We've maintained an open line to the prosecution and remain hopeful that the Army will acknowledge General Sinclair's innocence of the most serious charges," said Richard Scheff, the lead defense lawyer. "The trial delay gives the appropriate parties more opportunity to reach a just conclusion."Under military law, any plea agreement prosecutors recommend would have to be signed off on by a commanding officer, in this case, Lt. Gen. Joseph Anderson, commander of the 18th Airborne Corps and Fort Bragg.General Sinclair — who in addition to sexual assault and adultery is charged with engaging in inappropriate banter, asking for nude photographs from other subordinate officers and other transgressions — is one of only a few generals to face court-martial in recent decades. If convicted, he could face life imprisonment. He has pleaded not guilty to all charges.From the beginning, the case has been transfixing in its soap-opera details that have been deeply embarrassing for the Army. In texts exchanged by the general and the captain, for instance, he called her "my panda"; she called him "pappa panda sexy pants."Mr. Scheff said in a recent interview that in the past, a consensual affair — the way he described the relationship — might have led to General Sinclair being quietly removed from command and allowed to retire with his military pension. That was the case in 1999, when Maj. Gen. David Hale pleaded guilty to charges stemming from an adulterous affair and was issued a reprimand, fined and allowed to retire at a reduced rank.But advocates for victims of sexual assault in the military have argued that such plea agreements have allowed sexual attacks to flourish. They have also criticized the defense team's efforts to undermine the accuser's credibility by claiming that she invented the story of forced oral sex only after she was threatened with prosecution herself."There's so much dirt that's dug up about the average victim," said Anu Bhagwati, executive director of Service Women's Action Network and a former Marine Corps captain.Ms. Bhagwati said that her organization is among those pressing for reform of the military justice system "because in the current system there's not only perceived bias but also actual bias in the sense that both the victim and accused don't really get a fair shot at justice."
A vice admiral who is second in command at the United States Strategic Command, which oversees nuclear war-fighting forces for the military, has been suspended amid an investigation into his possible involvement in illegal gambling, officials said on Saturday.The officer, Vice Adm. Timothy M. Giardina, is a highly decorated sailor with more than three decades in the Navy. The suspension occurred on Sept. 3, but was not announced publicly, said Capt. Pamela Kunze, the command's spokeswoman.Captain Kunze would not comment further on the circumstances surrounding the suspension, citing a continuing investigation by the Naval Criminal Investigative Service.The Strategic Command was first alerted about the issue in mid-July. A month earlier, Admiral Giardina became the target of an inquiry being conducted by the Iowa Division of Criminal Investigation into possible use of counterfeit gambling chips at the Horseshoe Casino in Council Bluffs, Iowa, said David Dales, the head of the Southwest division of the Iowa Division of Criminal Investigation.Mr. Dales said the criminality in question involved poker at the casino, but said he could provide no further information. The agency's investigation is still open and no state charges have been filed against Admiral Giardina, Mr. Dales said.It was not clear whether Admiral Giardina's actions compromised national security or the operations of the Strategic Command.The commander of the Strategic Command, General C. Robert Kehler, has submitted a recommendation to Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel that Admiral Giardina be reassigned, Captain Kunze said. It has not been determined what, if any, additional actions will be taken. The leadership of the Strategic Command is appointed by the president and confirmed by the Senate.The Strategic Command, based at Offutt Air Force Base near Omaha, oversees a web of military efforts including the military's space and cyberwarfare operations. It also controls the country's nuclear arsenal.Admiral Giardina, a career submarine officer, assumed his duties at the Strategic Command in December 2011. Before that, he was the deputy commander and chief of staff of the Pacific Fleet. He graduated from the Naval Academy in 1979.He was scheduled to rotate out of his position at Strategic Command later this year. In early July, President Obama appointed an Air Force general to replace Admiral Giardina.
WASHINGTON — As Congress continued to spar on Saturday over a stopgap spending measure to keep the government running, federal agencies made contingency plans for a potential shutdown.Each cabinet-level department and federal agency was required to identify essential personnel and determine which operations would continue if no deal were reached by Tuesday, the first day of the new fiscal year.Although huge parts of the federal bureaucracy could be forced to close, many government functions would continue.Senior Pentagon officials said on Friday that the more than 1.3 million active military personnel would remain on duty during a shutdown but would probably not receive their paychecks until a spending agreement was reached. The service members and civilians who stay on the job would be categorized as essential to the protection of life and property and to national security.About half of the Defense Department's approximately 800,000 civilian employees would be furloughed without pay.There is little question that troops deployed to Afghanistan would continue their missions, as would warships now off the coast of Syria to pressure President Bashar al-Assad's government to adhere to a plan to surrender its chemical weapons stockpile.Documents released on Friday by the Pentagon listed essential duties that would be carried out during a government shutdown, including recruitment, intelligence and surveillance, fire protection, counseling and other services for sexual assault victims, operations of mortuary facilities for fallen service members, and a broad range of medical care.The military is one of several departments whose employees are considered essential for national security purposes. The Department of Homeland Security, which comprises organizations like the Secret Service, Customs and Border Protection and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, would have to furlough roughly 14 percent of its employees, far lower than many other cabinet-level agencies.Nearly all of the F.B.I.'s roughly 16,000 agents and analysts at its headquarters and its 56 field offices across the country would continue to work because they are considered essential to protecting the country. "Nonessential" employees like carpenters and dock employees who unload shipments would be told to stay home.Most employees of the State Department would continue to report to work, domestically and abroad. Most overseas employees, and many of the people working in Washington to support them, would be considered essential because of their diplomatic and national security functions.Much of the State Department operates outside the normal Congressional appropriations process, meaning many bureaus and offices would remain open. Most passport offices, for example, would continue to process applications normally because the department's consular function is financed largely through fees.Although more than half of the Department of Health and Human Services would be furloughed, Medicare and Medicaid beneficiaries would continue to receive services. Retirees would continue to get checks from the Social Security Administration.The rollout of President Obama's health care law, with the first insurance marketplaces to go online starting on Tuesday, would continue because most of the money for that program was provided by the Affordable Care Act and other laws.The Food and Drug Administration would continue some vital activities, like product recalls and the inspection of imports, but would curtail many other food safety activities.National parks and their visitor centers would be closed, but other Interior Department operations would carry on. Approximately 500 Fish and Wildlife Service employees, whose salaries are paid by a permanent appropriation, would continue caring for animals at parks and hatcheries. At the United States Geological Survey, employees would continue to monitor equipment to forecast floods or detect earthquakes and volcano activity. Native Americans would continue to receive benefits payments, and the Bureau of Indian Education would operate its schools.The District of Columbia, whose budget is approved by Congress, would normally be required to send home all but its most essential employees, shuttering services like public libraries and the Department of Motor Vehicles.But in protest of Congress's inability to agree on a spending measure, Mayor Vincent C. Gray informed the Office of Management and Budget that he had deemed all district employees to be essential.While Mr. Gray's gambit seemed legally tenuous, the chairman of the City Council, Phil Mendelson, was expected to hold a vote on Tuesday on legislation that would allow the city, during a federal shutdown, to pay its employees from a contingency reserve fund.
The majesty of the setting high above the Hudson River in New York State — where George Washington set up his headquarters in 1779 — inspires. Compelling, too, is the character of the cadets at the U.S. Military Academy.Whether asking vigorous questions in social science class, displaying the precision of the Long Gray Line on parade, or cheering on the women's volleyball team — the chief cheerleaders at a game I attended were Gen. Ray Odierno, the U.S. Army chief of staff, and Lt. Gen. Robert L. Caslen Jr., the superintendent of the academy — the cadets inhabit a world imbued with the auras of Dwight D. Eisenhower, Douglas MacArthur and John Pershing.Duty, honor and country are woven into the fabric of the 211-year-old institution. These days, academic rigor and exacting discipline are leavened with a little more fun than in earlier times. (A great read on the culture is "Absolutely American" by David Lipsky, a Rolling Stone writer who spent four years following a class; he describes West Point as "the happiest complaining place on earth.")These young men and women are future leaders, just like their peers at elite universities. Yet the academy's graduates step into a world that is largely isolated from civilian society. It's the price America pays for a professional army of unrivaled quality.This was captured in a new book, "Breach of Trust" by Andrew J. Bacevich, a retired army officer and West Point graduate. It opens on Independence Day at Fenway Park, Boston's baseball stadium, where the family of a young woman serving in Afghanistan is being honored; suddenly, the daughter appears on the giant screen from halfway around the world. The crowd roars in what Mr. Bacevich calls "a masterpiece of contrived spontaneity." Then, the game is played and the young woman and the faraway war are forgotten.With an all-volunteer army, Mr. Bacevich argues, "the symbolic solidarity at a ballpark" serves as a "convenient mechanism for avoiding obligation and perhaps easing guilty consciences."Although that is better than the hostility that greeted veterans returning from Vietnam more than a generation ago, it still reflects a "cordial indifference" to the military, Mr. Bacevich writes.He isn't alone in this view. Gen. Stanley A. McChrystal, who commanded U.S. troops in Afghanistan, has worried about an army that is "unrepresentative of the population." He added, "If a nation goes to war, every town, every city needs to be at risk." Two generations ago, Gen. George C. Marshall, the most heralded U.S. military leader since George Washington, said that in contrast to the Japanese and the Germans, Americans regarded a standing army as antithetical "to the convention of government by the people." That observation remains valid, say leading politicians, particularly those with military experience."The small percentage of our population in uniform, and with other parts of our society not involved, is a profound issue," said Senator Jack Reed, a Rhode Island Democrat and alumnus of West Point who served in the 82nd Airborne Division.Senator Lindsey Graham, a South Carolina Republican who serves as a lawyer in the Air Force Reserve, said, "In a democratic society, if you don't feel some obligation of defending the country, you're creating a problem."Today's army has problems; one is sexual harassment, as pointed out by lawmakers like Senator Kirsten Gillibrand, a New York Democrat.The services are often too slow to bring about social change. Once ordered, they respond. Not much more than four decades ago, blacks and Hispanics made up a little more than 1 percent of the corps of cadets; today, they account for 18 percent. The army is adjusting to allowing gay men and lesbians to serve openly in the ranks.There is reason to be optimistic about the acceptance of women in combat and curbs on sexual harassment. West Point didn't admit women until 1976, and the student body still is only 17 percent female, up a little from a few years ago. This year, the first captain — the highest position in the cadet chain of command, once held by Pershing and MacArthur — is a woman, Cadet Lindsey Danilack.But progress on diversity doesn't address the disconnect between the military and civilian society. One consequence of this distance is that there are fewer questions and less scrutiny about going to war."If the past is prologue," argues Mr. Bacevich, "we can look forward to more needless wars."A corollary is that civilians are less familiar with the values exemplified at West Point.As a guest lecturer, one of my handlers was Maj. Renee Ramsey. She's a 2003 graduate from Buffalo, New York, and the first member of her family to go to college. She got a master's degree at Harvard University's Kennedy School of Government and is now teaching international relations at her alma mater. She spent 14 months in Afghanistan, commanding a small force near the Khyber Pass on the Pakistan border. American civilians marveled at her story. It's one they barely think about other than during those fleeting moments at ballgames.There is no easy solution. Reinstating the draft is a political nonstarter.National service, with more shared sacrifice, is a tough slog in these tight fiscal times.The West Point cadets, only a few years from high school, are deeply aware of this divide. It contributes to the uncertainty that awaits them in their military careers.Indeed, in scores of conversations, only one certainty emerged: On Dec. 14, for the first time since 2001, Army will beat Navy on the football field.
WASHINGTON — Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel made a surprise announcement on Saturday that he would reinstate almost all of the 350,000 civilian employees of the Defense Department who had been sent home when the government shut down last week.Mr. Hagel said "most DoD civilians" would be exempted from the furloughs and would return to work this week because Pentagon and Justice Department lawyers interpreted a stopgap budget measure signed into law last week by President Obama, which guaranteed pay for service members, to also apply to a larger number of civilian workers.That action came as the House, in a rare Saturday session, voted unanimously to guarantee that federal workers would receive back pay once the shutdown ended, offering a promise of relief, if not an actual rescue, to more than one million government employees either furloughed or working without pay.When the government shut down on Tuesday, about 350,000 of the Defense Department's civilian work force of approximately 800,000 was ordered to stay home; military personnel are automatically exempted from the shutdown.In a letter to the department released Saturday, Mr. Hagel said government lawyers had advised that under the Pay Our Military Act, the Defense Department could "eliminate furloughs for employees whose responsibilities contribute to the morale, well-being, capabilities and readiness of service members."The act was passed by Congress and signed by the president just before the shutdown began to make sure the military was paid even if the rest of the government was shuttered. The language from the measure is now being interpreted as requiring the work of far more Pentagon civilian employees, most of whom support the military effort at installations outside Washington."I expect us to be able to significantly reduce — but not eliminate — civilian furloughs under this process," Mr. Hagel said.Mr. Hagel warned that "many important activities remain curtailed while the shutdown goes on," and he cited disruptions across the armed services.Late Saturday, the Defense Department comptroller, Robert F. Hale, said that Mr. Hagel's order would recall Pentagon employees who work in health care, family programs, commissaries and training or maintenance.Additionally, the order will recall to work those civilian Pentagon employees whose jobs, if interrupted, would cause future problems for the military; those categories include contracting, logistics, supply and financial management.While the numbers have not been finalized, officials estimated that only 10 percent of the furloughed employees would not be recalled, including Defense Department civilian employees who work in auditing, some in legislative and public affairs, and Pentagon employees who service other government agencies.A senior Defense Department official said that Mr. Hagel had been working to reduce the number of employees furloughed as he traveled across Asia last week, and made the final decision when he returned home on Friday after learning of the Justice Department's legal advice.When the House met on Saturday, it voted 407 to 0 to approve the measure supported by Mr. Obama to guarantee back pay for furloughed government employees.The vote followed a morning debate in which lawmakers from both parties extolled government doctors and nurses saving lives, emergency relief workers braving disasters to rescue citizens, and NASA scientists exploring space. In 2011, many of those same lawmakers, swept to power on a Tea Party wave, pressed for legislation imposing a hard freeze on government salaries and held hearings on a federal work force they said was overpaid and bloated.After the vote, Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the House majority leader, criticized Mr. Obama for what he called a failure of leadership for refusing to negotiate a way out of the impasse.But he said Republican leaders would not allow a vote to reopen the government without delivering a blow to the president's health care law, with a delay in the mandate that individuals buy health insurance and a prohibition on federal subsidies for members of Congress, White House leaders and their staff members, who must buy policies on the law's new insurance exchanges."The Republican position has been and continues to be no special treatment under the law, no special treatment under Obamacare," Mr. Cantor said.The House also voted, 400 to 1, on a resolution saying military chaplains should be able to conduct religious services, despite the shutdown. Republicans accused the Obama administration of stifling religious freedom. Representative Adam Smith of Washington, the ranking Democrat on the House Armed Services, said Republicans had concocted an issue that did not exist.The lone "no" vote belonged to Representative Bill Enyart, Democrat of Illinois.The bill continues a House Republican strategy of passing a series of smaller spending measures on popular topics in an effort to pressure Democrats to reopen at least portions of the government.So far, the bills passed include ones to finance the National Institutes of Health; to reopen national parks, monuments and museums; to pay for veterans programs; and to pay inactive members of the National Guard and reservists. In the coming days, House Republicans expect to take up at least nine other small spending bills, like financing the Head Start program for low-income children, as well as the Department of Homeland Security's border protection programs.The Senate also convened on Saturday and is expected to pass the back pay measure. But the Senate is unlikely to take up any of the other House bills. Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, has said he will not negotiate with Republicans or finance the government on a piecemeal basis. The Democrats want the Republicans to end the shutdown — the first in 17 years — with a spending bill that has no strings attached.Ensuring that workers receive back pay is one of the few issues on which Mr. Obama and House Republicans agree. In a statement on Friday, the Office of Management and Budget said that the administration "strongly supports" the Federal Employee Retroactive Pay Fairness Act.The pay for government workers — which, unlike the spending sought in other Republican measures, would be retroactive — might be considered by the Senate, though no final decisions have been made.At issue is a temporary measure to keep the government operating. House Republicans have linked the measure to efforts to delay or defund the president's signature health care legislation. Mr. Obama and Senate Democrats have refused to negotiate on the issue, demanding that the House vote on a continuing resolution without attachments.
LAKEWOOD, Wash. — The Pentagon's announcement that thousands of civilian Defense Department employees would soon return to work, even as the federal government shutdown continued, was welcome news to this city, which generations ago hitched its star to the military. But the anxiety remains, as do the wounds already inflicted on lives and businesses, in some cases by months of spending cuts even before the shutdown began.About 60,000 active-duty and civilian workers are stationed just across the interstate from Lakewood, at Joint Base Lewis-McChord, about an hour south of Seattle. About 4,500 of those workers, many of them residents or customers, were furloughed. Thousands of others have been holding their breath, uncertain when they might be paid, even as they continue working."It's going to help, to some degree," Gov. Jay Inslee said at a news conference in Seattle on Sunday, talking about the prospect of defense workers returning to the job.Such cautious, if not lukewarm, enthusiasm was shared by Casey Ingels, the chief executive of Tactical Tailor, a military supply contractor in Lakewood, who appeared at Mr. Inslee's side."We have zero predictability," said Mr. Ingels, whose company makes specialty clothing for soldiers and has laid off about two-thirds of its work force, about 100 people, over the last year. The disruption, he said, was a result of the earlier, automatic federal spending cuts known as sequestration, now compounded by the uncertainties and wrinkles of the shutdown.But the biggest continuing threat, Lakewood business owners and city and state officials said, is psychology. When things look uncertain — not just in Congress, but on the Lewis-McChord base, with conflicting signals and confusion about the rules of the shutdown — wallets tend to slam closed."No more frills," said Naani King, 37, a registered nurse who works on the base at Madigan Army Medical Center. She and her husband, Robert, 40, also a nurse, are considered essential personnel, and so continued to report for work last week.But they were so fearful that their economic lives could unravel if the stalemate dragged on — or that the deferred pay they had been promised might not materialize by the time bills were due — that Ms. King took $20,000 out of her retirement account late last month to create a cash cushion, then battened down the hatches."It afforded us the wiggle room," she said. "I don't like to admit that we had to do this. But I'm not worried now that I'm not going to make our mortgage."Christine Curren, co-owner of the Moon Rise Cafe near Lakewood's big shopping complex, the Towne Center, said the uncertainty had her second-guessing herself about causes and consequences. Last Thursday, for example — normally a strong day for breakfast, coffee and smoothies at the restaurant she runs with her daughter — was strangely slow. Was it the weather? The shutdown? Something else?It certainly did not help that her customers were nervous about the shutdown. "When they get nervous, I get scared," she said.Some economists have warned that the shutdown could set back the nation's halting recovery from the recession. But much of Pierce County, here in the Lewis-McChord orbit, never had a robust recovery to begin with. The county had one of the highest housing foreclosure rates in the state during the recession, and it was slow to recover its previous job totals, according to state figures. It is second only to King County, home of Seattle, in the number of current and retired federal workers, according to a state report released last year. In the past, that created a base of stability.But the economic disruption caused by sequestration, residents and business owners said, also cut a wide and painful swath through pocket books and businesses, leaving people like Kaiya Taylor wounded even before the shutdown began.Along with thousands of other workers here, Ms. Taylor, a 32-year-old medical support assistant at Lewis-McChord, was hit on July 1 with a one-day-a-week unpaid furlough as a result of the sequestration cuts. That put her shaky household finances over the edge, she said, and she was unable to make the $370 monthly payments on her 2003 Ford Escape. Last month, just before the shutdown, the vehicle was repossessed.Mr. Inslee said at his news conference in Seattle on Sunday that, despite the Defense Department's announcement on Saturday that it would call back almost all of its 350,000 civilian employees, the Washington National Guard would continue to struggle with personnel cuts as a result of the shutdown. A big National Guard training weekend that would have brought carloads of people from around the state through Lakewood last Friday was also canceled, so those citizen soldiers did not stop to buy gas or energy bars or anything else — another bit of lost economic life that will never be counted.A veterans' employment specialist at the state Employment Security Department, Nick Towne, who also spoke at the news conference, said he expected to be furloughed this week."I have veterans ready to work, I have employees ready to hire, and I can't get to them," he said.Ms. King, the nurse at Lewis-McChord, said in a telephone interview on Sunday that the $20,000 check from her savings had arrived in the mail the day before, but that the lock was still on her family's spending."I don't really trust what they're going to do or say," she said, referring to the promise by Congress that federal workers will receive back pay. "Until I get that paycheck in my hot little hands, we're going to play it safe. We've got too much to lose."
WASHINGTON — The families of four soldiers killed in Afghanistan last weekend will not receive death benefits or the money to pay for their funerals because of the government shutdown.The bodies of Sgt. Patrick C. Hawkins, 25; Pfc. Cody J. Patterson, 24; Sgt. Joseph M. Peters, 24; and First Lt. Jennifer M. Moreno, 25, will arrive at Dover Air Force Base in Delaware on Wednesday. The four soldiers were killed Sunday in the Zhari district of Kandahar Province when enemy forces attacked their unit with explosives.But if their families want to meet the plane, they will have to pay their own way to Delaware.Under the shutdown, Carl Woog, a Defense Department spokesman, said on Tuesday, "the Department of Defense does not currently have the authority to pay death gratuities and other key benefits for the survivors of service members killed in action."The benefits include $100,000 to each family; a 12-month basic allowance for housing, usually given in a lump sum to survivors commensurate with the rank of the service member; and burial benefits. The benefits are also being withheld from the family of Lance Cpl. Jeremiah Collins Jr., 19, of the Marines, whose death on Saturday in Helmand Province is being investigated by the Pentagon.New hardships caused by the shutdown seem to emerge every day as the standoff between President Obama and Congressional Republicans entered its second week. But the denial of benefits to the families of fallen soldiers — however temporary — led to an unusual burst of outrage.Senators took the floor to express their anger. In the House, members scrambled to write a bill to remedy the problem."It's an unbearable loss," Senator Harry Reid, Democrat of Nevada, the majority leader, said on the Senate floor of the soldiers' families. "But now they're being denied death benefits because of this senseless shutdown. It's shameful and embarrassing."There are no words to describe this situation," he said.Pentagon military and civilian personnel have largely escaped furloughs through legislation signed by President Obama and on orders from the defense secretary. But the death benefits are not covered by either move.Last week, Congress quickly passed the Pay Our Military Act to ensure that active-duty soldiers and civilian support staff members were paid for their work. Over the weekend, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said the Pentagon concluded that most of its 400,000 civilian employees were covered by the bill.Some House Republicans have suggested, without citing specific language in the bill, that it also covered death benefits. "The intent of Congress was to permit D.O.D. to honor all payment and allowances to service members," Representative Duncan Hunter, Republican of California, said in a letter to Mr. Hagel."The department's decision to not make these payments is a matter of choice," he added. "And until a correction is made to the law, it is up to you to make the appropriate judgment based on a more correct interpretation."The House Appropriations Committee is moving to get a bill to the floor to reinstate the benefits as early as Wednesday."Frankly, I think it's disgraceful that they're withholding these benefits," Speaker John A. Boehner said in a brief news conference Tuesday afternoon. "But again tomorrow, the House is going to act specifically on this and I hope the president will sign it."The Pentagon strongly denied that the current legislation allowed for benefits to be paid without further Congressional action."The fact that the House is developing new legislation on this matter shows Congress fully understands that D.O.D. does not have the legal authority to provide these death benefits," a senior military official said. "Secretary Hagel is outraged and disgusted by this situation, but the law is clear."Such legislation is likely to have strong support in both the House and Senate. "We ought to sit down and work it out," said Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona.After Mr. Reid spoke, Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, and one of the architects of the shutdown, came to the Senate floor to say, "All of us weep for those servicemen and women who have lost their lives in defense of our great nation, and I would note that this Senate can right now today move to correct the problem."Senator Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, announced Tuesday that he had worked with Ken Fisher, the chief executive of Fisher House Foundation, a service group for veterans, to give families an advance grant to cover flights, hotels and other incidental costs for family members to attend funerals until the government can make reimbursements."After losing a loved one in service to our nation, these families should not have to endure more pain as the result of political squabbling," Mr. Fisher said in a statement.
WASHINGTON — Pentagon officials said Wednesday that they would contract with a charity group, the Fisher House Foundation, to restore death benefits to families of service members killed in action, including a $100,000 payment, that have been stopped by the government shutdown. The officials said the Pentagon would reimburse the group after the shutdown ended.But just before the Pentagon's announcement, the House voted unanimously to restore the benefits, a swift action reflecting the public outrage about this particular effect of the shutdown. On Wednesday, the remains of four soldiers killed over the weekend in Afghanistan were returned to families who had been initially told that the government could not pay for their death benefits or their funerals."How dare we not provide these grieving families with the necessary support in their time of need?" Representative Sanford D. Bishop, Democrat of Georgia, asked on the House floor.Although Pentagon officials insisted on Tuesday that they could not do anything about restoring death benefits without Congressional approval, their agreement with Fisher House on Wednesday suggested that the officials had changed their minds.The Senate will not take up the House bill now that the Defense Department has acted.In addition to a $100,000 payment to each family, the death benefits include payment for burial and a 12-month basic allowance for housing, usually given in a lump sum to survivors commensurate with the rank of the service member.The Pentagon "has determined that we can enter into a contract with the Fisher House Foundation to provide these benefits," Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said Wednesday in a statement. He traveled to Dover Air Force Base, Del., for the return of the remains of the soldiers recently killed in Afghanistan and to meet with their families.Death benefits had been initially withheld from, among others, the family of Lance Cpl. Jeremiah Collins Jr., 19, of the Marines, who died in Helmand Province in Afghanistan on Saturday.Fisher House provides military families with housing near hospitals, so they can be near sick or injured service members during a stay. Although the Pentagon could not solicit the group directly for what is essentially a loan, Senator Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, brokered the arrangement.Also on Wednesday, Eric K. Shinseki, the secretary of veterans affairs, told a House committee that $6 billion in disability compensation, pension and education payments to hundreds of thousands of veterans would be halted if the shutdown continued into late October. On Tuesday, thousands of workers with the veterans agency were put on furlough."Let me just say unequivocally that all the effects are negative, " Mr. Shinseki said of a protracted shutdown. Pointing out that some veterans who work for the V.A. would lose both their income and benefits should the shutdown continue, he said, "I have the responsibility of keeping them from becoming homeless."Although the Committee on Veterans Affairs tends to be less partisan than others, the us-against-them tenor of the continuing fight between Congress and the White House bled into the hearing.Representative Jeff Miller, Republican of Florida and chairman of the committee, said he had been frustrated in efforts to get information about the effect of the shutdown, including whether veterans would be able to continue getting counseling for post-traumatic stress disorder. (They will.)After commenting that the House had passed a bill to fund veterans' programs that the Senate had yet to take up, Representative Tim Huelskamp, Republican of Kansas, asked Mr. Shinseki, "Do you think Harry Reid doesn't like the V.A. or our veterans?" Mr. Reid is the Senate majority leader.Mr. Shinseki, looking baffled, replied: "I think he highly values veterans. As to why Congress is unable to do its business, I will leave to the members to discuss."Senate Democrats remain opposed to the House's piecemeal bills to reopen selective parts of the government."Ever since the government shut down nine days ago, the House has tried to act like the government isn't shut down," said Senator Jon Tester, Democrat of Montana.
WASHINGTON — Two former Naval Academy football players accused of sexually assaulting a female midshipman at an off-campus party will face court-martial proceedings, the latest in a string of high-profile cases in the military that are drawing increased scrutiny from the Pentagon and Congress.The case stems from a "yoga and toga" party last year near the academy in Annapolis, Md., where the woman, then a 20-year-old second-year student, arrived intoxicated and later had sex with some of the players. In grueling testimony last month during a military hearing at the Washington Navy Yard, she said she had no memory of parts of the evening.The day after the party, the woman testified, she learned via social media of the encounters with three players, who were subsequently charged with sexually assaulting her and making false statements. The investigation was stymied in part by the woman's initial refusal to cooperate, academy officials said.The superintendent of the academy, Vice Adm. Michael H. Miller, following an initial hearing known as an Article 32 hearing, referred two midshipmen, Eric Graham and Joshua Tate, to general court-martial. Mr. Graham is charged with abusive sexual contact and Mr. Tate with aggravated sexual assault. Both are charged with making false official statements. Admiral Miller did not refer charges against another midshipman, Tra'ves Bush, the third player accused.Admiral Miller, who is what the military calls the "convening authority" in the case, made the highly unusual choice of pressing for courts-martial against the advice of the investigating officer, who oversaw the hearing and predicted the prosecution would fail to convict the three men.Admiral Miller determined that there were not reasonable grounds for the charges against Mr. Bush, but that "reasonable grounds did exist to believe that the offenses were committed by Midshipman Graham and Midshipman Tate," said John Schofield, a spokesman for the academy.He added: "The convening authority decision is not based on the probability of a successful prosecution. Rather, it is the convening authority's responsibility to independently evaluate evidence and determine if reasonable grounds exist that a crime has been committed by the accused."Andrew Weinstein, the lawyer for Mr. Bush, said he felt gratified. "Midshipman Bush is a young man who has committed his life to the protection of our country," Mr. Weinstein wrote in an e-mailed statement, "and with these criminal charges now behind him, he looks forward to continuing his loyal and devoted service."Chip Herrington, the lawyer for Mr. Graham, said his client was "not guilty and the allegations of sex abuse against him are completely false."Pointing to the recommendation of the hearing investigator, Mr. Herrington said: "Obviously, we are disappointed with Vice Admiral Miller's rejection of the recommendation of his own investigating officer. However, we believe we have the truth on our side."During the Article 32 hearing, the woman was aggressively grilled about her sexual habits, generating public outrage about the proceedings, which help determine whether cases are sent to court-martial. Article 32 hearings permit questions not allowed in civilian courts.Susan Burke, the woman's lawyer, said, "We're pleased that the two men have been court-martialed," although she was unhappy that one was not. "Despite the abusive Article 32 process," Ms. Burke said, "the victim is strong and remains willing to testify at trial."Defense lawyers in the case may argue that the case be thrown out because of so-called unlawful command influence exercised by President Obama, who has called for sex offenders in the military to be punished severely. Mr. Obama, as commander in chief of the armed forces, is considered the most powerful person to wield such influence.Several sexual assault cases across branches of the military have been thrown out or curtailed on such grounds. "We have no doubt that the president's comments have had an influence with regard to the public pressure placed on Vice Admiral Miller," Mr. Herrington said.The problem of sexual assault in the military has increasingly alarmed Congress, which is considering changes to the system, including removing prosecutorial powers from commanders and perhaps re-examining the entire Article 32 process."Admiral Miller's action does nothing to foster public confidence in the administration of justice in the armed forces," said Eugene R. Fidell, who teaches military justice at Yale Law School. "His referral of charges against two individuals to a general court-martial in no way blunts the force of the compelling arguments for fundamental reform of the Article 32 process and the transfer of the charging power from commanders to military prosecutors entirely independent of the chain of command."
WASHINGTON — Leon E. Panetta , who has been in charge of the federal budget , intelligence-gathering and then defense for two Democratic presidents, on Monday said the fiscal impasse is hurting all three areas.The indiscriminate, across-the-board spending cuts known as sequestration are also doing "serious damage to our national defense, particularly our readiness," said Mr. Panetta, who was secretary of defense under President Obama from mid-2011 until he left the administration this year. He cited the squadrons that have been grounded, the carrier groups that are inactive and the training rotations that have been canceled, among other impacts.Mr. Panetta, who was director of the Central Intelligence Agency for the first two and a half years of the Obama administration, said the government shutdown, which began Oct. 1, had forced furloughs for 70 percent of the intelligence agencies' staffs."Who the hell came up with that?" he said at a meeting with reporters hosted by The Wall Street Journal. "You take 70 percent of our intelligence people and furlough them, you're seriously damaging our ability to gain the kind of intelligence that we need to gain in order to be able to know what's going on in the world."Listing a number of international hot spots, Mr. Panetta said that "at the very moment when we're confronting those dangers," the standoff between the White House and the Republican-controlled House of Representatives — over financing and reopening the government and increasing the nation's borrowing authority — is weakening the nation's defenses. Republicans refuse to resolve either matter until Mr. Obama makes concessions on his health care law and other spending and tax issues."This is not necessary. This isn't the result of a crisis; it's not the result of a war. It's not the result of something tragic that's happened in this country. It's not the result of a natural disaster. This is all self-inflicted," Mr. Panetta said. "That's the worst part of what we're dealing with. This is self-inflicted harm on the United States and on the people of this country. And that's why this is so tragic."Mr. Panetta, who began his Washington career nearly a half-century ago as an aide to a Republican senator and later was a Democratic congressman from California, laid blame on both parties, and on the president, but mostly on Republicans. As a former chairman of the House Budget Committee and then as President Bill Clinton's budget director and chief of staff, Mr. Panetta participated in a string of budget summit meetings from the late 1980s through the 1990s.While he praised Mr. Obama's intelligence and policy instincts, Mr. Panetta added his voice to those who criticize the president for not reaching out enough to Congressional Republicans. "You have to engage in the process," he said. "This is a town where it's not enough to feel you have the right answers — you've got to roll up your sleeves and you've got to really engage, engage in the process."At the same time, Mr. Panetta supported Mr. Obama's strategy to not negotiate with Republicans on budget issues until they agree to reopen the government and to raise the debt limit to avert default. The deadline is Thursday.The president, he said, "is correct to make sure that we do not continue a process of using a debt limit as kind of a nuclear weapon aimed at our own economy as a way for people to get their way."Mr. Panetta also said that if Republicans would not agree to consider higher tax revenues as part of a long-term deficit-reduction deal, they could not expect Democrats to negotiate reductions in Medicare and other benefit programs that Republicans want."If they aren't willing to put everything on the table, then we really are going to have a breakdown in terms of the ability to govern the country. Everything has to be on the table — that's the nature of governing this country," Mr. Panetta said.On matters of foreign policy, Mr. Panetta said that he was skeptical of negotiations with Iran, over its nuclear program, and Syria, about its chemical arsenal.Iran's new president, Hassan Rouhani, has signaled openness to a deal, but Mr. Panetta noted, as many have, that policy is actually set by Iran's supreme leader, Ayatollah Ali Khamenei. And, he said, "the intelligence that we always had on the supreme leader in the last few years was that he was very anti-American and very concerned about establishing any kind of relationship with the United States."
COOKEVILLE, Tenn. — When Sarah Short arrived at Tennessee Technological University this summer, she had mapped out her four years of undergraduate study and well beyond: an affordable nursing degree and a commission as an Army officer.But months into her first semester, Ms. Short's plans changed after the Army announced it would close Tennessee Tech's 63-year-old Reserve Officers Training Corps program in 2015, two years before Ms. Short expected to finish her degree."This is the only place I've ever wanted to go," Ms. Short, 18, a first-generation college student from Murfreesboro, said last week. "It's perfect for me — was perfect."The abrupt news, delivered to Ms. Short and scores of other cadets here days into the government shutdown, was not tied to a partisan standoff in Washington. Instead, it was part of an Army effort to redirect its resources and money to areas where it wants to broaden its recruiting, including major cities.To underwrite the transformation, the Army chose to close R.O.T.C. programs at 13 universities, more than half of them in the South. Tennessee alone will lose R.O.T.C. offerings at three of its public universities, the most of any state.The Army selected the universities after a review found that the programs were typically yielding fewer than 15 commissioned officers annually, although the military acknowledged it granted exceptions to dozens of schools because they met other standards.The Army Cadet Command, which oversees R.O.T.C. and its approximately 33,000 aspiring soldiers, said that by shuttering the 13 lagging programs, it will be able to shift resources to 56 other markets, including Los Angeles, New York and Chicago. In many instances, existing programs will grow.Maj. Gen. Jefforey A. Smith, the commander of the Cadet Command, said the move was not part of a major shift from rural settings to urban ones. Still, he added: "It makes sense that we would move toward where the population is where we think we have a recruiting population to go after."The changes will come amid a push by the Army to diversify its officer corps, a large portion of which comes from the R.O.T.C. In 2011, about 28 percent of active duty Army officers were minorities, up from 23 percent a decade earlier.The Army, which revived R.O.T.C. at some universities, including several in the Ivy League, in recent years, has not implemented a widespread closure plan since 1998."A lot of things have changed in the United States of America since 1998," General Smith said. "The demographics of the country have clearly shifted."Beth J. Asch, a senior economist at the RAND Corporation who studies military recruiting, said the Cadet Command's R.O.T.C. overhaul appeared prudent given the federal government's austerity drive."They certainly want to put these programs where they think they're going to be able to feed the system. R.O.T.C. is critical for the Army, so it's got to be productive," Dr. Asch said. She said that people who can meet the Army's rigorous standards for physical fitness and education "tend not to be in rural areas and, historically, the South." She noted weight issues as one current concern.But at many of the 13 universities that will see their programs wind down in the coming years, administrators see the Army's ruling differently.On the campus of Tennessee Tech, a university of about 11,000 students between Nashville and Knoxville, the Army's decision has drawn sharp criticism as one that could imperil the educational futures of students from rural communities."The truth is a lot of the kids in this area just won't have the opportunity," said Philip B. Oldham, the university president. "Their connections to their home, to their family are just a little too strong, so they just won't have the chance."Administrators at other universities are voicing similar concerns, and some are pushing back aggressively against the Army's plans.At the behest of Arkansas State University, which will lose R.O.T.C. at its flagship campus but not at a satellite institution, three members of Congress demanded answers from Pentagon officials this month during an hourlong conference call.The universities, which have questioned the military's methodologies for evaluating their programs, have also complained that the Army did not offer them a chance to defend their records.General Smith said, though, that each school "was applied against a set of criteria." He does not expect the decisions to be reversed.But while the educators seek intervention from Capitol Hill and other quarters, some students are left with stark choices. Although the juniors and seniors who are currently enrolled in R.O.T.C. at the 13 universities will be able to finish their degrees by the time the programs conclude, freshmen and sophomores will have to decide whether they want to alter — and perhaps abandon — their Army plans or transfer to another school.Ms. Short decided against leaving Tennessee Tech. She now plans to enter the military through an Army program for nurses.But Caleb Anderson, 19, a sophomore, immediately chose to move elsewhere. He began contacting other colleges within 15 minutes of learning of the closure at Tennessee Tech."When you're faced with trials like this, you just have to adapt and overcome," Mr. Anderson said. "I've always wanted to serve my people and my country."Mr. Anderson intends to enroll at the University of Tennessee at Chattanooga, an institution that had its R.O.T.C. program reinstated in 2007 after the Army closed it in the 1990s.Backers of the endangered programs say the Army needs a different approach to expanding elsewhere."I don't believe in shifting, just to get more people of different backgrounds, at the expense of these R.O.T.C. programs that are well-established and are producing outstanding officers," said Carl W. Stiner, a retired four-star general who is an alumnus of the program at Tennessee Tech. "You will deny people who want to be commissioned through the R.O.T.C. program and serve their country."
WASHINGTON — The Defense Department's Early Bird news service — which drove debates at the Pentagon, and its senior leaders to frustration, with its compilation of articles on military operations, budget politics and weapons programs — was declared dead on Friday.The three dozen or so news and opinion articles that made the Early Bird's daily cut became must-reads at first light for Pentagon civilian employees and military personnel, as well as for members of the executive branch, Congress, the defense industry, research groups, academia and the news media.It had enormous clout, with defense secretaries known to thunder at subordinates after reading an unexpected morning dispatch.Policy makers on the rise and commanders in the field read it with all the interest of old-school Kremlinologists poring over Pravda for clues to who was up and who was down and what prized weapons programs might face budget cuts or be saved.But it also served as a hometown paper of sorts for the government's biggest bureaucracy and largest employer, with readers deployed around the world. In all, the Early Bird reached an estimated 1.5 million readers who saw it online or had it delivered by email.There were many causes of death, said Col. Steven H. Warren, the director of Defense Press Operations, who made the decision to end the Early Bird.Because the Internet has personalized news aggregation services, a centralized Pentagon-financed effort was seen as an anachronism — especially one that was delivered only once a day in an era of 24-hour news, he said.News media outlets also raised legitimate concerns about copyright issues, because the Early Bird republished articles without providing web links to the originals, robbing news organizations of hundreds of thousands of potential online hits at a time of intense competition for readers.And it was undeniable that the Early Bird had "become the tail that wagged the dog," Colonel Warren said."A small story that lands in the Bird can have a big impact, since we provided a vastly enlarged readership for some small, niche news outlets," he said. "And placement of stories by mainstream media seemed to drive the daily agenda in ways that never were intended."Colonel Warren said he had spent months developing plans to redesign and reorganize the Early Bird. Then the government shutdown resulted in furloughs for the two civilian Pentagon employees who showed up each night at 10:30 to read news articles and copy-and-paste them into the Early Bird for delivery before dawn.During the shutdown, Colonel Warren's staff prepared a scaled-down daily news summary delivered to a small circle of Pentagon leaders. When the government reopened, Colonel Warren did not immediately give the order to restart publishing of the Early Bird.He waited and he watched. And he heard, receiving phone calls from Capitol Hill and even from former defense secretaries asking when the Early Bird would be back in service.On Friday morning, after a month without the Early Bird, Colonel Warren decided to officially shut it down.He is now pruning the Bird's distribution list, which had grown into a tangled jungle that reached far beyond the intended audience. He plans to return the news compilation service to its roots of providing articles to a group of Pentagon and military leaders who can legitimately claim privilege to a taxpayer-financed news aggregation effort.The new compilation, the Morning News of Note, will have about 300 readers, he said.Even so, Colonel Warren acknowledged a bureaucratic reality: that staff members may ask their bosses for copies that they will then pass along — meaning that, as with the Early Bird, distribution of the Morning News of Note will grow beyond its small base of readers.The Early Bird could trace its beginnings to 1948, when postwar news-clipping services became common across the military. They were consolidated in the 1960s in what became known as the Yellow Bird: the top page was canary yellow, designed to stand out on desks piled with papers. It became an official effort of the Defense Department's public affairs office in 1989.In the days of hard-copy publication, junior staff members would be sent to grab editions for their bosses. The arrival of fax machines provided a global reach, which grew longer with the Internet.Colonel Warren is acutely aware that his decision will be criticized among the Early Bird's vast readership, even though he will also get credit for killing off a Pentagon media product that has often troubled senior officials.Aides to Donald H. Rumsfeld, when he was defense secretary, used the Early Bird to poke back at reporters who were poking the department. Temporarily, at least, an order went out to top the first page with all of the published corrections and editor's notes from news organizations acknowledging errors in articles that had appeared in the Early Bird."I suppose my biggest frustration with the Bird was that it lacked breadth," said Lawrence Di Rita, who served as spokesman and chief of staff for Mr. Rumsfeld."Instead of providing a representative range of coverage on a broad set of issues, it tended to amplify the impact of a small number of topics," he said. "We'd get three or four pieces from the major dailies or wires on one or two news-of-the-day topics, but often little or nothing on service-specific issues that probably had as much or more impact on day-to-day activity across the force as the four or five articles about some subcommittee hearing in Washington."In recent years, a number of news media outlets have started their own news compilation and analysis services on national security issues. And Navy officials report that, in the absence of the Early Bird, they have received a substantial number of requests for their news-clipping service.
WASHINGTON — A sweeping Pentagon policy bill that would make significant changes to how the military deals with sexual assault has turned into a battle between two powerful and determined Democrats who have offered competing proposals.The two, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand of New York and Senator Claire McCaskill of Missouri, are lobbying fellow lawmakers on the Senate floor — sometimes when there is no way to gracefully escape — papering senators' offices with letters from victims, and nudging them for meetings to press their cases."This one is near the top," Senator Max Baucus, Democrat of Montana, said when asked to assess the intensity of the in-house campaigns on the legislation, which is scheduled to go before the Senate soon. "I would say they both have very strong opinions."At issue is how much power military commanders would maintain in sexual assault cases. For many Democrats, the conflict has created an uncomfortable division between the Senate's women, whose ranks and power have increased significantly since 2012. The choice is particularly difficult for Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, who has feared alienating his female members on legislative issues and is fond of both Ms. Gillibrand and Ms. McCaskill.Ms. Gillibrand's measure, which is opposed by top Pentagon leaders, would take sexual assault cases outside the military chain of command and give military prosecutors, rather than accusers' commanders, the power to decide which cases to try.The measure Ms. McCaskill is pushing, which is supported by the Pentagon and was written in part by Senator Carl Levin, the Michigan Democrat who is the chairman of the Armed Services Committee, would not go as far. The McCaskill approach would strip commanders of their ability to overturn jury verdicts and mandate dishonorable discharge or dismissal for anyone convicted of sexual assault. But it would keep control of court-martial proceedings within the chain of command.The debate has forced members of both parties to ponder a tough choice between measures that pit the desires of Mr. Levin and top military leaders against those of victims' groups pushing for changes because of the high numbers of military assaults.Ms. Gillibrand, who has handed out scores of copies of a documentary on sexual assault in the military, keeps a huge whiteboard in her office listing all the senators' names, ranked by the probability of their support (five is a yes), and has a little celebration with each positive update. On Thursday, she requested a meeting on the issue with Senator Cory A. Booker, Democrat of New Jersey, less than an hour after he was sworn in.Ms. McCaskill has spent hundreds of hours meeting with military and civilian prosecutors, sexual assault victims and commanders. A former prosecutor, she has pored over thousands of pages of trial transcripts, all to inform her better as she meets with her colleagues.Many male senators in both parties appear extremely reluctant to take a position on such an emotionally charged and complex legal issue. "I come down on the side that is against sexual assault," Senator John Barrasso, Republican of Wyoming, said as he raced away from a reporter.Congress began scrutinizing sexual assault in the military after a recent series of highly publicized cases, including one at the Naval Academy, and after the release of new data from the Pentagon on the issue. On Sept. 30, the end of the fiscal year, about 1,600 sexual assault cases in the military were either awaiting action from commanders or the completion of a criminal investigation.Ms. Gillibrand's measure failed to pass the Armed Services Committee, but Mr. Reid has said he will allow her to offer it as an amendment to the military spending bill. This has left her to scramble for 59 allies. She has 46 so far, although it remains an uphill battle.The measure Ms. McCaskill is pushing passed the Armed Services Committee in June.
WASHINGTON — Reports of sexual assault in the military increased sharply during the last fiscal year, new Pentagon figures showed Wednesday, just weeks before a defense bill with provisions to tackle the problem is expected to reach the Senate floor.There were 3,553 sexual assault complaints reported to the Defense Department in the first three quarters of the fiscal year, from October 2012 through June, a nearly 50 percent increase over the same period a year earlier. Defense Department officials said the numbers had continued to rise.The numbers included sexual assaults by civilians on service members and by service members on civilians. Sexual assault was defined in the report as rape, sodomy and other unwanted sexual contact, including touching of private body parts. It did not include sexual harassment, which is handled by another office in the military.Military officials cast the increase of reported complaints in positive terms and said it showed an increased willingness among victims of assault to come forward. But the numbers are also the latest in a series of developments underscoring the problem of sexual assault in the military, which has vexed Pentagon officials and drawn fire from Congress and the White House."More reports mean more victims are getting the necessary health care," said Maj. Gen. Gary S. Patton, the director of the Department of Defense Sexual Assault Prevention and Response Office. "More reports means a bridge to more cases being investigated by law enforcement and more offenders being held accountable."Each year the department reports the number of assault claims, which lag behind a separate survey on sexual assault taken every other year among 1.4 million active-duty service members. Last summer that survey found that about 26,000 men and women in the military were sexually assaulted in 2011, up from 19,000 in 2010.The release of the new data comes at a time when Congress is considering changes to the military justice system that would give sexual assault victims more resources and possibly reduce the power of military commanders to reverse the convictions of offenders.On Thursday and Friday a congressional panel will hold public hearings designed to assess the progress of the military in reducing the problem of sexual assault. So far the Pentagon is offering military commanders more education on preventing such assaults, expanding an Air Force program designed to provide legal counsel directly to victims and increasing the accountability for leaders across the chain of command.In a twist, the Pentagon found that a substantial number of the reported cases of sexual assault — something less than 10 percent — occurred before the victim entered the military."Folks have heard about the services and programs that we have for victims, and they are walking in the door to get those services," General Patton said. "This is a strong indicator that people have heard our message and believe we are going to take care of them."The number of cases of sexual assault that occurred before a victim joined the military were included in the 3,553 complaints.The defense bill that is set to come to the Senate floor this month includes various changes to the military justice system. Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, is to offer an amendment that would take sexual assault cases outside the military chain of command and give military prosecutors, rather than accusers' commanders, the power to decide which cases to try. Pentagon leaders are strongly opposed to Ms. Gillibrand's amendment.Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, is pushing legislation that does not go as far. Supported by the Pentagon and Senator Carl Levin, the Michigan Democrat who is chairman of the Armed Services Committee, the measure would strip commanders of their ability to overturn jury verdicts and mandate dishonorable discharge or dismissal for anyone convicted of sexual assault. But it would keep control of court-martial proceedings within the chain of command.Another measure offered this week by Senator Barbara Boxer, Democrat of California, would exempt victims of sexual assault from having to testify at what the military calls Article 32 pretrial hearings, which can include cross-examinations of victim that are so intense they frighten many victims from coming forward.On Wednesday, Ms. Gillibrand made a broad push in an effort to drum up 60 votes in support of her measure."There is no accountability," she said during a news conference on Capitol Hill. "Because the trust that any justice will be served has been irreparably broken under the current system, where commanders hold all the cards over whether a case moves forward for prosecution."Ben Klay, a former Marine, choked up as he described the ordeal of his wife, Ariana Klay, a former Marine officer who was sexually assaulted."I'm lucky I married someone so strong," he said, as Ms. Gillibrand and Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, appeared to cry. "Even though she still suffers."There remains little support for Ms. Gillibrand's bill within the Pentagon."We want commanders more involved in solving this problem of sexual assault in the military, not less involved," General Patton said.
ATLANTA — The Army told 13 universities this week that it would step back from a plan to shutter their Reserve Officers' Training Corps programs, disrupting a strategy that had been promoted as an effort to refocus the military's recruiting amid demographic shifts.In a document sent to members of Congress on Wednesday evening, the Army said it had "suspended the closure" of the programs and had placed them on "probationary status."Lt. Col. Paul R. Haverstick, a spokesman for the Army Cadet Command, said in a statement that the military was "working to define the parameters of that status."The decision came five weeks after the Cadet Command stunned the universities, most of them in the South and outside major metropolitan areas, when it announced that it would close their R.O.T.C. programs in 2015, a change that would have forced some cadets to alter their plans for higher education and military service.The Army said it selected the programs for closing because they were typically commissioning fewer than 15 officers a year. The Army has not shut down any R.O.T.C. programs since 1998, and it said it wanted to focus its resources on 56 other markets, including major cities like New York and Chicago, in response to the nation's new demographic landscape.But many of the universities, often backed by their congressional delegations and influential alumni, waged spirited campaigns to keep their programs and contended that the Army's plan would eliminate academic and career opportunities for students from rural areas. Frustrated by what he said was a lack of transparency by the Army about the decisions, Senator Mark Pryor, Democrat of Arkansas, blocked a nomination for a senior Pentagon job.The Army maintained, though, that its decisions were final and were tied to established guidelines. Maj. Gen. Jefforey A. Smith, the commander of Cadet Command, said in October that he was unaware of a formal appeals process.Although the new approach is a reprieve for the 13 universities, officials acknowledged that the programs could still be shuttered."We appreciate the fact that the Army was willing to review the decision it had made," said Tim Hudson, the chancellor of Arkansas State University, which had been threatened with a shutdown of its 77-year-old R.O.T.C. program. "We intend to work hard. We intend to improve what we're doing."Dr. Hudson also said that since the Army's announcement on Oct. 2, Arkansas State had forged a stronger relationship with military officials "that will allow us to understand better their expectations."Researchers said external pressures had long played into the Defense Department's choices about the fates of R.O.T.C. programs, which faced especially significant reductions after the end of the Cold War."It did not surprise me all that much that there would be considerable pushback," said Arthur T. Coumbe, a historian at the United States Military Academy who has studied R.O.T.C. closings. "You really have to have a clear and overwhelming political consensus for these things to go off without a hitch."
WASHINGTON — President Obama pledged Monday that Americans "will never forget" the sacrifices made by the country's military veterans, and promised that his administration would continue pushing for money to support the men and women home from the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.Speaking at Arlington National Cemetery on Veterans Day after placing a wreath at the Tomb of the Unknowns, Mr. Obama declared that the nation's most recent "chapter of war is coming to an end." But he said that Americans must not let the service of the military fade from memory."By this time next year, the transition to Afghan-led security will be nearly complete," he said. "The longest war in American history will end."But he said that "there's a risk that the devoted service of our veterans could fade from the forefront of our minds," and added that "our time of service to our newest veterans has just begun."In his first Veterans Day remarks as president in 2009, Mr. Obama faced a very different situation in Afghanistan, where top military officials were pressing for an American troop escalation to confront a surging enemy. Three weeks later, Mr. Obama announced that he was sending an additional 30,000 troops to the country, bringing the total number of American forces in Afghanistan to more than 100,000."For our troops, it is another day in harm's way," Mr. Obama said on Veterans Day in 2009. "For their families, it is another day to feel the absence of a loved one and the concern for their safety."On Monday, the president said that in the coming months the number of American troops in Afghanistan will go down to 34,000, and that in a year's time Afghan forces will have largely taken over the responsibility of securing their country."We will never forget the profound sacrifices that are made in our name," Mr. Obama said, pledging that the returning troops will be the "best cared for, best treated, best respected veterans in the world."The president hailed veterans of previous wars and the history of American sacrifice in places like Lexington, Gettysburg, Korea, Vietnam and the beaches of Europe."We join as one people to honor a debt we can never fully repay," he said. "There are those who stand apart. They step up, they raise their hands, they take the oath, they put on the uniform and they put their lives on the line."Mr. Obama singled out Richard Overton, an Army veteran who is now 107 years old. Mr. Overton attended the Arlington ceremony, listening as the president described his service in World War II and his return home.
CHARLESTON, S.C. — A few months after the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks, President George W. Bush came to the Citadel, the military college here, to lay out his plans to reconfigure the armed forces for his interventionist posture known as the Bush Doctrine.On Tuesday, Senator Rand Paul went there, effectively to describe just how far he would go in moving the nation away from that doctrine, another step in his effort to position himself as part of the ever-earlier maneuvering of presidential politics, while establishing his place in the continuing fight over his party's direction. As a face of the emergent strain of libertarian-leaning Republicanism, Mr. Paul has drawn suspicion from members of the party's hawkish wing, which has held sway for decades. Some of them consider him an isolationist.Speaking at the Citadel, on the Ashley River here, Mr. Paul declared his support for the "peace through strength" approach of President Ronald Reagan but, true to form, called for an audit of the Pentagon."America must be engaged in the world, commercially, diplomatically and, when necessary, militarily," he told a crowd of several hundred cadets who sat at attention in crisp white uniforms. "But to be engaged doesn't mean to always be engaged in war.""As a senator, I will, if I have to, not hesitate to vote for war," he said but added that "an America that did not seek to become involved in every conflict of the world could do things to make us safer at home and abroad."In praising Mr. Reagan's Cold War military stance, Mr. Paul harked back to an era of vast military spending. But he said that he would not give the military "a blank check" and would audit the Pentagon "not because I dislike the military, because I like the military." He said he would convene a task force of leading military thinkers to cut waste and use the savings to modernize the forces.Mr. Paul was speaking as a member of the Senate's Foreign Relations and Homeland Security Committees, and he never mentioned his prospective presidential run. But allusions to it have been unavoidable throughout his trip to this early primary state. He drew applause in the packed hall when he reprised a line of attack against former Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton for her handling of the terrorist assault on the United States mission in Benghazi, Libya, last year, saying that it had been a "dereliction of duty" and should "preclude Hillary Clinton from ever holding high office again."On Monday, at a session with reporters, Mr. Paul attacked another potential 2016 rival, Gov. Chris Christie of New Jersey, with whom he could compete for the Republican nomination, as a big-spending moderate.He also addressed a crowd of party leaders and activists at a regular local gathering called the Charleston Meeting, held by Mallory Factor, a prominent conservative businessman, author and fund-raiser. (After Mr. Paul's speech, Mr. Factor, who is also a professor of international politics and American government at the Citadel, said that Mr. Paul had "wowed them more than anyone else I've seen here.")Mr. Paul's heavy schedule of appearances in South Carolina has followed a trying period for him. First, another potential Republican rival, Senator Ted Cruz of Texas, eclipsed him during the government shutdown; then he was accused of plagiarism for not attributing the work of others in speeches, an opinion article and one of his books.
LOS ANGELES — Four Marines were killed Wednesday in an accident during maintenance of an artillery range at a base outside San Diego, military officials said.The cause of the accident at Camp Pendleton was under investigation, according to officials. The names of the Marines who were killed have not been released by the military, pending notification of their next of kin.The accident occurred during regularly scheduled maintenance of the base's Zulu Impact Area, which is used for firing artillery and dropping bombs from aircraft during training, according to Cpl. Michael Iams.Maintenance of the range can involve removing ordnance left in the area, moving wild animals or cutting the grass, Corporal Iams said, although he would not comment on what specifically happened Wednesday morning.No live fire was going on at the range at the time of the accident, a military official said.This is the second fatal accident this year involving Marines on a domestic military base. In March, seven Marines died and several others were injured when a mortar round exploded during a live-fire training exercise at a weapons depot in Nevada.An investigation attributed the explosion to an error by a Marine operating a 60-millimeter mortar tube who did not follow correct procedure. Marine officials announced in May that two officers and a noncommissioned officer were removed from command as a result.In a statement Wednesday, Brig. Gen. John W. Bullard, the commanding general at Camp Pendleton, offered condolences to the families of the victims of Wednesday's accident."Our first priority is to provide the families with the support they need during this difficult time," he said.
LOS ANGELES — Four Marines who died at Camp Pendleton this week were killed by an explosion while clearing live ordnance from a training area, military officials said Thursday.The four were identified as Staff Sgt. Mathew R. Marsh, 28; Gunnery Sgt. Gregory J. Mullins, 31; Sgt. Miguel Ortiz, 27; and Staff Sgt. Eric W. Summers, 32. In addition, a Navy hospital corpsman and two other Marines received medical treatment at the scene.Camp Pendleton is about 40 miles north of San Diego.The four men who died were all ordnance disposal technicians who had been with the corps since at least 2006, according to base officials.Lt. Ryan Finnegan, a Camp Pendleton spokesman, said they were clearing unexploded ordnance from the Zulu Impact Area when the explosion occurred around 11 a.m. on Wednesday. What type of ammunition exploded remained under investigation, he said, but grenades, rockets, artillery and bombs from airplanes had all been launched into the area.Although maintenance of the range was "continuous," it had been five years since unexploded ordnance had been cleared there, Lieutenant Finnegan said.While live-fire training was continuing at the adjacent Whiskey Impact Area, no live-fire exercises were going on in the Zulu range at the time of the accident."What went wrong and what might need to change, procedure-wise, is under investigation," Lieutenant Finnegan said.
The Obama administration issued a new policy on Friday that will allow immigrants in the United States illegally who are close relatives of active military troops and veterans to stay and move toward becoming permanent residents.The long-awaited memorandum, coming after three years of deliberations by Department of Homeland Security officials, was an effort to untangle knots in immigration law that left many soldiers worried that their immigrant family members could be deported while they were deployed.The administration applied the policy broadly, extending it to all active-duty members of the armed forces, to reservists including the National Guard, and to all veterans. Their spouses, children and parents will be eligible for a "parole in place," a term that means they will be authorized to remain in the United States and many can proceed with applications for legal residency."This is an enormous step forward for military families and military readiness," said Margaret D. Stock, a lawyer at Cascadia Cross-Border Law in Anchorage, who is a retired Army Reserve lieutenant colonel. "These problems had been a complete nightmare for many military people to deal with."The shift comes as legislation to grant legal status to millions of illegal immigrants has stalled in Congress, with Republican leaders in the House saying this week that they would not hold immigration votes this year or enter negotiations over a broad bill that the Senate passed in June. Obama administration officials said the new rules were based on existing statutes, and did not create any new legal status that would require action by Congress."In order to reduce the uncertainty our active-duty and retired military personnel face because of the immigration status of their family members, we have decided to clarify existing policies," said Peter Boogaard, a spokesman for the Department of Homeland Security.Immigrants without papers generally have to leave the country to collect visas they applied for through marriage to an American citizen or some other family tie. But, in a notorious Catch-22, once those immigrants leave they are barred from returning for years. Under the new policy, those immigrants who are in military families will not have to leave to complete their visa applications.Faced with the legal quandary, many service members chose not to apply for papers for immigrant spouses and relatives, often keeping their immigration status secret. As a result, there is no way of knowing how many immigrants will be affected by the new policy, but it could be tens of thousands.Immigrants involved will have work permits and will have to renew their documents yearly.Several Hispanic organizations, including the League of United Latin American Citizens, hailed the policy, noting that many Hispanics serve in the armed forces. In addition to American citizens, permanent residents and some other legal immigrants are eligible to serve in the military.But many immigrant groups immediately called on President Obama to extend the reprieve to more foreigners here illegally."The administration's action clearly shows that the president can use his power to stop the pain in our communities and grant relief to our families," said Cristina Jimenez, managing director of United We Dream, a youth organization.
WASHINGTON — The Senate majority leader, Harry Reid, on Tuesday threw his support behind a measure that would give military prosecutors the power to decide which sexual assault cases to try, rather than commanders.Mr. Reid's remarks bolstered prospects that the plan could clear the 60-vote threshold in the Senate, even though top Pentagon leaders oppose it. He became the 50th senator to say publicly that he would vote yes, and the third in the last day.The Senate could vote on the contentious measure as early as Wednesday.Its sponsor, Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, said Mr. Reid had shown "extraordinary leadership" in publicly embracing the bill, which has divided members of the Democratic caucus."I am deeply appreciative for his thoughtful consideration, and after meeting directly with survivors, heeding their clear call for change," Ms. Gillibrand said.Other Democrats said they thought Mr. Reid's support was a sign that the plan could pass the Senate."It will give it a huge boost," said Senator Ron Wyden, Democrat of Oregon and a co-sponsor of the measure.But passage is far from guaranteed. Some Democrats, led by Senator Claire McCaskill of Missouri, are pushing for a measure that does not go as far as Ms. Gillibrand's, which would take sexual assault cases outside the military chain of command.The McCaskill plan, which is supported by the Pentagon and co-written by Senator Carl Levin of Michigan, the powerful chairman of the Armed Services Committee, would strip commanders of their ability to overturn jury verdicts and order dishonorable discharge or dismissal for anyone convicted of sexual assault.The issue has been an especially tense one for the Senate's 20 women, who have felt torn between two respected colleagues. Seventeen of them have signed on to the Gillibrand proposal, including two Republicans, Susan Collins of Maine and Lisa Murkowski of Alaska.
ALLEN, Tex. — In the early morning darkness of Saturday, Nov. 23, 1963, at approximately 04:30 hours, Tim Cheek, a 20-year-old Marine assigned to body bearer duty, was one of eight enlisted men to carry President John F. Kennedy's coffin, first into the East Room of the White House, and then back out the next afternoon; up the steps to the Capitol Rotunda and then down the next morning; into St. Matthew's Cathedral and, then, out to the horse-drawn caisson waiting in the street.And finally, across the lawn at Arlington National Cemetery to the grave site.There, after the prayers, Mr. Cheek and the other body bearers lifted the American flag from the coffin and folded it into a triangle that passed from his fellow Marine and friend, Jerry Diamond, at the rear left, to Mr. Cheek, at the front right, and a few people later, to Jacqueline Kennedy."I was in a trance," said Mr. Cheek, 70, a retired insurance executive. "We were kids totally focused on doing our duty as well as we could." During those four days, he said, his main thought was, "Don't drop the casket.""Especially down the steep Rotunda stairs," he said. "One falter, and that casket was gone."Only once could he recall feeling the significance of the moment. He was marching with the caisson. Thousands lined Pennsylvania Avenue, though what he remembers was the quiet."And then a woman yelled out Kennedy's name," he said. "A shiver went through me, and I thought, 'That's the president of the United States inside there.' "On Friday, precisely 50 years after the president was assassinated, about half of the 60 men who served as Marine body bearers, stood death watch or marched with the color guard and drill team are gathering here, at a Courtyard Marriott in this Dallas suburb for their second, and probably final, reunion.They are growing old. Mr. Diamond had hoped to attend the first reunion, three years ago, but he was not well and died in Stow, Ohio, on April 30, 2011, at age 67. Others are long dead. Chuck Finney, another body bearer, was shot down over Cambodia and not until a decade later, said his brother-in-law Ed McCloskey, a fellow Marine, was a piece of his elbow recovered and buried in Arlington.Most of the nine interviewed were from poor or blue-collar families, and being chosen for such elite duty straight from Parris Island was their first step on the way to the middle class. Through the years, they rarely talked about it, but they never forgot about it either. An obituary in The Tribune-Democrat of Johnstown, Pa., for Mr. Diamond, a construction foreman, read like a résumé except for one sentence: "He was especially proud that he was a pallbearer for the late President John F. Kennedy."If, as they say, Americans of that generation remember exactly where they were when President Kennedy was shot, the former Marines remember exactly where the president's remains were after he was shot. John Cunningham, who works in real estate in Denver, and Mr. McCloskey, a retired marketing director in Scaly Mountain, N.C., were among the dozen Marines to escort the ambulance up the White House driveway to the North Portico.In the East Room, during a prayer service for the Kennedys, First Lt. Bill Lee of Allen, Tex., who was in command of the silent drill platoon, stood guard at the head of the coffin."You're at attention looking straight ahead like a mannequin," said Mr. Lee, a retired human resources director. "You leave no footprints. No one is watching you, but you're part of history."Several at the reunion said they were too young to appreciate the historical significance. But, they said, in a few years, they understood that the country had changed for good as politics grew more divisive."I was an accidental participant at a turning point in history," Mr. Cunningham said.He went to Vietnam believing he was fighting for a worthy cause, but by 1970 he was taking part in an antiwar sit-in and in 1972 voted for George McGovern.They were picked because they tested well and looked like quintessential Marines: at least six feet tall, with straight posture and narrow waists. Lamont Pittman says he was told that in his case, an additional consideration was that they needed a black man.
WASHINGTON — House and Senate negotiators reached final agreement Monday on a Pentagon policy bill that would strengthen protections for military victims of sexual assault and keep the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, open over President Obama's strenuous objections, as Congress rushed to wrap up work for the year.While the proposed legislation includes what many on Capitol Hill see as expansive changes to laws governing sexual assault, it stops well short of the more far-reaching changes advocated by many victims and Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, who sought to remove military commanders from overseeing the cases and brought considerable attention to the issue this year.The new measure would prevent commanding officers from overturning sexual assault verdicts, expand a special victims counsel program for the survivors of sexual assault throughout the military and make retaliation for reporting assault a crime.Significantly, for criminal complaints, including sexual assault, courts of investigation — known as Article 32 hearings — would act more like preliminary hearings looking for probable cause to pursue a court-martial. Under the current system, sexual assault accusers are brought before investigators and grilled in cross-examinations. But commanders will maintain control over the court-martial process."On the one hand, important progress has been made with respect to preliminary investigations," said Eugene R. Fidell, an expert on military justice at Yale University. "On the other hand, real reform in the structure of military justice has been put off."The way the Pentagon deal was struck reflected the dysfunction that has marked the current Congress. Negotiators from the House and Senate Armed Services Committees found common ground on the sprawling measure even though a Senate version had yet to pass, and some Senate Republicans were furious that they once again had been denied the right to offer multiple amendments.It was not immediately clear that Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, would go along, although with the military's ability to issue combat and hazard pay set to expire Dec. 31, pressure to act will be great.But in the strange first session of the 113th Congress, precedent has rarely held, and in a legislative year that is likely to go down in history as the least productive ever, Monday's accord on defense policy was something of a victory for Congress."This isn't the way we'd like to do it," said Senator James M. Inhofe of Oklahoma, the ranking Republican on the Senate Armed Services Committee. "It's the only way we could do it."The House passed its annual Pentagon policy bill this summer, but the Senate's version has been pending for weeks, bogged down in a dispute over the number of Republican amendments that would be allowed to come to a vote. As Republican and Democratic leaders battled over procedure, the House and Senate Armed Services Committees negotiated behind the scenes on a compromise bill.The measure is the first change to law governing sexual assault in the military in years, stemming from the furor that has erupted over the rising numbers of sexual assaults in the military; there were 3,553 sexual assault complaints reported in the first three quarters of this fiscal year, a nearly 50 percent increase over the same period a year earlier.The problem has drawn particular scrutiny in this Congress by the seven women on the Senate Armed Services Committee, who were divided on the best approach to contain the problem. "This agreement represents a huge win for justice in America's armed forces," said a joint statement from Senator Claire McCaskill, Democrat of Missouri, and Senator Kelly Ayotte, a Republican from New Hampshire, who have both offered measures to combat sexual assault.Ms. Gillibrand intends to move forward with her legislation to remove commanders as a stand-alone bill; Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, has assured her a vote.
WASHINGTON — The House on Thursday approved a bipartisan budget accord and a Pentagon policy bill that would strengthen protections for victims of sexual assault. But as it wrapped up its business for the year, it left unfinished a major piece of domestic policy — the farm bill — making it likely that Congress will not deal with it until January.Republicans and Democrats hope the budget pact, which passed 332 to 94, will act as a truce in the spending battles that have paralyzed Congress for nearly three years, and leaders in both parties sought to marginalize hard-line conservatives opposed to any compromise.The defense measure would, in addition to strengthening protections for military victims of sexual assault, leave open the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, over President Obama's objections.The provisions to stem the growing number of sexual assault cases in the military are the most expansive in years. They would include new rules to prevent commanding officers from overturning sexual assault verdicts.But an agreement remained elusive on the farm bill, the subject of continuing disagreements between Republicans and Democrats over spending for food stamps and expanding crop insurance for farmers, among other issues. All the House could pass on Thursday was a simple one-month extension of the current law, which Senate Democrats oppose because they think it will distract from the completion of a new bill.Earlier, with bipartisan support in hand for the budget deal, Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio declared war on the outside conservative groups that tried to scuttle it. For the second day in a row, he accused groups like the Club for Growth, Heritage Action and Americans for Prosperity of reflexively opposing a reasonable plan to try to raise their profiles and improve their fund-raising.He said the groups had devised the strategy of linking further government spending to the repeal of Mr. Obama's health care law, then pressing their members and House Republicans to go along, even though they knew it would shut down the government and ultimately fail."Are you kidding me?" the speaker shouted, denouncing opposition to the budget accord. "There comes a point where some people step over the line. When you criticize something and you have no idea what you're criticizing, it undermines your credibility."Yet when the Senate takes up the bill, Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, is likely to vote against it, as are virtually all of the Republican senators who are contending with Tea Party challenges next year or are wooing conservatives for a potential presidential bid.Senator Jeff Sessions of Alabama, the ranking Republican on the Senate Budget Committee, has already declared his opposition."Much of the spending increase in this deal has been justified by increased fees and new revenue," Mr. Sessions said. "In other words, it's a fee increase to fuel a spending increase — rather than reducing deficits."By most analyses, the budget deal, struck by Representative Paul D. Ryan, Republican of Wisconsin, and Senator Patty Murray, Democrat of Washington, is a modest plan to soften the blow of the across-the-board spending cuts, known as sequestration, that went into effect in March, and to slightly lower the budget deficit over the next decade.The legislation would also extend current Medicare payment rates for three months, staving off a cut of more than 20 percent to health care providers. That would allow lawmakers to try to find a more permanent "doctors' fix" to avoid a deficit reduction measure that neither party has been able to stomach for more than a decade.The budget fight has turned into a donnybrook between congressional leaders and the groups and lawmakers aligned with the Tea Party. It pits the House Republican leadership against the Tea Party wing; one potential Republican presidential candidate, Mr. Ryan, against two others who oppose his deal, Senators Marco Rubio of Florida and Rand Paul of Kentucky; and a congressional majority against outside pressure groups, both liberal and conservative."It is clear that the conservative movement has come under attack on Capitol Hill," 50 conservative activists wrote in a letter to congressional Republicans.Democratic leaders took heart in what they saw as a turning point in their battle with uncompromising conservatives and as a moment when a cooperative attitude in Washington might return.
WASHINGTON — President Obama has decided to keep the National Security Agency and the Pentagon's cyberwarfare branch under the same command despite concerns that it concentrates too much power in the hands of a single military official responsible for both surveillance and directing a growing arsenal of cyberweapons.As a practical matter, the decision means that Mr. Obama must appoint a four-star military officer to succeed Gen. Keith B. Alexander, the first person to simultaneously run the two organizations, when he retires early next year. Only a military commander can run Cyber Command, which is responsible for defending the military's computer and sensor systems and carrying out offensive computer-network attacks.But that also means the N.S.A. will be run by someone who has spent a career in the military culture, with the mind-set that engenders.Several members of an advisory committee that submitted its report to Mr. Obama on Friday — with what the White House said was a list of 40 recommendations — expressed the view that the two organizations should be split, in part to assure civilian control of the N.S.A.The agency is responsible for electronic intelligence gathering and has been at the center of the revelations about government surveillance. The White House said the report would not be made public until next month, when Mr. Obama announces which of the recommendations he has embraced and which he has rejected.In a statement, Caitlin Hayden, the spokeswoman for the National Security Council, said that Mr. Obama had decided that "keeping the positions of N.S.A. director and Cyber Command commander together as one, dual-hatted position is the most effective approach to accomplishing both agencies' missions."The initial decision to unify the two was made in 2009 at the recommendation of Robert M. Gates, then the defense secretary, Ms. Hayden said, "with the aim of unifying the leadership of the organizations responsible for signals intelligence and defending the nation in cyberspace.""N.S.A. plays a unique role in supporting Cyber Command's mission," she continued, "providing critical support for target access and development, including linguists, analysts, cryptanalytic capabilities and sophisticated technological infrastructure."One leading candidate to replace General Alexander is Vice Adm. Michael S. Rogers, now the commander of the Navy's cyberoperations. He was the director of intelligence for the military's Joint Chiefs of Staff and for the Pentagon's Pacific Command.The combined Cyber Command and the security agency's most famous joint operation so far has been "Olympic Games," the cyberattacks launched against Iran's nuclear program.But the revelation of that operation in 2010, when the computer worm involved in the attack escaped from the Natanz nuclear plant and began to circulate around the world, started a debate about the degree to which the United States wants to make computer weaponry a regular part of its military arsenal.From its creation in 2009, Cyber Command has had a complicated organizational relationship within the military and intelligence community. It is not a stand-alone military command, but is subordinate to the Strategic Command, in Nebraska, which has authority over America's nuclear arsenal. But it is physically located at Fort Meade, in Maryland, alongside the National Security Agency.Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel issued no official statement on the decision to retain the current structure, but senior Pentagon officials said the outcome was based on an assessment that the military's global combatant commanders rely heavily on both the security agency and Cyber Command for real-time support.In an interview in November, Mr. Hagel previewed how policy makers and commanders were approaching the question of whether to separate the N.S.A. and Cyber Command leadership — in particular in measuring any changes against the risks to carrying out military operations around the globe."I listen to our combatant commanders very carefully on this, because they're probably as big a user on a day-to-day basis of the benefits of having those two commands together as anyone," Mr. Hagel said. "And we charge them — America charges them, the Congress, the president, I do — in each of their combatant commander responsibilities, to keep their areas safe, but also keep us all safe."In a separate interview last month, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs, echoed a similar set of priorities as he weighed his advice on the question of whether to separate the N.S.A. and Cyber Command leadership."My interest is in assuring that the intelligence that the National Security Agency gathers is responsive to the needs of those out in the tactical level fighting our wars," General Dempsey said.He said that Cyber Command and the security agency were "actually operating in the same domain, and we rely on one set of critical I.T. architecture." It would be inefficient — even financially impossible — to fully recreate for Cyber Command the architecture that already exists within the N.S.A., he said.Also on Friday, the security agency publicly confirmed that Chris Inglis, the agency's deputy director and its highest ranking civilian, had stepped down. The move was first reported by Foreign Policy.A spokeswoman for the security agency, Vanee Vines, said that Mr. Inglis had stepped down this week and been succeeded by Fran Fleisch as the acting deputy director until a decision is made about whom his long-term successor should be.A former air force pilot and a retired brigadier general in the Air National Guard, Mr. Inglis had been serving as the N.S.A.'s deputy director since 2006.
WASHINGTON — The National Guard will distribute identification cards to the gay spouses of its personnel, overriding the resistance of several states that opposed a new military policy permitting such cards to all spouses and partners regardless of sexual orientation.After the Supreme Court overturned the Defense of Marriage Act this summer, the Defense Department announced it would give the same general benefits to all eligible spouses, including ID cards.But nine states — Florida, Georgia, Indiana, Louisiana, Mississippi, Oklahoma, South Carolina, Texas and West Virginia — said the issuing of ID cards violated their state constitutions, and would not provide them at National Guard facilities, which are under state control.The states' actions rankled Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel, who said in a speech to the Anti-Defamation League this fall: "Everyone who serves our country in uniform, everyone in this country, should receive all the benefits they deserve, and they've earned, and in accordance with the law. Everyone's rights must be protected."Mr. Hagel said Friday that all states were now in compliance with the law. West Virginia and Indiana voluntarily changed their policies to conform with the Defense Department's, and some of the other states chose to have the ID cards issued by staff workers who were put under federal authority. Florida, Oklahoma and South Carolina moved their ID card machines into nearby federal facilities."All military spouses and families sacrifice on behalf of our country," Mr. Hagel said in a statement. "They deserve our respect and the benefits they are entitled to under the law. All of DoD is committed to pursuing equal opportunities for all who serve this nation, and I will continue to work to ensure our men and women in uniform as well as their families have full and equal access to the benefits they deserve."Earlier this year, while awaiting the Supreme Court's decision, the Defense Department moved to extend benefits to same-sex military partners and spouses, including base access and day care and health care benefits that were denied under the Defense Of Marriage Act.After the Supreme Court overturned that act, those benefits were expanded to include medical and dental coverage and housing allowances."We applaud the administration and Secretary Hagel for seeing this issue through and ensuring all state National Guards are compliant," said Stephen Peters, president of the American Military Partner Association, who noted that many state governments still discriminate against gay military families in other ways.
SAN DIEGO — A Navy criminal investigator admitted Tuesday that he provided more than 100 pages of secret investigative files to a Malaysian contractor in exchange for prostitutes, cash and luxury travel, the first conviction in a ship-supply case involving high-ranking Navy officials.The investigator, John B. Beliveau II, pleaded guilty before Jan Adler, a federal magistrate judge, to charges of conspiracy to commit bribery and bribery.According to his plea agreement, Mr. Beliveau for more than two years until September regularly searched confidential Navy Criminal Investigative Service databases to provide information to the contractor, Leonard Glenn Francis. The contractor's company, Glenn Defense Marine Asia, was the target of investigations by the Navy service into alleged overbilling, and according to the plea agreement, Mr. Francis provided him with cash-filled envelopes, travel to Asia and prostitutes, among other gifts.Mr. Beliveau, 44, is one of six Navy officials linked to the scandal, and prosecutors contend Mr. Francis overcharged the Navy by at least $20 million. Mr. Francis also is charged in the bribery case.A spokeswoman for the United States attorney's office declined to say if Mr. Beliveau would be cooperating with prosecutors.Mr. Beliveau faces a maximum penalty of 20 years in prison and hundreds of thousands of dollars in fines. Sentencing has been scheduled for March.
FORT MEADE, Md. — A military judge on Tuesday twice expelled Ramzi bin al-Shibh — one of five Guantánamo Bay detainees facing a death penalty trial — from a courtroom at the military base there in Cuba after he disrupted proceedings by shouting about his treatment.Col. James L. Pohl, the judge presiding over the pretrial military commission hearing, clashed with Mr. bin al-Shibh at the start of both the morning and afternoon sessions. Each time, Mr. bin al-Shibh began loudly complaining about torture instead of answering a question from the judge about whether he understood his rights. He is charged with aiding the terrorist attacks on Sept. 11, 2001.As guards took him away the second time to watch the hearing on a monitor in a nearby holding cell, Mr. bin al-Shibh's voice faded from the closed-circuit feed that reporters — some at a media facility on the base, some here at Fort Meade — are allowed to watch. He appeared to be shouting something like "I am not a war criminal; you are a war criminal."The outbursts contrasted with the fairly technical arguments debated the rest of the day. Since the five detainees were arraigned in May 2012, after the collapse of the Obama administration's plan to prosecute them in a federal civilian court, their pretrial hearings have been bogged down in numerous challenges by defense lawyers about the fairness of the tribunal process. Any actual trial remains a distant prospect.Among other matters, defense lawyers have challenged the decision by the military official who oversees the tribunals to classify the case as a potential death penalty matter. They argue that various obstacles had prevented them from having a meaningful opportunity to persuade him to take the possibility of execution off the table because, they say, the Central Intelligence Agency tortured their clients.The official, Bruce MacDonald, a retired admiral who has since ended his tenure as the tribunals' "convening authority," testified about his decision-making process in February. On Tuesday, defense lawyers argued that two former MacDonald aides should also be required to testify about what they did or did not tell him about C.I.A. torture — and why. But Colonel Pohl, who had already ruled that their testimony was unnecessary, declined to change his mind.In addition, Walter Ruiz, a reservist Navy commander who represents another of the five defendants, Mustafa al Hawsawi, made a lengthy presentation about problems he had experienced in obtaining a translator and death penalty mitigation specialist with security clearances before Mr. MacDonald made his decision.But the most vivid events of the day involved Mr. bin al-Shibh, 41, a Yemeni accused of passing money and messages from Al Qaeda to the Sept. 11 hijackers.At the start of the day, Mr. bin al-Shibh's lawyer, Lt. Cmdr. Kevin Bogucki of the Navy, complained that guards had kept his client awake the night before with bangs and clanking sounds. As a result, he argued, his client was groggy and not able to be "meaningfully" present to aid his defense.Colonel Pohl noted that the government disputed such complaints, and that Commander Bogucki had not made any motion seeking a remedy. After that exchange, Mr. bin al-Shibh declined to address a question from the judge about whether he understood his rights to be present or absent on subsequent days.While each of the other four defendants, including Khalid Shaikh Mohammed, the self-described architect of the Sept. 11 attacks, answered yes in turn, Mr. bin al-Shibh said, "I totally refuse to answer this question as long as the judge is taking position against me and against my allegations."He then started in on a monologue. It was difficult to make out what he was saying on the audio feed, but it included something about "torture" and "a secret C.I.A. prison.""Nobody knows about it. Nobody enters it. Nobody sees it," he said.When Mr. bin al-Shibh refused requests to quiet down, the judge ordered guards to remove him until the hearing resumed after lunch. A similar scene ensued after the break.When the detainee was removed the second time, Colonel Pohl told Commander Bogucki that he would not allow Mr. bin al-Shibh to provide other than "yes" or "no" answers because he might divulge classified information.That explanation called into question Colonel Pohl's order this week adjusting rules for the protection of classified information. The order has not yet been made public.But in a statement on Monday, another defense lawyer, James Connell, said the judge had lifted a rule that deemed as classified the "observations and experiences" of the defendants about their time in custody.Lt. Col. Todd Breasseale, a military spokesman, instead portrayed the order as merely removing a rule that the judge deemed "superfluous," and warned that "interested observers are well advised to read it prior to opining on what it says and means, the opinions of defense counsel notwithstanding."
WASHINGTON — A panel of outside advisers urged President Obama on Wednesday to impose major oversight and some restrictions on the National Security Agency, arguing that in the past dozen years its powers had been enhanced at the expense of personal privacy.The panel recommended changes in the way the agency collects the telephone data of Americans, spies on foreign leaders and prepares for cyberattacks abroad.But the most significant recommendation of the panel of five intelligence and legal experts was that Mr. Obama restructure a program in which the N.S.A. systematically collects logs of all American phone calls — so-called metadata — and a small group of agency officials have the power to authorize the search of an individual's telephone contacts. Instead, the panel said, the data should remain in the hands of telecommunications companies or a private consortium, and a court order should be necessary each time analysts want to access the information of any individual "for queries and data mining."The experts briefed Mr. Obama on Wednesday on their 46 recommendations, and a senior administration official said Mr. Obama was "open to many" of the changes, though he has already rejected one that called for separate leaders for the N.S.A. and its Pentagon cousin, the United States Cyber Command.If Mr. Obama adopts the majority of the recommendations, it would mark the first major restrictions on the unilateral powers that the N.S.A. has acquired since the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks. They would require far more specific approvals from the courts, far more oversight from the Congress and specific presidential approval for spying on national leaders, especially allies. The agency would also have to give up one of its most potent weapons in cyberconflicts: the ability to insert "back doors" in American hardware or software, a secret way into them to manipulate computers, or to purchase previously unknown flaws in software that it can use to conduct cyberattacks."We have identified a series of reforms that are designed to safeguard the privacy and dignity of American citizens, and to promote public trust, while also allowing the intelligence community to do what must be done to respond to genuine threats," says the report, which Mr. Obama commissioned in August in response to the mounting furor over revelations by Edward J. Snowden, a former N.S.A. contractor, of the agency's surveillance practices.It adds, "Free nations must protect themselves, and nations that protect themselves must remain free."White House officials said they expected significant resistance to some of the report's conclusions from the N.S.A. and other intelligence agencies, which have argued that imposing rules that could slow the search for terror suspects could pave the way for another attack. But those intelligence leaders were not present in the Situation Room on Wednesday when Mr. Obama met the authors of the report.The report's authors made clear that they were weighing the N.S.A.'s surveillance requirements against other priorities like constitutional protections for privacy and economic considerations for American businesses. The report came just three days after a federal judge in Washington ruled that the bulk collection of telephone data by the government was "almost Orwellian" and a day after Silicon Valley executives complained to Mr. Obama that the N.S.A. programs were undermining American competitiveness in offering cloud services or selling American-made hardware, which is now viewed as tainted.The report was praised by privacy advocates in Congress and civil-liberties groups as a surprisingly aggressive call for reform.Senator Ron Wyden, an Oregon Democrat who has been an outspoken critic of N.S.A. surveillance, said it echoed the arguments of the N.S.A.'s skeptics in significant ways, noting that it flatly declared that the phone-logging program had not been necessary in stopping terrorist attacks."This has been a big week for the cause of intelligence reform," he said.
WASHINGTON — The Senate reached a last-minute agreement late Thursday night to vote on a small batch of President Obama's nominees before the weekend, allowing senators to head home in time for the holiday break without approving some crucial appointments, like Janet L. Yellen as chairwoman of the Federal Reserve.The compromise came shortly before the Senate voted, 84 to 15, to pass a $625.1 billion Pentagon bill, one of the few accomplishments of this Congress, which was noted more for partisan bickering than it was for legislation.The deal will delay Ms. Yellen's confirmation until next year. The Senate will vote to end the debate on her nomination on Friday morning, but she will not be officially confirmed until Congress returns from its winter recess on Jan. 6.The three nominees whose confirmations are expected Friday under the agreement include Judge Brian J. Davis, of the Fourth Judicial Circuit of Florida, to the Federal District Court bench for the Middle District of Florida; John Koskinen to lead the Internal Revenue Service; and Alejandro Mayorkas as deputy secretary at the Department of Homeland Security.Approval of the Pentagon bill, the National Defense Authorization Act, will keep open the prison at Guantánamo Bay, Cuba, despite Mr. Obama's stated goal to close the military detention center. The bill also strengthens protections for victims of sexual assault in the military.Congress has been in danger of failing to pass a Pentagon spending bill for the first time in more than 50 years and has been under considerable pressure to do so before Dec. 31, when the Defense Department's authority to issue combat and hazard pay, as well as recruitment and retention bonuses, is to expire. The bill accounts for $625.1 billion of the $3.8 trillion federal budget.In addressing the problem of sexual assault in the military, the bill will provide a victim's advocate to every service member who reports an assault. The measure will also make it a crime to retaliate against service members who report assaults, and it will prevent commanding officers from overturning sexual assault verdicts.But it falls far short of measures that Senator Kirsten E. Gillibrand, Democrat of New York, had hoped to include. Her proposals would remove sexual assault cases from the military chain of command and give military prosecutors the ability to decide which cases to try. Ms. Gillibrand plans to move forward with her changes as a stand-alone bill, and has been promised a vote by Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader.The Pentagon bill also sets aside $80.7 billion to continue financing for the Afghanistan war, and the measure provides a 1 percent pay raise for members of the military.Republican lawmakers remained frustrated that they were unable to reach an agreement with the Democrats to be able to offer amendments to the Pentagon bill. "So as we end the year, it's a tragedy the way the Senate is being run into the ground by basically one person," said Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the minority leader, referring to Mr. Reid.The up-to-the-wire deal on the president's nominees was something of a Christmas surprise. Senate business has been derailed by discord all week — and even for much of Thursday.Republicans, still smarting from the Democrats' decision to invoke the "nuclear option" to eliminate the filibuster for nearly every presidential nominee, had spent much of the month using every arcane procedural hurdle at their disposal to run out the clock on a series of Mr. Obama's nominations.Democrats retaliated by scheduling votes late into the evening and threatening to keep Congress in session through the weekend until what they considered to be the most crucial nominations received a vote."With all the Republican obstruction delay we have seen over the last two weeks, is it any wonder Democrats changed the rules last month? Of course not," Mr. Reid said Thursday on the Senate floor. "The American people want Congress to work, not obstruct."Before the deal was struck, Republicans complained that Mr. Reid had insisted on clearing as many nominations as possible before the holiday break. "It appears to me like he's trying to spike the ball," said Senator Bob Corker, Republican of Tennessee. "He's attempting to not only do the nuclear option but then to rub it in everyone's face."Not every problem has been solved. Unemployment insurance benefits are also set to expire at the end of the year, and Senate Democrats and Republicans have been unable to reach an agreement to bring the bill to a floor vote. Mr. Reid promised the measure would be taken up as soon as the Senate returns, but he did so with a swipe at his colleagues across the aisle. "Congress is finishing this year less popular than a cockroach, and this kind of mindless, knee-jerk obstruction from Republicans is exactly why," he said.The stalling tactics, late-night votes, amendment fights and general lack of achievements still soured spirits as the Senate finally prepared to head home.
WASHINGTON — An Air Force general who oversaw some of the nation's nuclear weapons was dismissed for drunken antics during an official trip to Moscow last summer, according to a new investigative report .Maj. Gen. Michael J. Carey, who was removed this year as commander of the 20th Air Force, which maintains and operates the nation's intercontinental ballistic missiles, is accused of drinking heavily, insulting his guests and other behavior "unbecoming of an officer and gentleman" during a four-day visit to Moscow in July, according to the inquiry. It was first reported by The Associated Press and The Washington Post.After drinking for hours in bars, with people including someone identified in the report as "cigar shop lady," General Carey was slurring his speech and stumbling through Red Square, "pouting and sulking." The report said he tried to force a bar band to let him play with them.The inquiry comes at a time when a large number of senior military officers have been investigated, penalized or fired over sexual improprieties, sexual violence, financial mismanagement or poor judgment.General Carey is also accused of interrupting speakers and correcting a Russian translator, and otherwise behaving "in a manner that exceeded the limits of accepted standards of good conduct," according to the investigation, which was conducted by the Air Force's inspector general. General Carey's unit was responsible for 450 nuclear missiles.According to The Post, General Carey received a "letter of counseling" and has been reassigned as a special assistant to the commander of the Air Force's Space Command. An email to the Air Force public affairs office was not immediately returned.The problem of bad behavior in the military's top ranks has become so acute that Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, this year ordered an overhaul of training and development programs for generals and admirals. He has said that one of his major priorities is examining the impact of more than a decade of war on the volunteer force's professionalism."You can have someone of incredible character who can't lead their way out of a forward operating base because they don't have the competence to understand the application of military power, and that doesn't do me any good," General Dempsey said in an interview this year. "Conversely, you can have someone who is intensely competent, who is steeped in the skills of the profession, but doesn't live a life of character. And that doesn't do me any good."He added: "We've been living with unconstrained resources for 10 years, and, frankly, we've developed some bad habits. It's those bad habits we are seeking to overcome."Senator John McCain of Arizona, the top Republican on the Senate Armed Services Committee, echoed General Dempsey's frustration and said that even a single case of malfeasance in the top ranks was a problem. "One is too many," he said in an interview on Friday. "It hurts the reputation of the military."In fact, Pentagon officials say the Defense Department's inspector general has not investigated an unusually high number of cases of malfeasance this year. But officials say the cases are more noticeable because of the more prominent role the military has played in the nation's life since the attacks of Sept. 11, 2001.
HONOLULU — President Obama took a break from opening gifts and singing carols with his family on Christmas Day, and spoke to about 580 military troops in Hawaii, where he and his family are spending their winter break, thanking them for their service.Joined by his wife, Michelle, the president arrived in the "chow hall" of the Marine Corps Base Hawaii in Kaneohe Bay, as the troops were finishing up their Christmas dinner. On Christmas Eve, Mr. Obama had placed holiday telephone calls to United States service members from each branch of the military, including the four members who were wounded in a military mission in South Sudan last weekend."Michelle and I know that we would not enjoy the freedoms we do if it weren't for the incredible dedication and professionalism and work that you do," Mr. Obama said, wearing a blue short-sleeved shirt and dark khaki pants. " The least we can do is just let you all know we're grateful to you."The president added: "We hope that the mess has done right by you and that the food is pretty good."Earlier in the day, Mr. and Mrs. Obama also released a holiday-themed weekly address, in which they emphasized the spirit of giving that marks the season.Talking about Americans who had volunteered in their communities — helping out in soup kitchens, or organizing gift drives for children in need — Mr. Obama said, "And for all of us as Americans, regardless of our faith, those are values that can drive us to be better parents and friends, better neighbors and better citizens."The first lady picked up on her husband's theme: "So as we look to the New Year, let's pledge ourselves to living out those values by reaching out and lifting up those in our communities who could use a hand up," Mrs. Obama said.On Christmas Eve, Mrs. Obama had also gotten into the festive spirit early as part of the annual NORAD Tracks Santa Program; she fielded calls from children across the country, giving them updates on the progress Santa and his reindeers were making across the night sky.Back on the base on Wednesday, the president ended on a hopeful note, wishing the assembled troops a Merry Christmas in Hawaiian. "We hope all of you have a Mele Kalikimaka," he said, " and we hope you guys have a great new year, as well."
